      "identifier" : [
         "8_06251_287"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "YHE CANADIÂN MACiAZINE January 1917 - - ------ - --- . . . ....... . ....... ..... ...... PrIcf; 25 Cents L-ISFilNj.ý LIMITED. TORONTO",
         "Tour Hair ~Oyour h air to look its best the shampoo must flot impair the F.oily secretion of the scalp; otherwise the hair will become dry and brittie. Ivory Soap is so mid and pure that it does nothing but cleanse, Its coplous lather enables it to absorb the dirt and an\u003e' excessive oit there may be upon the hair, but, because of its freedom. from ailcali and other harsh materiats, it does flot affect the tiny oil ducta at the roots. Because Ivory does flot contain unsaponified oit it does flot stic to the haïr. Rinsing is quic, easy and thorough, Ieavmng the hair in condition to dry soft, sillcy, fluffy and glossy. IVORY SOAP SHAMPOO.-Mace a warm suds w1th IvoeSoap Paste (ser directions inside w~r\u003e,r) Saturate hait and scalp. Rubth sap with thepate nddihe ud ovr t.Rine .'ray r cup, gradually cooling the ate. Dr ý;.bbi, i th sund pi ebutdolot use sttong heat. 5 CENTS IVORY SAP 9fAô%P Made in the Procici \u0026 Gam.bie factori e\u003e ai Hamilion, Canada",
         "CA.NADIAN MAGAZINE AIDVERTISîEk The Renaissance of music J UST as Mr. Edison put music into millions of homes 0with his invention of the first phonograph, so now the beautiful worid of music is reborn with the coming of NEW*£E'DISON -The Instrument That Re-Creates Music It astounds. It amazes. You cati have ne conception of its wonders, until you hear it re-create song, instrument and 5peech in direct comparison with the original. Demonstrations of this unparal- leled achievement in the leading cities, have proved to the satis- faction of the greatest musical critics that the New Edison is unapproached in its range of musical expression. Do y\u003cm want Io kesow more about Mr. Edison's marvellous invention, which one of the musical critics describes as \"the Phonograph witb a soul \"? If so, send to us for a copy of the brochure, \" Music's Re-Creation \", and the bookiet \" What The Critica Say\". 6 Irh«znq A. Edison, Inc. hept. 8231, Ora~nge, N..",
         "The Canadian Magazine No. 3 -Frontîispic, - - -199 - - - -212 . . . . 1215 - - -219 - - - -226 ryan -229 mi -- 2:30 Reeves -2'31 . - 236 - - - - 241 Vol. XLVIII Contents, January, 1917 ICULTUE FRON TUFn SKY Drawing byv Louis 'Raemaekers THE~ WIN--TIU-WARt CM31NET-r - Lindsiay C'rawfordl TUBr MuNi on Tru FAMILY. V1urlON Maýdge v bt 1T 11 i TILL VERSE--P.MMaoad- OCTOBR DA. A AINTNO -- - lomer Wto RE-lMWO THENI AIMIARY T.ýIF OP CAAA--------- ----, D. LOgan - IliI Till ,1F \"Il, K1 IV 4 N i %A1ZVl'il, POIITRY TiiSqF rrR Cun. PwCTrxoi - Will Il. OgIZlVie- LI', SOLDIER 'MOTMFER. Vznsn - - Margaret Yandig Bl THE WurIIri AtN 'Vmisn - - bouisev M.orey Bowin Tiu,- G]OtneTIFRo¶ , FICTION - - -Hen-iriettat Ke(ndrick INOTAB3LE MYS--------------------da BuIrwa.sh- W\\r1r1 CANADIÂNS FROii THE FRONT -- La Pey Am M - V. WAR Ni -illEIIK AMI lit PB 11 -VPlI1 TUEF ViLLAG,%E STRE. A PAINTING - F. MeiiryKno TiUiE 'txE, OF GEIIMÂNY FROM THE1 SEA Commander Biellair OuaR NFvUTwAL SmY FiCToN; - - -f.. E. LeRossignol A VILLAGE EE S r---------A Suzor Cote - - TIME TUIE WRITER ---------Mrs. Arthur Murph u NEw NORTH---------------R. G.Mc1~ - MAJOR BRUEETON'S WEDDING. FICTION Franklint B. Wiley A, BELGIA.N IloMa. A DRÂwiNo Louis Raeinaekers Tir, PIONxER FOR Or THIE 1sos BAY CO-MIANY------------R. -J. Fraser - - TUF COAL MxmR. VERSE --- - A. D. Merkel - - FATHER FoaRsiTFR. A SKETCH - -- W. E. Kelly - - THE LBRR TABILE-----------Book Reviews - - TwiCEF-ToLD TALES-----------Current Humour - - 247 - 249 - 25 4 - '265 -267 -270 -273 -2R2 $2.50 PER ÂNNUM. Including Great Britain, Irelan4l and most -of the Co' SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. Letters icontalning subacriptions should be regiatered and addreuaed t CANADIAN MAGAZINE, 200-206 Adelaide Street West, Toront Eurpen Ofies,16Regent Street, London, S.1V. 38 Rue du Copyright, Canada, 1916, 1\u003ey The Ontario Publlsblng Co., Llmited. ~W fea Ly-",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZIN~E ADVERTISER ?ýioLUXway LUI %vs IaM. lub et Uwtr. Yhen tka n.,,r ,tA£è hf .uàt3ad m.OV th.u frda\"@,.u iPPi tAhuds magius.inelir. se,s ,1 là# go-qns ày. .1k sa*\" u..tnref\u0026ma~.i a IKOOLLENS are gyetting dearer. Wash them right, though, anid you give thein years of life. Neyer twist or wring them the wool fibres become bard, thick and brittie. Just stir your woollens about *n tepid water after the LUX flakes haver been dissolved in the water while hot. SUse LUX ence of soap in flakes-and Y-ou*I1 be delighted with the fresb, an, NEW feeling your woollens take on. LUX can't harm. hat pure water may touch. No rubbing needed with LUX- ce of soap in flakes-Sold by ail good grocers, and British-made by- LEVER BROTHE .RS LiNiTEDFi, TORONTO 1lOc* WON'T SHRINK WOOvLLENS",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The January'-q Number Our Strangle.Hllod on the. German Spy System Anotable airticle in \"The Lasi Phase\" series, by William Le Queux, author of \"Spies 'If thle Kaiser\" and an authority on al~ things relating to the secret seCrvice systems of Euiropec. Sir Thomas White By WILLIAMI LEWVIS D N» An intimate sketch of the man who has charge (if Canada's financial part in the great war, and wbo is looked on as the comnifg \"Big Mai\" in Dominion Politics.- The Von Schultz Trial 11Y IRVIN\"G E. STRUTHERS -On FVCecmber 8th, 18.38, there went out from that dungeon [Fort Henryj to ieet cleath on the scaffold, a man whose trial and tragic end are \"soIat.d withl the name of Kingston's most famous citizen, and one of Cand's Icading states1nen. That crimlinal was Niles Gustof Schobtwsk von SchuIltz and bis coutisel at bis trial %vas John A. Macdonald.\"' Ii tio there will be an excellent short story, or rather charate sketch, by uL. M. Montgomery, author o! '\"Anne' o! Green Gables\", ýjshr story by Archie P\u003e. MeKishnie, and a playlet of the war by John Makey. S2.5o pEF ÂNNYJ, i0cludiug Gret Britain. irlaj and uaost Of h lob. m SINGILE COPIES, 25 CETS THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Ade8ade Street West --TORONTO WHATr RECOMMENDS ITSkLLF? Of ma COOPER[I",
         "CANAPIAN MAGAýZI'N ADVERTISER Vour Banking Business Invîted W E invite the banIing Ac- coutits of buiscs people, corporations and soc*etics, AWu Private and savings accouiits. The BatIk of Toronto pr@vldes is cO5'- tOmers witfi a modern Bauking Service. In this it Combines all the advantages Of sOtsod banking exptrience with the modernO equipmrnt anil protruive outlook ntcts- .av t0 Ulget prment-day reqwframeti Paid.up CaPta1 R.oerve Fismde $ 5,000,000 - 6,402,810 * - DIRECTORS WG GOODERIIAM, PRESIDENT JOSEPH HENDERSON, VICE.PRESIDENT Wilz, Stone, Jha M\u0026on\u0026oad, Lt.-Cl. A. E. Goodegliw àdg._-,en. pr. S. Midge, J. L. %agelaait, Wiiam I. Gear Pasi J. Myler, A. Hf. Camnpbell THOS. F. HOW, GENEAL MANAGER Johs\u0026R Lab SçsPt- Of brnhs T. A. Bird, Chîcf IusPstt.r",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ONIAPSIDE, LEINDON9 ENOLANO. The Great Specialistv in OLOVES, HOSIERY, and UN)EIRWEAR An unrIvaIted varlety In stock IXTIEMILY MODERATE PuICES FUÜ p,,ile Prc Lis\u0026 o FuJI dciailed Price Lis of ai deartments may b.! *8 Departments may b. ob ained FREE. on sp. obtained FREE, on ap plcatio. diect fron the plication, direct fr\u003cim the Ontario PubllsMng Go. Ontario Publlbhng Cc LIM11041LIui 2N0040 Adelaide Street, West, 200-206 Adelaide Street, West, Toron to T or o nto Departments Ladies', Mens' and Children's Gloves-Hoslery and Underw-Ladies Knitted Wool and Silk \" EUect \" Coati - Ladies~' Underdlothing, Blouses, Fuir\u0026, Fur Coats, Boots and Shoes-Waterproots and Ubrls-Men's Dresasg Gowns. Pyjamas, Shirts, Collars, Tien, Haff Rlose, tlmbrellas \u0026 Waterproofs. '.I..!a il e 1y International Mofby Order, payable to THE LOND~ON GLOVE COMPAUT, 1.. P,.t .É c .d. t.4... Mail oetcarefulr euted and desatcbmt lv next .*aame O rders 1 lu ul",
         "CANAD)IAN MAGAZINE ADIVERTISE Oak ey's SILYERSEJHS SOAF Foc dme»Ma Pl\u0026\" EOakey's ENEIT CLOT OO IoFSMeP.,. Dakey's 'IWELLIGTONPP KM1F POUISI a\" femr Ch.mfeg mm PmSkLIe Cedsi, EDakey's \"WELLIGow BUCK1 unA aet fer st««. au . OAKKY18 00008 SOILO IVEYWHKPt JOHN9 OAKEY \u0026 SONS, UÏMITKD W\u0026IMI 11g. t'ou\u0026*. Lue.. SJ. Cet That New Suit You are Thimkiug of-NOW1 of i r h.dat Far n-ý- 1-cunng kil l m \"Rl\" Novy BAlue Serges uur , -d 1.--nwn,d nt EGRO BURETT aamr, anTi o. R. W.SI~TS Wa.m Welnt n Somers, me., -- iij I D OFFICE CAPITAL AUTMORIZED.. CAPITAL PAID UP ... SURPLUS....... HAMILTON $5,000,000 $3,000,000 $3.475,000 BANK DEPARTMENT AT ALL BRANCHES",
         "8 CANADIAN MAGAZINEF ADVERTISER ST. MARGARETS CO.,LLEGE 131L0O1\u0026ST. a.. TOroptoxr. ONt4ARIlo A R.sidentiaI and Day School for Girl Fouuded by the late George Dichuon, M. A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, and Mr§. D\u003eid Ac.demie Course, fro*n Pr.paratory ta University Matriculation and First Year W\u003c Music, Art, Donsit c Science, Physical Education-Cricket, Tennis, Basket E Hockey, Swimming Bath. MRS. GORGE DICI\u003cSON. Wuite for Prepetus MISS J. E. MACDONALD, B.A.. Prlmipal, 4tbamud 2 1 lcs Entrac .. Haad base C. S. Fwoey, Mi.A. MONTREAL EntranceR, val Coil.,C tt 7tb a Mrestmtnstet Col Coronto Bt ERebential \u0026 Wap !5cbQoo Situatd opposite Queas Park, lece Ev\"r educational facilty provided. Pupile",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER j6ranksoile *bat[ 10 Eiam Avenue. Rosedale, Toronto A rSDISTIAL AND DAY SCHOOI. FOR GIRLS flox. PBicit,ÀL Miss Mi. T. 1S.coTT pK.L1cwAu : M , s F ,'l- M. M'BAM. Preparation for the University and for eminations in NMusîc. Art and Dormestic Scence Departmenis. Thoroughly eflicient ataff Large Playgroiands. Outdior game, tennis, basketball, rinik. J-em ithful locahty. Primary School for D)ay Ptipils FOR PR03PECTlUS APPLY TO THS PRINCIPAL CASHBURY COLLEGE RockclUfe Park, - Ottawa RESIDENT SCHOOL FOR BOYS Beautiful rituation. Modern Fire- proo Buldigs.Tenacres play-. ingfieds.R.T. C Entrance 1916 sixcandidates passed. 1Vite for Illusinstd Cdg-ndat. tcy, Q. P. WooIlcomibe, M. A.. Headmaster -31hhrw Vieur - 19m1 S Cblrch lRecsibeuttai E)av !\u003e:cboo[ for O ria New Buildings- -Beautujui, hcalthy situa- tion w»ith 7 acres of' PIaying Rcelds JUNIOR SCHOOL TO MATIICULATON COURSE Household Science Music Painting Presiden The Lord Bishop of Toronto Prinipa Miss Walsh, M.A. (D)ublin) Vike-Prin*cda Mis»Niation, M.A. (Trinity College) hread Mùirm, ju r \u0026ca..L Miss A, M. V. Rouseter \u003cHi g er Certificate Nat- ional Froebel Union), late of Cheltenbaoe Ladies' College. FOR CAI-gtAm APq.v -M T)4. li3t-RNA W4tfuip trdiu ina wu\u003csA Doarding \"School for Boys SeaaeHouses for Senior and Junior Boys. The Schooi Grounds caver 24 acres. Our own water supply. Litrance Seholarsbips open o Young boys. RECIENT SUCCESSCS R. M.C. 1915 3rd and 1 Oth places R. N,Ç. 1915 lust place R.MN. C. 1916 2nd and 13th places R. N.C. 1916 8th place MLLEý No failures in any public exams. in the last three years. T. For Prospectus, etc., apply t0 the Headinaster, A. G. M. MAINWARJNG, M.A.",
         "O CANADL1LN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER OSHA AP NT.A RESIDRNTIAL SCIIOOL 115110? BETHUNE COLLEGE, OSAA N. FOR GIRLS V.t,,TeLord I5ishop ifTor,,rto, Pný\u003eA;tmiOT for tii. Univer.ity and for tiie exanstions of the, Toronto Cous.rvator) iMac Young dxildrn ai\", reviveuL Finectli Otutdoor garni.. and pliyxical train i ' The. Mosuala D.partm(eot (Piano, Theory and li.irmiony) will bc under lie dirrction of a M an~d of a Siste, wo for twhurrstaughtin the Sc1lo-l witii ,arkrd quioe-u b.u illa inareof a q..iuie mistr.ss., COS* E U.OPFNS JANUARY Ith. Pter-sditles s*vb .tb. %IlE IN CHAÈQ, ae. te ME SISTIR3 OF ST. JOHN THE DIVINE. Usjo St.. TflM0. Ot4UFOR Boys rnbi UPRAND LOWEM SCMOO\u003c.S C.m uovus*t Thoffh*lIon~h. LpPbyhiLg41e ExdWt#u18 REV. D BRUCE MACDONALD. MA * LLD. 051.545f 8.550B aupplication HEAMASR Cbe MIargaret Eaton %cbool of Ititerature anc' lEere9slon Verteh 111ret T.w.sta. « - IîMvu. Go.rie Na.1h. Pr.Aio i giInh. French ?bys;cal Cultr, Voire Culture, Interpr.tation. Public Sprkidug. and Drana\u0026i Art. gond for SM*» e tin oveconm iieY u nttitsi me perrnaniefltly re.tore U*Wt5ura z à(,dua7 pupila .voe- re. vie andlittratuze. Ti' ARNoTrT INsTITuTK 5lI. NR, - CANADAI CUIRLY HA' CV WAVC2JL» o-rt eamUsS PERIM LS One pachet sufiScient, however Masties. Oetestimonial sas ,My h.i soo. becmesj wx url.- Reut certain. Price Zs. 9d. S~ 1n7osfifw weekg. Send la.O« onI1 o la. 23.9d acet TUE NEW WAVCIUL O., ai U'ulwooi PlaCe, HlSOr, ILOr'D@N. W.C.. i NDEPEKDENT ORDER 0F FoRESTI f Policies jagued by the Socicty are for the Protect- Fumishes ion of yeur Famnily an can.n\u003et be bought, a\u003cld or Tot piedged. Bene a comploteBenefits are payable to the Beneficiary in case oi s Sysisu of deatb, or to the. rnieber in case of his total disability, or 10 the. memuber on attaining seventy years of age. 4 PoUNdei s Lmd from 5500 to $5000 For fuerthe inforfmation and liteatmire apply to FRl1 J. DÂRCH, Secretai) ELLIOTT G. STEVENSON, President S. H. PIPE, F.AS, AI.A, A Mail CouSesQILý Scimools :: Toronto ,4Wo ffleeee la thee soRe- m«courss la 18llIed t. WuSe fa o aOuecuipve o-kS. W.U. Mow, Prs.,39 YOue Si.TOrOUR 1",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE AU VERT! SER 1 HOME lllPARTMEN r 01F 'TRIE NAVAL SRVICE. Arts Courses only ROYAL NA',I IriLtyAfNAVA, SCHOOL A h-t'. UN IV ERSI TY-L- li xth KCINOSTON, ONTARIO th ~ Jfl~, i. o . RTS EDUCATION MEDICINE Jai.~. 1 epzofent n SCHOOL 0F MINING G.DLSBAKATS, MINING pro.toteNaISro, CHEJUCAL \u003eIKCHANICAL 0(.. j'»f IL. 191(L. CIVIL ELECTRICAL ENGINEERINGUnIoiepu .ko huvrdct 050. Y. C*IOWN, Regfistre,. The RKoyal Military College ,EEare few national institutions of more value aund lnterest to the country thasi the, Ry l Ml'tary College Of Canada. Notulthstanding tis, lus object and work it la accomplishing are flot suafficlently understood by the. general pulico Th Co IseJ a Government institution, designed primarily for the purpose of givtng ýtjtqn ln a.il branches, of military science te cadets and olilcers of the Canadian biUltia, factt corresponde to Woolwlch and Sandhurst. TeCommnandant and rnlîltary instructors are ail officers On the, active list Of the Iniperial My, lent for the. purpose. anld there ls ln addition a complet. staff o! professore for thi. isubjeots wiiich form such an Important part of the College course. Medical attendance WhltteCollege ta organized on a atrlctly mlitary busIs, lhe Cadets receive a prac- IL n ctentific trsining Insubjecta essential te a sound modern education. Tecourse Includes a thorough grounding in Mathematica. Civil Engineering, Surveying. ygcgC!hmJaryFrech ndEngliah. Th titd1zcJP1ne mintained et the College l.a one of the. moisl valuable features of 1 curs, ad.in addition. lhe constant practice of' gynnastics, drill and outdoor exercises \u0026I eins nstures health and excellent physical condition. bammsions lnamil branches of lhe Imperlal service and Canadian Permanent Force are The 1plona0f gaution la considered b\u003e' the. autiioritien conducting the examinatbon the Jand ietyfl\u003e lnao it obtans th an exemnptions at a B.A degree.'Ruatn T*lengtii of thxe course lstreYears. ln three term f monthse aci, Th oa ceaI of tie course, iiicliiding board, uniforni, las rc ornaI material, and a.it Th annua comptitive examinatlon for admission te tie College tskes place ln May of 1 er tte headguarters of the several milutar diatricta. ,Forful rtculars regarding Ibis examîination and for an tolier Information, applica- a uoul Cmade te the Secretar\u003e' of thie Mllitia Councli 1.0tawa. Ont., or te the Con\u003e-",
         "12 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Canadian Publications It la neot ncessary that Canadians to-day abeulti look te forelgn perilicals for their realng materlal, but, unfortunately, moat peu- ple ln this country do net seemn te have falth in the products of Canada, or rather wvill net show it. The Dominion Government is spending large munis ot ineney on thrift, advising the peuple not te spenti their noy recklessly or neeti- lesuly, anti aiso as fur as possible te keep their money in Canadla. Foreign Investments are discouragei\u003e in fact, are llkely te be taxoti. Spendlng money on porlodicals lu net ex- travagance. People naturally want te know what la golng on in the world, anti te get the opinions of men who are in a position toexo- press them. But when those expressions of opinion are publiaheti by the leadini authori- ties in the. Canatilan publications preference shonul bo given te theni. Ther. are theusanda of people in Canada Vue have nover bougiit a Canadian magazine. Wby? Beouse they think Unitedi States wrlt- ers are the boit. Thi. may bu su te a certain extent in the lighter fiction of a kinti, but une has only te pick up ene et the Canadian peiodicala and reati it therouglily, both ar- ticles anti atonies, te see that the firat are at leaBt on a par witb ferelgu publications, andi the atories, havlng a Canadian atmosphere, leave a botter impression un the mid. A Mrat many peuple aise buy a magazine bocause the cuver attracts theni. It is wel to have an attractive cover, but havin highly-colored, splashv,- melodranatie oý leads one to suppose that the contenta a-r a par wlth it. Canadian publications tell yeu and show what Canadians are delng and their wurka just as great and iImportant as are thos any other nationality. If the publication forelgn countries are read, tu the exvlusig our own 'national periodicals, one la ap conclude that the inhabitanta of that eou are a greater and more energetic race our own, when that is most emphatically the case. The close proximity of Canada te the Ut States, andi the distance of both countries 1 the Olti World, Jeaves Canada open t. thi flux of Unitedi States perludicals, whihh 1 a tremendous population te serve, *here.a Canadian publications can oniy serveou people of approxdmately one-fifteenth the 1 ber, consequiently the few Canadian pub tiens are almoat luit amongat the masy lodicals from the other aide, ani Canadj purchasing thafr magazines ghould reie our own Canadian magazines andi mpeity t The next issue of \"The Canadian Mqgu -Yebruary, 1917--complotes the twenty-*u year of continuons publication, mûaing j Canada. We will continue as etoo eau bo secureti for the eoming yULr $2.50 PER ANNUM, including Great Britain, Irelauti and mout SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER BOND DFFERI NGS LEst qi bondi whAkh Ilve ofl« .usni on opocation Every Scarbi pos. -n Mea quaaktle3 essenlial in a sound *namn combinlng SAFETY 0F PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST wilh TUE MOST FA VORA4BLE JNTEREST RETURN. Co@vernmnt - Munlolipai Gorp@ratl@n \u0026nt# P oen Indusstrl\u0026J Don\"\u0026 YI.Sdj 4% to 0% W. sit b. pleased Io ald you in tA. soicha . o desirabIe 1nvai.ment. DoewnS\u0026uimm MMPWORATIO1t-LilmITD -Initantty Friends arc calling or you ha;Ve ;L sudden il n v tti o il jutamoment to look your bet. Il takes but a few seconids to apply Gtouratad's Oriental Crea.m andi obtain a perl'ect conmplexiona \u0026son, clear, pearly-white appriaranctv that in ;tlways -refitnet anci in gooti laste, Non. greamy. The favorite foi- 68 yvars. Seund I Oc for trioi aise Gouraud's Mdicated Soap Thoroughly cleaTiqeq and purific. the xkin, Destroyui poisonous matter, keepa the \u0026kin pure andi heaithy. Ideal for skin troubles. 25c Per' coke ai dealer'i or bvimil Ferd. T. Hopkins \u0026 Son., Montreal \"I1 ShouId Have Taken More \" IAT i. about the oly complaint old PoIicyholders make aginst ti Company. Tb.y dai ey cod hav beeugeo take a largur Policy at the oset., mu of LONDON LIFE POUICIES are mo much better dian the promises ,I ?oflidehrt wish the had a larger ainoupi of suchi maurmnce. i the Company ini wlich ACTUAL PROFIT PAYMENTS EXCEEI) MATES 40 %. Worth while investiating iuiît à. Full information upon requeet. JondR Life Insurance Company HEAD OFFICE : LONDON, CANADA Dr. A. 0, j EFFERY, L.C., VieePrudnt E. E. REID. BA. A.I.A.. Aszt Maner and Actaary. M",
         "L4 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER SULPHOLINE THE FAMOUS LOTION QUICKLT REMOVES SKIN ERUPTIONS, EN- SURING A CLEAR COMPLEXION. Thv sigiitvst Raifainitet Spit, irrit- aablePapI~ diisfigurinýg BI icbes. ob.. ,4tae Eceaduiappear by applying SULPHOLINE which renlders the skin 0pte~ Noft, leavýr surpi, comifionab. O SULPHOLINE HAS REEN THE REMEDY FOR Rrnptions R ouge \"ai. ^Cu\" pmlSip Oapftai - 700,0 Redue,, RaI loc Raer ud iens cei SudwWd roit -;a.,êPeriaai% Scurf S= 8W ndffle u suda Quickly removes the. e*Y.cts of Suasconch EtMi.g from the. Atlýi t te Paâ\u0026.i sBuiUgS D.part.ut at ail \u0026aatcbu. Supha1n iprepared bN the great Shin sp,ýe Dugp.Wta rearived of $1.0 aad upw.rdL ffld i - si., J. IP1P . Coý . LTr'.. Bê,Jford Lak-aw aiIowed ai bt curn raiesn. S. E., and can h. ohtainwd frua amy ci i.and Sto'retrts h t1i. Ww4â. THE ROYAL BAnpà\u0026NK 0 F C À ]%Aà1) Incorporatsd 1*6 Capital Authorizsd - 825,0%00 IeRume Funds a$ 1400,00 Capital Paid Up - 12,900,000 Total Assets - 275,000,000 HEAD OFFICE -s MON@rTEAL DIRECTORSr SIR HERBERT S. HOLT, PriN'dsoS E. L. PEASE, VSoe.Predea E. v.:e. JOHNSTON. K.C,. ud floefrmmg« Jamne. R.dmond G. R. Crow, D. . Elliott H-n W. H. Thoeu. H.Ch Pato. Via, Robetson A, J. 13-rwn, K.C. W. J. Sheppard C. S. W\"oe A. E. tDymet C. E. NrdI M' W, D)avi G, Il. DugKan gxocutIv, Offloars. EL. Pense, Managing Diroctor C. F. NeilI. G-oral Manager W. B. Torrance, Supe itendent of Branches F. J. Shernian, A.si.tant General Na\u0026\"r 8M-RA~HESTHROUCHOUT CANADA-358 Ais. Bra. in Cuba, Pete. Rh», Dooeiaican Repsblic, Costa Rica, Venezuela, Antigua~, Barado, Dminj4 rendiamaca.St. Kitts, Trlatdad and Dabasia Isands, British G'Laa and British Honduras. 1*505O, ENC., I.auk Bl4.,, Princes St.. L C NEW YUq« Corner Viliam andCe\u0026rSts SAVINOS DEPARTMENT BRANC HS",
         "CANAJ)IAN MGZN DETSI May they always be protected frcou anxiety and want by MONTHLY INCOME POLICY KC ELSIOüàkR -%c, LI1F E o»% ..-XCELSIOR LIFE BLDG.,TOIONTO D.-Wr-ite Decpt. L. for pcacruer \"One of the Best\" £NF of the, mont distin- MeNýai Ld. of Canaýda t. b. 0.0 0 tihe boi-t inae d rom- paeloi on the continenit. The. rosait of gond mainago- ment isrodvd s It the boit aumul mani ora mako is to iecuîo. an i udo- mprlt poflcy in t'le Mutu ploy- Abg, to theo assuzed oni matiuity. Itot only doos the. Kutuail eicol in profits, but tii. ternis of lti policezsare most liberal anda iclude .very modern f etore;, a Mu tual Lite poficy in (on, e f tfiio fieit securitios a man \"ai hold. ii\"utalLife of Cnnada Waterloo-Ontario Housekeeping, Accounts We are becoming a elchitqueusîng people. The coflveDjecfl of it en- sures the growthi of the practice. The srnaller things of life- hats, shees, boçiks, grocerles - are now bought frequently by chequc, whcre once only ciirrency passed. In the smnall tradesrnan's wailet the green of yet unlaunderocd banknotes is sprinkled with the tints of clean, xlew cheques. The advantages of a chequet ac- cousnt appeal especially f0 the bouse- wife. It is a first aid in autornatically affording systein, record and reccipt. We have a large nuiber of ladies amiong our depositors, and welcomne the accounts of any who may wish to avail thematilves cf the facilities we afford themn. No arnount is toc srnall or toc large. Canada Permanent Mortgago Corporation Pid.up Capital ..... $6,,000M.00 R..sv. Fusd ,..... 4,750.000.00 Investuete . 33,546,242.74 TORONTO STREIT, TORON\"O ESTABLISUIE les\u0026",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Ouwi RESOLVE that beginning with the Btuf y.ar 1917 you wiII let your bouse- work be made a pleasure. Make this resolve and keep it. Let the elec- tricity in your home help you. Get any (if the many \"Canadian Beauty ' electrical, appliances, The use of electrical appliances will aave you labour; will help you to get through, the %vork sooner. nhe £leropiv we illustrate her. will make i roning ras ier and cleanier. Enough toast, can b.e macle for the fîtmily of six la a few Minutes, a coffe pot can b. kept alrnosi at boilinig point, on the LTPri$th Toaster. The Toaster.Grill wiIl boil, fry , b ro i, and toast. Tie ZTsv-Pa1 SÉôve will be found very eco- nomical for boilinig. frying, etc. [t will give ycaru of service, There are a number ofother useful\"-Canadiant Rteauty' appliances. Find out about thern. Use themn. Miake holistwork easier in the riew year. 'Canad'ien Boauty, Elotrical Applianoos TOAsTEFR.G1 LI. Callin lu t the U R -Caadian He4uty' lwÀ delr** and a.k hlm r \" uwen f\"Cnda MON VPRIGHT TOASTER TWO.P hi.m foýr ou, aao or IrieýM o t Renfrow Eleotrlo Mtg. Co. Mt., fl.frsw, L.ATK STOVI SECURITY When entering into a contract covering a peuiod years, it iimportant that you satisfy yourseif regai i.g te standing of the other part7. The North Ameujean Lif c commands te confier of eveiy man. Sneit nchapti doi aspi r redited to Policyholcicrs or tbeir beneficiuries over $16,500,OC evef, its finauiciul position unexcelled with Assts inForce is outupoken eviclence",
         "The Can\"adn Magazine",
         "Prom the Drawing hy Louiq Raemaekers A ZEPPELIN RAS PASS19D",
         "CANADJAN ?4AQAZNF XLVIII. N\u003e. TORONTO JANUARY. P917 THIE RIGIT 1-i[ONOURÀjlE )AII) 1.1,)j 1)RG M'i'sto of Great Britai- anld tile -vl L;k\u003ecraI M,-b, o\u003c %%a Caie 1H* W IN-TH\u0026W-\\XAK C#5-1INkTlý je/3y11àdd HIE resignatiox of Mr.c Asquith and- the creation of aWar Cabinet of flve p members. under the vir- n tuai dietatorship of Mr. Lloyd George have fol. dramatie suddenness the o 6dl,\u0026à wecupation of Bucharest by the Ger- 'lans and the failure of Allied di- lomnaey in Greece. In war there is io auch word as failure. The coin- tiander in the R9eld and the Goveru- [lent at home must provide victorie. ~r retire. This is the inexorable de-",
         "cree of fate. For two years the con- that Parlianient, wiiicii duct of the war by the. Asquith Cab- lawiusker, lias no contr inet has been iinder the Ishl of vitu- the. making ot war or perative eritieism. The. failure of the. gigantic struggle for Allies to ave te onanin capital, ence bas led, virtually, coupled with the. extraordinary lati- uion of Parliamentar: tude siiown tu the. Greek Royadiuta, Mr. Lloyd George~, as 1 did more lounnd.ruiine the, Asquith Cabinet of five membe Goverament than thie hostile attitude assumes a dictatorship of the. Nortiieliffe press and the. crti- members ut the 'Wa cisms of the Oppohition in Psrbia- ?eers; thr.., as membei ment.. When Mr. Lloyd George de- of Cominons, are rel finitely threw i i lot iil the. Op- necessity of seeking re poitonad diclsted ternis whuii no Tiie conditions brui Peircoiild accept it was apparent the war are the antitig to the. merest lyre i lu tis t a cratie system of goveri erumeut was inevitÀble. Bagehot Goveruments, 11ke armi long ago drew, teto t\u003c\u003e the tact ed ho lie natural tat( 198",
         "MR. ANDREW HONAR LAW Who declined the task of forming a Government but accepted the Office of Chancellor of the Exchequer g for his life. For several »efore the outbreak of war the Parliament and the British had no knowledge of the ex- of a definite understanding a Britain and France which ted the former to active co- on on land and sea in case was attacked. Since the be- of the war Parliament has voice in the conduct of the gn and has existed solely as rument for registering the de- the executive. War has bro- the foundations of the deep stroyed the safe anchorages of traditions. But behind this r autocracy stands democracy when the \"Last Post\".sounds, to asert its rights inherent in the British Constitution and to resume its place as the untramnelled will of organized society in everything that shapes the ends of the nation. The Asquith Coalition is dead, but no one wishes long life to the Lloyd George dietatorship. A speedy issue out of all the dangers of war and the return of normal conditions is the prayer of the British people. To guarantee na- tional safety they have made tremen- dons sacrifices in blood and treasure. But greater than these is the sacrifice made by the suspension of parliamen- tary government, which is the life- blood of British liberty and progress. History will decide between As- quith and Lloyd George. For the",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE MR. ARTHUR HENDERSON 'the Laholir Maember of the War Cabinet present tbe British nation is out to win tiie war and sets littie store on tradition and precedent in its adop- tion of the instrumenta necessarv to achieve decisive vietory. A tremendous r-espouisib)ility rests on the head of the new Governinent. Mr. Lloyd George is a maxi of rare courage and exterprise. For hum the hour of opportunîty and of fate bas struck Fie stands or talla by the marrh ot events durixig the next six months. Hie is the mnaster of his fate. Rie demaxided mucli of thie Asquith Cabinet. 0f him muceli will b. re- quired. Who is this mani and whene camne lie, on whose nod armies and peuples wait for a lead? lI the. tur. moil of the Buer War lie came to liglit ini Britishi polities as the most uneoxuproiising enie of the. war policy of Mr. Joseph Chamberlain To-day lie rides Wo power ou bis own pulicy of \"the. vigorous prusecution ut the war to a triuimphant conclusion\". A son of the peope lie was tie pro- the. epuehal era cf Liberalism tbat elosed with Germany's challenge to armas. In hiim more than iii any other miember of the Liberal party the long- quffering masses found a -Moses Wo leadj tbemn W the gatewýay of the land uf piroisej. Tu tb. B3ritish workixig classes the name uf Lloyd George isý inipenishably assoeiatedi with the greatest social revolution in the bis.- tory of the. British peuple. Ravixig led the peuple to the land ut miii- sud huney lie seetls f ated, like hiii llebrew prototype, Wo lay bis bones ou Mount Pisgali. Tii. new War Cabiniet marks tiie definite sundering of tlur between the Welsii statesman and bis former colleagues. War anid the wiiirligig ut time have brouglit queer changes, but none so strikixig as that wbiehi finde Lloyd George ini a War Cabinet surrounded by his former ad- versaries. Lord Curzon and Lo)rd .Milmer share with the Prime Minister the. eontrol of Britain's war machin. MnI. Bouar Law will b. too busy as leader li the. fouse of Commons t. b. mure thaxi a cyphen in the. couxieils of the. Committe. ot Five. For otb*r sud more \u003cobvious reasons Mn. Arthur Ilenderson, the. Labourite, 'will have",
         "TRE WIN-TIIE-WARt CABINET On- \"f th'-e UnoitMm 'f the, W. ab din-t littie voice ini the directing of the war. Appointed Io placate the La- h~our party, Mr. Arthuir Hlenderson, th.e lay pr:eacher, is iiot IikeIy to set the- Tliames on fixe as a war lord. The reai dietators wiil be the Prime Min. stranid Lords Ctirzon and Milner, Th- Lloyd George Government i8 net at Coalitioni in the strict xneaning of th,- term. lIe lias formed a new Gov- ernment, it is true, but it leaves in the shades of Opposition one of the' two historie parties of the 'State, Mr. loyd George has been able to coi m.and the support of two extremei wlinp.. The union of Labour with Feuldalismn may appear strange to thoeý who dIo not know England. The dividing line between Liberalisin and Toryism iq largely social. The lime of clcavage between the extreme wings i.; economie, not social, for democracy, arepresented by, the working classes, has no social antagoniain toward the ariztocracy such as permeates the mid- die clas front whieh Liheralism so lawgoly springs. The social guif be- tw.sn a lienderson and a Curzon is fixd, impassable. There is no sucli guJf between Asquith and Curzon. The new Gov-eriient is on tial. Lord C'urzon is remembered chIiefly, as the' particular, Viecroy of India 'who left for his suessor a v-eritable sea of probleyis. lie founrd India ini a state Of Unrest and left it in aL condi- tion bordering on openl dîistcontfenl. Uco has boen ueibda, in his own proper person, a whjolc floulse of Lords in the, naking, and b\"\u003eides a ehild of thie hereditsry prinieiple. The son of Baron Scarsdale, lie las taken On fresli tities ill through lhis career - a Býarony (,with speciail remaindet to his daughter), a Viscounty (with special remiainder to his father), and an Barîdoin- and lie lias been elected as Irish RePresentative Peer. In al things is hie thc representative of the classes, rather than of the people. Vi.scount Mfilner is a strong mnan on whom, in the Boer War days, Lloyd George flred broadsides of CeItic fire. le, like Curzon, opposed the Lloyd George Budget of l909-the charter o! democratic freedomin the British Isles. Lord Milner owes bis success mai.nly to his own abilities and indus- try. Hie began life without any ad- vantages of birth or wealth or fam-",
         "THE CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ily influence. His fatiier was a physi- cian wlio iiad settlcd lu Stuittgart, in Olermany, aud to this fact la due the statement, so ofteu repeated by Lord Milner's enemnies, that lie la a Gernian. Ili. mother was a Miss Iteady, the ds.ugliter o! an Englishlimajor-general who was Fit one timre Govemnor o! the Isle of Mlan. Both parents dicd long before youug Alifred Miliuer had eu- tered public life. lie liad neither bro- ther nor sister, and lias, it is said, ne near relative at all, Ljike other distitguished meni, Lord Milner served hie apprenticeahip te statescraft li the sehool o! journal- iun. Thlrty years ago Mr. Stead snd Mmr. Alfred Milner were writiug \"Oc- casional Notes\" for The. Pall MaUl Gazette. lI tiiose daya Mllner waa a long~, thin, apatiietie yolmig mai. Hie affeeted ne sports, suuch as an Ox- ford graduiate miglit aspire te, but was an accomplislied and persistent swinimem. Of the \"copy» M.\\iler used te turu eut Mr, Stead saya it was \"the mxost untidy I have ever liad to deal wlth. Hie sprawled alI over thc paper\". As a mule, Miluer went about his dsily taaka bareiieaded. It la ssid that the only liglit article lie ever wrote fer the xiewspaper was thii a- ginsmy diary e! a number of South Arican savages on a visit te Lonidon. Ilc did it soewdithat many eders ensidered it the work of a savage chie.. Whben Mr. Josephi Chamberlain me-- signed the Colonial Sccretaryship Lord Milmer was askcd to suceed hin; but lie declined, believing tlist his duty at that turne was to remin lin South Afries. Mr. Benar Law reaclied the leader- slip of hi. party as a compromise candidate. «Wiien Balfounr resigued the rivais for the. position were Mr. Walter Hume Long sud Mm. Auisten Chamberlai. I the. end l3ouar biaw was seleeted as the ene more likely te keep the Unlonist party together. As a debater lie has few equals, but lie Isekar the lire and inspiration that miake speeches live iu parliamnentary Iiistory. 11e la the sucsfliron- master lu politics. As leader of the flouse of Commons lie does flot niea- suire up to the requiremnents demnand. ed of thome wlio 1111 this delicate and trying position. HIis lack of tact and imagination are fatal flaws in the. armour of the man wlio essaya te run witli amoothlness tlie imachinery of Qzovernment ini the 11ouse of Coin. mous. Mr. Arthiur Jiender4on is a quiet type of Labour leader who la gifted wýith the. powers of persuiasive Plo- quence. Fie served bis apprentivesip ais a moulder and lias alway s been re- garded as a safe leader of the Labour party lu the flouse and ini thie coun. try. As a representative of the La. bour classes his sele.ctlen wlll go far to simooth the way for tlie new (lov- ernment responisible for tlie maxn- facture of munitions and supplies. On the whole tlie War Cabinet is a leap in tlie dark. If it justifies its existence it wlll live in the. itory o! these stirriug timnes. It is led by a mnu wlio stands midway betweeu the. old party lines. lIe it was wlie de- seribed Germauy as \"the road hag o! Europe\", and wlio now lu the. greateat erlals o! his career elects to surround himsel! witli meni to *iioo lie was !ornierly opposed. Hie a net be tlie maxi for earring hog the termes of peace, but the. country looks te hlm to drive the car o! war. Fie stand in the fuit glare of the limeligiit. He~ assumes office at a time of great diffculty, but lie is secure in the kxiowledge that lu the vigorous prosecutioxi o! thie war t coniclusive vietory he la the. embodi~. ment e! the national mind.",
         "'r-IdE II FAMILY 73y ]Ybde JMacbd/ih ILtustràties :Vy t)OrotKy Skevails was the qummier Nita had no new dress at al, Indl had te stay in tov. Tot par.ticularly because of her elotheg, or laek of 19,~themn--althiouigh a girl ,Ifes like te have plenty of pretty vae-ation things and wear themi as thengli she wouild have had them any- way!--but because ber father and the. girls took their holidays in suc)' a manner that sh. had to stay in town all mlummer and keep the lieuse open for on. or other of themn. A change of air and scene vas not ipiperative in lier case. Her days were caim and leisured; ne prffl of dfaims dragged at her nerves and left th.m torn and trazzled. Se any re- grt the Cthers may have expressed at leaving ber te swelter vas either imulnere-pertuuctery-or speedily vch ili bave a nie, lazy, quiet 15ume',\"they said. \"It ian't as o ve er. leaviug ber auythiug to d-but, thon, she always bas Wbat alie had sbe gave te theni quit. ebeertuliy, sewing for theni snd tskig pride in the goed appearance they mnade ou a smnai expenditure of Moey. 8h. minaaged te get the. girls of tby the. middle ef July and thon turnd lier attention te ber father. - 8mn me te tae. my bine fleats an a extra dozen hooks,» le eau- tioued. \"Ljast year 1 vas only hait supplied, and but fer that 1 vould eertainly have exceeded Barten's catch. Nov, datigbter, are you sure you have remembered evcrythingt» She vent carefully over his kit, packed bis bag and sm, hlm on the. train. Then she flew heome te get test fer Florence, whose holidmys were finisbied and who vas expected en the, five-fltteen. \"Reiudn( me te send Meily a del- lar,» were bier first werds of greeting. -I hiadnIt eneugli for my parleur car. And den't ]et me ferget te give yen the gleves she sent yen. Dear me, Nita,\" abe scelded later, as she vatoli- ed hier sister tidying the bouse, vliob was literally webbed vit)' 1fr. Cet- frel's discarded llshing-tackle, \"if yen had only reminded me about father's fishing-trip, 1 weuld bave taken my holiday a week earlier, se as te give yen a chance te get away- although i bat. going off iu June?» Nita Imughed good-naturedly, «Reniind yen, my dear girl,\" sh. preteated. \"11ev I envy yen the abil- ity te fergeti , Dees the. blessed man tmlk of anythin« else frem the. firet ot M.\\arc)', except hie annual flhhing- trip? Den't we bave a monetenens diet et Archer spinners, silver doec- tors, bine somethings, and the. scarle\u0026, ibis at every mealt\" Flerence teek refuge behind the âne, sterotypedexcuse et the. faiiy.",
         "THE CANAI\u003eIAN MAGAZINE \",You know, I have no0 head for de- tal,» elie said. \"The trivialities uf our daily existence make no imnpres.. slon on mne, wbatever-my thouglits are on larger, broader things. Duubt- lees, my office training. You, 011 the other hand, have nothing else to think about- but wh-at lu the wlsc of diseuse- ing the mratter? If you are eut out of a holiday this summter, you have nu) une te blame but yuuirseel.\" She neyer liad I It ie a bed-rock certalnty that liad Nita Cottrel coin- plalned that she hiad but one pair of hands and feet, the tainily wuuild have told lier that ahe had nu one to blame but herseif. But Nita wes net the coitipliniing kind. She liad a roof over bier head and a celear beneati lier feet. She could have three mieals a day if elle tuuk the trouble to eook themn, and ehe eould ueiualy have something to wear by inaking a new dres, blouse, or lingerie for F'lorence, Maud or Ililda, who then bestowed their old garmente upon lier. She feit that there were many wvorse hardahiips than ehe liad to bear. A great drawback was, however, the lack of nxuxicy in her lean purse. As housekeeper and homemaker, uf course, eue commanded no salary. Therefore sihe would have liked to possess a talent-to be mus- ical like Maud, whu tauglit ini the Mil- ford Censervatory; or clever like Florence, who wae a law etenograplier and could spell legal words of ten syllabces without ever looking theni up in a dictiunary; or dramaticaily inclined like Hilda, who was an elo- cutioniet and was grcatly lu demand at entertaiumexite where the perforni- ene were not paid for their services. She had private classes in physical and voice culture. Even Mr. Cottrel had the artistic teûiperament- lie dabbled in water-colours and f elt tliat he only esoaped belng an R.A. uwing to the ignorance of an unappreciative public. But she had nothing-was nothing. She merely inherited a mind for de- tale from lier mother. Mrs- Cottrel hadl been but a gentle echo to hier bisn- band and daughtce, and it appeared as thougli Nita were almiost an echo ut an echo. So she stayed lu towni ail siummer and enjoyed hierself as onily the girl who stays at homne cati. At a seaside or montain resort elle is a drug on the market, there are dozens uf lier arriving on every' train. She lias to pretend that trivolous thinge1 sucli as mcen and flirtations no longer lutereut lier, and she carnies a volume ut Henry James about. But at homle She is a rara avis, a prize. Thei liglit which alunes front bebind her vine- elad verandali is perbape the only one on the street, and to it flutter ail the. eligibles and ail the younger mnarriedl mien, as moths about a flame. Indeed, the verandah of the girl whe etays in town ail sumnier becomes iniate with chape to whum the drawing- rooin in winter la a total efranger. \"Ni-ta . . . ive wa-hot Ni-ta,7 thiey carroiled, cheerfully sauntering down thc quiet street. Florence looked atter the depart- ing throng with ainazement. SIc Lad not accu so mnany meni during the whole of lier vacation. \"Pour boys,\" elle said. \"Tîcy mnue be bored to death, just sittixig round, withouit M.ýaud's music or 11ilda's read- iuge! If you remindte I wiilbriug home aome new records for the granmo- phone to-morruw.» Thetead uf records, howevcr, Flor- ence burst luto the lionse witlia piece of tlirilling news. \"Frank Tr. Boyer is lu towu,\u003e se. crled. \"Hec has been in the office al imorning.' '\u003cYes?\" returucd Nita, non-commit- taily. Florence loukcd up eharply. «I don't believe you have the least idea-Good heavens, Nita, dou't act like a niember ut the public, childi Don't you know wliu Frank T. Boyer Nita shook lier hcad, removed the napkin front a dieli ut smoking eon and motioned lier sister te be seatedl",
         "I f .. - h",
         "8han to pretend that frivolous things sucb a. men and flirtations noc longer intomet IISr' \"Why, he's the. biggest corporationl lawyer in the United States,\" explain- ed Florence, with a good deal of imn- patience and smre exaggeration. \"He's here to take \u003ctxr case açainht the D. and L.-bnt you wouldn't understand that. The prn ipal tact o mste get into your head stefcth e will b. here to-niglit for dinner.» \"Dinnert\" Nita gsisped. \"But, lswyer i the, United States with Mr. Blake's stenograp'. with two unchaperoned girls. then, the Cottrel's for that mat never been chaperoued;: to quoi «There were sufficient o f thern even the rnost frivolous party aible.» Why» V' he repeated, with irony. «Why not?\" Truth to tell, circumatanees the. occasion somewhat of its 1 Itta1. UàuiC tience. unusual 206",
         "before, and Mrs. Blake, in eomIlpanly with everybody else, was out of town. Indeed, )Ir. Blake, llimself, lied made the suggestion. «Weý want to give hlim a littie relief from 'ahop', MisFlorence,\" Ilie hand said. \"I wonder if you couldn't take 1dm off iy bands for dinner, and the evening- 'Pori my word, I don't kniow what to do with the man.\" -am wondering what I eaui dig upto wear,» the eider sister mused, Nita was woudering wliat she could di upt eat! Like niany another e4naltown\" reaident, she had the ldea that ail New Yorkers live in eafés; and that fish and fleshi, fowl and vegetables are rendered appetiz- ing to theiu only after a complete and tiaorough disguise, that food which la reonzble to the eye or palate la as ofensive as a glass of pure and sparkling-water. Uin fort unately, this %vas largely truc ini Boyer's case.' In imagination she saw himntiredly pieking at a bit of something a la Bordluise, waiting for the Doo-dab champignons which mnight just pos- ulbly mnterest him, oxily to pass it over for a tunny-doodle Destlixig on a hot-. boeuse lettuce leaf and flarlced by' a .g*iort of lemon slices. Quper and iufamiliar dishes to hier, she knew that tliey were old acquaintances of bis,and that asfaras food wenth'le old diseover nothing new under the gun With a panicky feeling she thought over aIl the deserts in lher repetoie-te fancet thinga, the Mot troublesomne things, those whlcli :g s to-day and which misettIe )nto-xnorrow. She disearded tliem j» opeessand beut lier thoughts up- )n uad.What kind o! salad eould lh offer this jaded cosmopolite when le must have grown tired of every ror knwinto cooks-Waldorf, Poub gh, Russan, Ritz-salads made of let- ,eendive, fruit, nieat, vegetable-- merthig, ndeed, except the kitchen Flrnebroke in upon lier. 'r~1i .tAMUjY 207 \"When you are not doing anything else,\" $lie suggested, \"you miglit take a stitchlu imiy whiite silk skirt. 1 meiant Io ask youi to rexuind mie to do it, but orle sems tô hlave so mlany things to think abouit. And just order wliat you want; niake every' thing 11s elaborate as possible, and 1 wvill miakc thef nevessary apologies for our couni- trified Simplllicity 1\" Tliey feUl upon deaf ears, hiowever. Frank T. Boyer, thirty-aeven, blasté, of superior intelligence, a million of arumiion, and a mtain accukitomned io the highcest artificiaulity in everything - people, clothes, food- -fell uiponl Nita's simple dinner with a greed i- ness whicbi embarrassed him. Ile had forgotten there ever were sucli things to vat. F or, instead of trying Wo rival the Broadway chiefs and seleeting the most intricate recipes ini lier cook- book, she liad eliosen the siruplest, the moqt unpretentious. Vegetable soup, redolent o! real, vegetables, and not essence froin a bottie, came first, then a rst of tliis spring's lamib, with that rarest of articles, a well-baked potato, and but- ter sucli as one used Wo get on grand- mnother's farn; peas, freali froin Ilth garden, unspoiled by the insidiolis flavour of tin casing, and a bursting liead o! eauiliflower. So far not a let- tuce leaf, a canued muabhrooni, pa- prika, pimento, or a slice of leon. There was home-miade bread, however, and lots o! sxnooth brown gravy. Rie was flot conscious, somnehow, that Nita got up and ehangod the plates; alie liad a quiet, soothing way of doirag things, and lie was served witli delicious freali asparagus alinost bofore hoe lnew it. This is *here ho made the acquaintance o! Nita'u mnayonnaise-as difforent frein what lie had met before, as a salty tub bath is difforent from the ocean. Hie shanie- Ieualy took two helpings and began te hope that desert wau W o seme fooi pudding lie did not like. But, ne- peaches vere placed before him; not les pêches Melba with whipped cream which will net stand witliout the. 01nlErL, xET,,Nt~ .~",
         "TUIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE friendly SuPPOrt of cornstarcli or gelatine, but plain, Milford peachies, evered with plain unadulterated M.Iil- tord cmain, end accompanied by geod, substantial, old-fashioned ginger- bread I Boyer began to suifer, but feund lie could] not stop). it was a clash be- twren abandon and restraint, and re- straint lost by long odds. lie won- dered hoiw efficient were the Milford minvical mnen, and theuglit fearsiely of going te bed, As a inatter of tact, nothing lisp- penied. Uce retuirncd te Tlake's linen- eevered, wifeless home, slipped into a man-mnade bcd, and slept dreamless- ly, Tliat's the difference between home eooking and the hostile mixtures one pays fer lin lotels. Just before hie drifted fromn that cematese atate whielis halalf-waking and hli-sleeping, into untroubled slumnber, liowever; just hiehie4 thouglits revelved arouind a slip et a girl with fiuished cheeks and pic- turesque ruiffied liait, a sexise et an- noyaxice came to him. Sonie jacka- napes acrees the street was singing as lie got undresaed. Boyer roueed him.9elf sufficiently te lieten for a mo- mient. \"Ni-ta .....W. wa-hwit Ni-ta,\"\u003e the words et the eld song fleated out of the fragraxit niglit Wo hlm. \"Se weuld anyene, old chs.p,\" mut- tered the corporation lawyer. Then lie feUl asleep. The vase agaixiet tlie D). and fi. did net erine off inunediately. axid Boyer ceuld have gone back to New York or its adjacent resorts. He didn't, flieugli; lie seemed te have a goed deal Wo do i Mr. Blake's office, snd lie se- quired the habit of walking home ecd day witli Florence. She certaily was a elever, up-to-date girl. Arrived at the lieuse, lie frequently allewed hlm- self b lie persnaded te stay for luinch or dinner, \"I arn dead Wo all sense et greed or s'hamne,» lie ueed Wo say. \"I can't re- sist-fact ie, 1 am hlf atarved, truly I B3lake gives me a sort et porridge made of coffee grouinds in the niera- ing, and lie amokes uip a perfectly good pieee of bread, then caila it toast, but somichow, that is not awfully sua- taining diet for a mani who has to wvork over the intrieacies of the 1). and Li. Really, Miss Florence, but for your chlarity 1 should have te) turn my back upon M.Nilford.\u003e Florence waved any hint of obliga- tion graeefully aside. \"It's nothing, ablu.ottely uothing- no trouble at a]],\" she said. \"An ex- tra place nt the table and the offer- ing of eut simple fate. As for cia.rity -why, it does me no end of geod to discuss 'shop' with yoii.\" And Nita took this as hier cite to go off and wash the dishes. But by the time Mr. Cettrel and the girls came home, Boyer had learn- ed a thing or two about a kitchen. He discevered that when he snd Flor- ence, trying to hielp, had staeke4 greasy dishes tegether, without finet rinsing them under the tap, Nita wam always twice as long about lier work;, he dispovered that there is a differ- ence between the use of a disli-towel and the clotli one graba to wipe up a puddle of mnilk on the kitelien fleor; lie Iearned liow to dry the big platier witlieut kneeling down on the floor to turn it over, and lie realy kuew where things were kept mnucli better than Florence. \"At the office 1 know whiere to put my biand on everything, fren carton paper to Mr. Blake's gas bil,\" lah boasted. \"But at home-well, it seexas sucl a waste of time for a WO- maxn witli brames te dlutter lier liea4 witli these idiotic details. «Wlat does it matter iohere the esu-opener be longs? Juat like setting a splni mathematician at turning a fr\"z« of ice cream, isn't itr\" Boyer dropped the plate lie wa$ drying. At least, Florence hu l lie dropped it, but Nita woiild hv swern lie tlirew it on the fleor. Any way, it gave him an excuse toore a beautiful set ef 'Worcester for te He did net see mueli of Nita fe",
         "K'1e rThen $dl at oiioe she fekt beraeif CIaiP\u003cý , er, i ver) coee'\u003e others came back. Mfaud returned gtrsted by her labours as musician a smmiii sumuner hotel-utterly stjatd-up to five o'clock in the oenoons! She required breakfast lunch in bcd, something delicate appetizing. Hilda, suffering from exem of artistie temperament, rid it totally impossible to confine ,elf within the bounds of ordinary rig and demanded especial atten- SShe rehearsed Lady Macbeth's p.walklng scene with candie, gore rix aud other «props\"', in the mid- of the night; sud sue did a re- kably good imitation of Rip Van ikle's uap by day. Even Mr. Cot- wss not himseif, declaring things which wore rigbt under hie noie, ,ettiug things which were useleas whien remiembered; making, i brief, only, sueh a nuiisance of himnself as cari the incOnlsiderate mnan who loafs around the house ail day. Each of the girLq found ini Boyer their afflnity, and they fought for himr in the sweetly affectionate way s0 artistically employed by certain types of catty women. C(You must let me have Mr. Bloyer to-night,\u003e Maud would say at dinner. \"T want his advise on somne of the dle Bnssey inusie .. Or Ililda would .aunter iu as dle- sert wa.- being served sud elaim for a discussion on Browning's \"Strafford\". Florence, of course. demanded him most frequently by reason of the in- disputable legai bond existing between them and by right of prior elaim.",
         "THE CANADIAN MýAGAZINE Eyon Mr. Cottrol was not to be out- done by his daughters, bearing the guest off whenever possible for an airing of epinions-his opinions--on Turne?.s upper sky effeets. There seemed no excuse, however, for thrusting a discussion of domes- tic science into this intensified artistie atmosphere. Beside, Nita had littie time toait and talk. There was pick- ling te be dene, and the autun housecleaning loomed uiiead, a bate- ful, mepacing shadow. Evorything began suddonly te grow irksome and diffiuit te her. Nover had the kitchon seemed se hot, the dishos se nuinereus, the nights se short, or the days se long. Several tinies sh. scorched the food, f ergot te remind H-ilda, everslept horséif, and therefore caused her father te miss painting hi. masterpiecee-a late- summer sunriso. Florence found holes in her stoekings, had te mend thon' borself, and was late fer the office. She was f urious. Severally and individuaily they ail exprossod thoinselves in the. unmistakably frank way which algnifled flagrant disap- proval of tfýe youngest meinber of the But evon this failed te reuse Nita te a sense of her sherteomings; ah. feit as though a film had cerne b.- tweon ber and life. Meving about in a duli and dreamy sort of way, she foU a prey te that kind of absorption whlch makes a person jump when spokon te--for the. third time. She would catch horself standing perfect- Iy still, in an attitude of walting, much as one would stand listening te a dlock striking. Only i Nita's case thi. final~ clang nover sounded. She kept foolishly listening-waiting. The case againat the D). and L. was eailed and . . .«W. won,\" said «Ijsually, you take the stand that it was your connection with the flrm whicb carried the day.» IJnprepared with a sufflciently net- tiesome retort, Florence held ber tongue at the moment, but she teck her revenge upon M.%and, who returned shortly afterward froem the Conserva- tory concert. \"Artistically, 1 think, wo xnay con- gratulate ourselves,\" Maud murmur- cd. \"And my own amail sharo ln the litge success i. entirely due te you, dear Mr. Boyer. But fer yeur sug- gestions, 1 amn sure I should have phrased that passage differently.' \"Maud, my blessed chiild,» inter- rupted Florence, «don't fait inte thge habit of taking your strumming to seriously. 'What difference could it inake te the wvhele concert wbethr you put a cemnma or an exclamation peint after a bar ? Music la one of those vague, indefinite things wbieb does not depend upeiu any degree of accuracy. Net much like the mgt iaw, i. it, Mr. Boyert\" sh. mie brilliantly. Nita came quietly out te the. veran- dah carrying a tray with coffee and mocha cake-Boyer's favourito. 8h. sensed the. strained atmosphere gt once and flushed with embraset \"I'm se borry you and Fie euldn' have hoard Maudie play to-nigh4l\" sh. said easily. \u003c'Reaily, deargil they have put yen on theCosra tory staff.\" 8h. handod the Onrt cup te Flr ence. «There, *you'll feel botter fer ht Fie. 1 always hate tii... days we a long case is being tried. Smý oxhausting for one whe werks as on scientlously as yen do, dear, Iant i a shame, Mr. Boyer, tbat women r yeu,",
         "THE MIND 0F TUE F'AMILY Florence nibbled the icing on her cake and thouglit how shabby Nita Iooked ini that awful old blue dlimity. 8h. decided that se could spare one of ber serge skirts--perhaps. \"Two lumps and no cr*u?\u003e Nita turned te Boyer. H-er pretty matter-of-factness was buIimfullv restful after the, sharp, would-be cleverness of the. other girls. 8h. waa not the, sort of creature who would absent-mindedly sew a pajama button on an evening shirt or give one cemm and no sugar if one liked coffee the. other way. He murmured bis tbanks as h. took the eup from ber, and she noticed that bis baud sbook, but 3e could net see the. expression in bis ey.s. Then feeling that thi. girls were mollified, that ber im.ediate work wo accomplished, se. left tbem, snd, 11k. Ciderella, went slowly back to the. kiteben. 8h. stood ini the. middle of the. floor, her physical eye on the. pot cf pickles ail ready for to-morrow's boiling. Reav.n knows wbat she was tliinking, but suddenly tbat physical eye filled wlth sealding tears wbicii rolled down ber cèb.ek in a hiot lin, and splashed oni the. faded old lua. dimity. The kitohen door behind ber open- \u0026d Nlta strangled asob and bitlier lip bad.She did flot tarn. Then a t once se feit berseif clasped vemy, very elose,- a beloved face press- ed bgis ers; the. trembling of ber mout wasstopped. S'he was i Boy- 4's onions,» se muttered irra- ti *aly moment later, wiping lier \"JIfs dew-laden rose leaves,» lie contadieedagain kissing ber lips It w as tbree weeks later. 'Kita qat a long time by the window iber tluy, bot room under the. caves, loin into a sappbire, silver-span- gle sky. She waa too utterly tired te i sepad ber over-worked brain buz- zed and wbirred 11k. a tiglitly-wound gnin suddenly released. UIad, she reminded everybody of everthing-hler father to get b is; clothes pressed, Mlaud to buy seven more, silver buigles, Florence te wash ber hair, Hilda- -welI, se made a list of the. things Ililda must b. remindpdl te do, and she put it soinewliere... somewiiere .. . Ilad se seen te everytbing about thé, bouse, lier own hurried trousseau I Would Mns. Ro- berteoni remember to bring over the. extra china wvitiout b.ing rexninded again?1 8h. flung hiersei1f aerosa ber little cet sud thouglit witb almoot byster- ical joy of tiie morrow. «When I leave home,\" ah. sald te lierseif, tryiug te blink back the. tears sud queil the. unusual rebellien whicb would rise in ber iieart, '\u003cI won't have to remind anybody of anytbing ever againi» Then a ludicrous tbougbt popped into ber iiead. Hlarry Grabam had said lie married te b. emancipated f rom dram-sticks--be was the young- est of a large fazily-but Nita Cet- trel will be married soas to bemanci pated from remiuding! Tii. wedding day dlawned cload- lessand briglit. But even liappiness could not crase from Nita's appear- ance the, marks left by fatigue and a rackiug beadache. 8h. dragged iierself listlessly about sud muperi- tended everytiig fiom the. decor- atiug to the. culinary arrangements. \"Ougit, yen. te have reminded Dick te bring ii. wedding ring?» asked Florence, as thougii pleased witii her- self for remembering such su uuim- portant trifie \" Tii, ceremony passed off witbout a hitcii. Nita had not remembered te remind Nita that the bride should eut the. cake, sud Florence usurped that privilege berself, but everyone se- eepted it as a joke, se wliat did it matter?1 Sh. dressed in her simple costume mechanieally, feeling as one does. iu a horrible dream wben on. sudd.nly flids oneseif abroadl witb insufficient elothes ou. Had ah, put ou ber petti-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE coat outside her skirt, or was she wearing an apron instead of a blouse? \"A-rn 1 ail rightt\" she asked desper- altely trying to prod her mind into ant uprighit position. And the girls looked nt her vareless1y and said, \"Oh1, yes, you'11 d10.\" 8h, flung hier bouquet into the. sea of faces belowv lier, imipressed with the. grotesque f aet that. they Iooked 11ke a Mlur of vari-Rhaped teeth; se feit Býoyer'*s armn about ber as se duvked and rait for the. taxi. Sorne- thing stung lier fac(e and dribbled voldly down ber haek. \"fThe dasqhed fools,\" her husband muttered, shaking the, rice from his vlothes. The. trip iii the train, the jerky drive through New York's crowd.d streete at dusk, even dinner at the hotel, made no impression upon Nita. There, is to thus day a hiatus in lier mmid. Tt was fliot until later tha. Riltering through the fog of hier num1-ab ed senses, Boyer's word. meant any- thing to her. \"Ail tired out,\" lie said Symipa- theticall 'y, sitting dowu on a cornfy davenport beside lier. \"Well, wellt just have a great oid rest at the sea. you and I--won't do a thing but sit around. . . . Oh. hy the way, deaeet\" h broke off suddenly. «1pleaise don't forget to remind mue to get new razor blades to-rnorrow. 1 can't remember these thmngs, so you'1t have to b. the. mid of this familyr\" 'THE HOUSE IS STILL\" By P. M. AcUONALI), TEE1ý house rang through with noisy joys From tender dawn tili gentie night; Tii. floors were littered o'er witit toys And armies waging mimie fight. There was no roomi where riot died; The, dust could find no place to sieep; Tl'ie stairs were hie toboggan ulide- Down b. careened with elamorous sweep. Butt with the darkness came hie rest, And, when w. stole to see our boy, W. kissed bis bande uipon hie breast, And eaid, \"In sleep bc can't annoy\". Now in the. churchtyard's kindly clay Hisecurie are wet with autumn's raîn, While we are pining for his play, Witb mingied memtories that pain. A\\nd ail the. bouse is still, too still; Niglit ie like day and day like night- Oh!i eouid b.e but return and 1111 Its placid gloom with stir and Iighit, No aged bebaviour woùld w. ask; No studied silence deep and wise; With tbankful heart i every task, Our way would wend 'neath rapturous skies.",
         "OCTOBER DAY From tbe Painting by Borner Wation, R.C.A. One et the Caradian Exhibits .,t the Canadian National 1-Exhibition",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "PIN if .1R9 1. -MARIE ANN LAJIMONIERE: SETTrLER AND IIOMEMAKER ONSCIOUSLY or uinoon- sciouisly, the pioneer la a path-finder, diseover- ing the way for other lu people to walk in, or a soldier, preparing the rod for the marching of an arîny. The word rings grandi *y in our Canadian ears. If la a synonyrn for r o ii r a g e, resouiree, perse vrance, brlngving to Mmnd one picture after aniotherr of mren of fine, simple, liera ic mintuld, doing and] daring and build- ing better than they knew. larnd thre word la no less full of im- port as apphied to women-to Cana- dial womnen, thousands of whorn, trading divergent pathas, bridging al] marner of diffliulties. strugglinig for- ward to different goals, have prepared for uis of to-day-anid are preparing for thre arrny of those who corne after -oew 1righways to the worthy ends of 'if. This series of papers will del wlth the w\u003eork of a few distinguilhed Cana- dian womnen, chosen almost nt randoi frm thre number who ini somne way or other may claimi rank as pioneers. Fis on our lis la the narne of Marie Anne Lajimonière, a pioneer lu ie. oes in whicli the word is per- hap rnst frequently used. Sire has leen described as \"the flrst, Canadiani wvoman lu the Northwest\". aind hier story, trarislated frorn the Fýrench of M. i'Ab~ G.Dugalst,wapbisd in 1901, by tire Hlistorical and Scien- tille $-oeiety of Mfanitoba, Thiougih written in a someiwhat dry. mnatter-of- fart fashion, it contains al] the ele- monts of a wild romnance. The narrative begins,. when its hero- hue, 'Marie Anne Gaboury, w-as a pretty youg oman o! tweruty-five. Rler skin,. we are told, was very white and hier features regular; lier charac- ter we are left o mnake ont for our- selves. At this tlime sire irad been living for eleven yeara lu tire quiet bouse of the village priest of Maski- nonige, but the suceeeding eleven yeara of lier life wvere full to over- flo-wing with jo 'y and sorrow, change and adventure, privation and danger. In the winter of 1807 tire villagera were stirred to unaceustomcid excite- nient by the return o! one of their number, Jean-Baptiste Lajimnonière. wiro had travelled almnost, as it seein- e4, to another world-tie far Northr- west-and liad seen and done won- ders since lie had left Maskinonge, five years earlier, 0f course, lie w\"a feted and ruade miucl of, and at Borne of the gatirerings in iris honour Marie",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAG1AZINE Anne obtainevd perimssion to be, pres- ont. The resuit wvas that 8hep lest, lier beart Wo the bold voyaigeur. It mnay- lie that, like D)esdlerilona, she lovfed bim for tlie dangers lie had passed, and lie \"Lov'd ber thait .1uo didi pity te\" At any rate, tlie restiess fcllow i bis brief vis;it horne wooed and won and weddled bier. But here rnmes in the tragedy of ber life. The girl thouglit ber bride- groomi meant te settle down after bis wmnderings-to farmn ini bis native place. But wbether or flot tbe de- ception was intentional, the eall of the wild proved stronger than the entreaties of his bride, and net many ditys after the wedding, Marie Aune lad to eboose between giving up ber busband te go back alone to tbe wil- derness or bidding farewell to lier kitli and kin and lier old quiet borne. She made the eboice that perliaps most truc woanen would bave made, and a tow days later set eut for wliat iras thon a very far country, tbougli sbe lived long enougli W see the union e! the whole vast land ini one Dominion. Poubtless ini the heur of parting Mýarie beld fast te tbeughts o! a hiap- py meeting withliber own people at somoe future time, for she was yonng and surely courageous. But tliese bopes, if she cherished thein, wre doomed te digappointmnent. She lived sovenity years longer, te the extreme old age of ninety-six, witliout ever even «bearing e! tlie relations, whom sbe liad left in Canada\"'. The next chapter o! lier life opens witli thie tire months' journey Wo the Red River. At Laechine, Lajimonière took passage for himself and bis irife -the only iroman o! tlie party-in one o! a brigade of great canoes bouind fer the trading forts of the nortli. Each of these vessels had aerew of eigliteen men and iras se beavy that it required ciglit men Wo carry it at the numorons portages. Now began for Marie Amie the ex- perience of sleeping out on the bare grouind bceneatli the stars, whilst twice during the, voyage on Lake 'Superior the travellers were overtaken by vio-. lent teimpeits. Several of the canoes wvre lost, but thiat whivh bore the white wornani and lier husband eseap.. ed, and in dlue tirnie they reached Lake 'Winnipeg and paddled up the Red River Wo Pemnbina. liajimonière, during bis previous sojouru in the wilderness, had takex) an Indian wife. This woman was liv. ing near Pembina and, thougli she had been deserted for a year befor. the hunter left for his old home i the est, alie was naturally jealous of the wornan hoe bad breuglit hack with, him. Plotting vengeance, she pro- tended great fricndliness te lier inno- cent rival, but another squaw Wo whomn she liad confided lier intention of poi. soning -Madame Lajominière, warne4 the hunter, who carried lier off out of dlanger for a wliile. Soon, however, lie judged it safe to return Wo the fort at Pemnbina, and there was boru Marie Ann's first cbuld, a daugliter. This infant was not flve monthas old, when ber roving fathey determined Wo make a journey up thE Saskatchiewan, with three otherCae dian traders and their lndian ie 0f course, his wife had Wo go afo She followed the Indian fashion 0 packing lier baby iii a moss..baan as the canees were sa a fre Wo be content with the smailest pS sible supply ef provisions and eca saries\". Tliey spent weeks on the y hunting and fishing as they we»t. Reaching Fort CJumberland. ai Annei found that lier faine bad rie led before ber, and the Indians, b lieving that the wonderful white W man could kill tliem by a glance, deavoured Wo gain bier f avour wt presents and long speches. \"Have rnercy on us, We oiily i Wo look at you,» tliey cried. After a brie! rest the party p» ed on, but one of the liunters W blinded and borribly mangled b bear, and for the remainder ofth weary journey, Marie Anne a 1",
         "PIONEER CANADIAN WOMEN_, rare for this poor unfortutiate as well as bier baby. Summier hati ended when theyv reaehed the Fort of thie P'rairies, where Edmnonton now ,tands. At this post Mfarie spent four successive win- ten, whilst hier husbandi went off on his liunting expeditionsý. In the sum- mer abef liseti oftenl to acvomlpanly huml, anti once.,lwien abe and the indian wlfc of one of hier butsband's comnrades were alone in a tent on the prairie, they were surroundeti by ai flerce- loolkiugl bandi of res. The white womanl 'suffe-red notinig worse than a terrible friglit, but on the following day, Lujomninière starteti witb lier for the fort. Sîhe rode with a bag of provisionls hiung to ber sadeon oe side, snd on the other lier littIc child in her moqs-bag. Suddenly a hcrd of bufflees erossed thieir path, andi the horse, autoeito the àhase. starteti madly in pursuit. M.arie wa, in terrer lest hie should coine up with the berd andi ele andi lier chilti b. trampled to death, but in vain she tried te check bim. She coulti only eling te bis mne with ail lier.strengthi t.il jean-Baptiste eontrived to eut oeram the runaway's path and stop him. A few hours later lier second child wss boru in a camp on the This child, a pretty little fellow wlth bine eyes and fair hair, was much admired by the Indians. A ~Blackfoot squaw ahnost sucecded ini steling hlm, and an Assiniboine ècief wlshed to buy hum for two hoe and a ehilti of his own. it was mot witliout reason that his mother feareti the Iridiaus, for in 1809l the Cree wivea and ehiltiren of Lajemxnière's associates were mas- aacred by the Sarcees, and Marie ÂAnne anti her husband only saveti tfemelves by a ruse andi ffight. In 1811 rumnours reacliet the Fort of the Prairies eoncerning Lord Sel- kirks initention te found a eolony on th %ed River, and Lajimonière, pro- poigat last te settie down, set eut eawarda with his fainily. Possibly the lonely Canadiati womlan dreati dreams of a peacefuýlj homle and con-1 genial frientis mfter lier toiIom wa- derings. Buit littie peacev or comifort was to be bers for many a long year to cornle. The family now hand to share the troubles andi disasters that beeithe Selkirk colony, wvhilst trying te inake gooti its footing in M1aitfoba, Secnt ont uinder thie auispices of tbe, lIud- son's BaY Companyv, the settiers were met by the bitter bostility of the rival Northi-Wist Company. Laji ixonière, an independent trader, took sides wvitb the Hudison'?s %ay Company, anti in the autuitin of 1815, four years after bis return te tbie lied River, lie undertook thie perilous commission of earrying al letter fromn the Governer of Fort Douglas to Lord Sýelkirk ini .Montrea9l. Ile made the ouitward journey 's afely, but returninig was eaptured b *y the- Nor'-Westers and was lielti prisoner at Fort William tili released by al force of arimi men, sent by Selkirk te preteet hie volony. ])uring tbree of these stormy yeara, Mai-it ieiwith lier chiltiren (now four in numbe)r) in a liut on the batiks of tbe Assiniboine, ai dozen iile1fs from the nearest neviglbour. With diffieulty Lajiixuoniere support- cd thein by hunirting, and the liut was. a wretcbed one, witliout either door or, window. Before his journey te Montreal, lie teok hie wife and lier li*tt]le one-, te Fort Douglas, but dur-. ing lis absence Governor Semipie and senie twenty o! bis mien w-ere killet in an eneounter wvitli the Nor'-Westers, andi Madame Lajimonière liat to fly from Fort Douglas (whieh was speeti- ly surrendereti by the settiers) to take refuge witli a friendly Indian. Her next abede was a deserteti but, ,and here lier husbanti, whom se liad mourned fer meonths as deati, founti ber, miaking a brave figlit te keep alive ber bieipleas chultiren, of whenî the eldest was not yet ten years old. Wlieu Selkirk visiteti the colony, lie gave Lajimonière a grant ef landi on the Red River, opposite Point Deug-",
         "THE CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE las, which, in 1882, was sold by oue of bis sens for $100,OOO. But here Marie Aune spent ber first winter iu a hale iu the ground, covered witb thatch, Néxt summner, however, wheu twa Romian Catholie missionaries arrived, she was able teo ffer them hospitality iu a real house, built of logs. She was delighted te sec the good fathers, in whose work she assistcd to thé utmaast of ber power. A fewv days after their arrivai, they baptized about a hundred little Indians aud haif-breede, who were under six years of age (as weil as tbe two yotingest Liajirnonières) ; and Marie Anne, «be- ing the only Christian womau in the colony, stood godmnother to them ail\". At asat life seemed ta be brighteu- ing for this muech-tried womn. It was a grent joy to take part again iu the services o! ber beloved church and ta dwell lu a settled home. It was net a amatil tbiug ta have a little civil- ized f ond ta supplement the \"wild meat\" on which she had lived for twelve years, neyer tasting bread. By seinie means Lajimonière had hecome posscd of one of the four cows thien lu the Red River country, and his wife and ebildren cleared a amall piee of ground. But their troubles were not over. For several successlive years grass- happers destrayed the settlers' crops, another season a plague of mice de- vastated the fields, aud seed grain be- came hard~ ta obtain. But 1824 anid 1825 were jayous years of abundarit harvests. Then in 1826 came the historie flood, when thec Red River rose high abave its banks, inuudated league, of that flat country aud swept everything the people owned int. Liake W\\ýininipeg. Lajimonière's little bousew went down with the reet, and hie and bis family were very nearly starved, ou the patch of higher ground where tbey had taken refuge, befare the cruel flood subsided. s wife wished then ta returu ta Can- ada, but Lajlimonière, stili determiu,. ed ta remiain, speedily built a nev bouse; aud se it came about that Marie Aune livcd for aver fifty yer longer in the Red River country, spending bier last days iii the lieuse of her son, Benjamin, youingest of the children whom she hiad brougbit under such extraordiniary trialsan difficulties. The ziext sketch of tUis scrie. will trnt of the. 11f. and work ai Dr. Emiily Ho Jeurings Stowe, the. fiast Canadia woman doctor of medicine. 1Y11.ý",
         "RE- VK'eW LITWKÀKeY H 1STORY e G CÀN A DA .iogaj\\ gSSAY Ili.-THE SECOND RENAISSANCE 0F CANADIAN NATIVISTIC POETRY N another occaïsion iu The Cnda~Mgan 1 notcd the decade be- tween 1903 and 1913 respectively the year la which saw the close of the Firat Renaissance of Canadian poetry with the publication of Paul- ieJohnson's \"Canadian Born\"', and the year following the publication of R. W. 4ervice's volume of verse, eni- titIe.d '\u003cRhymes of a Rolling Stone\"\u003e, whieh marked the end of the vogue of what 1 have called \"The Vaude- ville Sèhool of Canadian Poetry\u003e', as a period of vulgarity, and even of obscenity, iu the ustivistie verse of the Dominion, 1 was, however, care- iul to observe that there was during that decade considerable pure poetry wr.ught by sucli singers as Arthur BStringer, Peter McArthur, Alan Sul- ivan, Archibald Sullivan, Albert E. S. 8ytbe, -W. T. Ailison, Albert D. Wt.,J. W. Garvin, James B3. Dot. lard, Ar\u003cchibaIld MýacMedia», J. Edgar MidletnWilliam E. 'Marshxall, Erie Jngbel Ecelestone MacKay, J ean Blewett, Jean Graham, Virus 'Sheard, Helea Coleman, «Katherine Hale» (Mrs. Garvin), \"ichard Scarce» (Mýrs. Williamnson), Mrjorie Pick- thail (who 15si 'U gce8ris), and by other singera gifted with the vision of beauty, obedieut to the oesthetic concieceand devoted to the en- visagemient. of artistie ideals lu ail theY wrote. These devout servants of the M[use E~uterpe were suceeusors of the Robertalan group of poets, net mnere imitators; sud had it net been for their saving grace, the decade o! the vaudevillisu vogue lu Canadian poetry would have witnessed a deluge of vulgarity, sud Canadian nativistic verse would have become an abomina- tion. After the deluge of the vaudevillian verse, which lias ended, a Second Renaissance of Canadis» poetry was inevitable, and it is alresdy upon us. I reeiall that I had prognostieated this new movement wheu I reviewed the flrst volume o! Lloyd Roberts's verse, \"Eugland Overseas», lu 1914, lu The Montreal Hrald and TeZegraph. Sil- ence lu the matter on the part, o! other Cânadian literary crities led me te believe that no eue else saw sigus o! a seeond renaissance o! Cana- dia» nativiatic poetry, even though Mr. Newton MacTavish, ini has review o! Beberts's volume, eailed attention 53pg J.L",
         "TITE CANADIAN MAGAZINE te thc tact ot my progn osti cation. But I amn ne longer alone in miy view. No leas important Canadian man ot letters than Mr. Peter MeArthur de- elares The Otob)e, Torento, February 6th, 1916, that lic is \"juest about con- vineed that we are cnjoyinig a re- awal\u003cening et the poetic spirit, which mnay give us new sengs and new ideals for the days ot trial that are threaten- ing. The signe ail indirate that a lit- erary revival fin Canada] is new in progresa'\u003e. In this reterence Mr. 'Mc- Arthur inentions the naines ot seh Caniadian poets as Robert Norwood, Jamnes B. Dollard, Arthuxr Phelpsasnd Arthur S. Bourinot; and because lis finds the verse of these, and other later Canadian poets reprinted in Ameni- cati newspglapers and periodicals and freqiently runs across \"enthusiasts\" in Canada who take hlm aside and repeat te humi the verses ot these peets, Mn. MeAnthur regards these two tacts as \"sure signs\" et a genuine renais- sance in contemporary Canadian poetry. As thc Finit Renaissance ot Cana-. dian peetry bad ita enigin and in- spiration iu Nova Seotia, so, the Sec- ond Renaissance was initiated by men and wemen who, in general, are na- tives et Neva Scotia and the uister Maritime Provinces and who, iu par- ticulan, have been born or educated or poetically inspired, or all three, lu Nova Scotia. Others belonging te the sanie group and meovemenit are natives et Ontario and et the Prairie Pro-. vinces. The most significant peets snd poetesses contributing tethis Sec- ond Renaissance of Canadian nativis- tic and national poetry are Eric Mac- kay Yeoman (deceased), Lloyd Ro- berts, Robent 'W. ljnderwood, Alex- anden Louis F'raser, W. A. Creelman, Charles F. Crandail, William E. Mar- shiall, Lucy M. Montgomery, Clare Gimui, Rugli John Maelean, Arthur L. Phelps, Bernard F. Trotter, Au- drew Rae Macdonald, Norah M. Hol- land, Laura E. McCully, Andrew Doane Merkel, Carroll C. AikiDB, Mary Corneil and Arthur S. Bouri- not. Fromt the points of view o\u003ef quantity of verse and of systematie publication, the movement is some- what tentative or flot yet positive and strong. Only a few of the toregoing poets have publishied even their first volume ot verse. But thougli se far they miay not, as a greup, have con- trihuited anything substantially im- portant te the great sumn ef Canadia, niatîvistie poetry, they all bave en- gaged themeelves to envisage pure beauty in their themes and te b. loyal te ideals if fine artistry and craftamnship in whatsoever th.y write. Tt is not te he expected that the peets and peetesses ot the Second Renaissance ef Canadian nativistie verse will be able te contribute by way of new themes anything original te the corpus ot the poetry ot the Do- minion. Like their predeecessors, thqy have Canadian external nature, hi% tory and achievement, and Canadian ideals, institutions, and civilizatii fer peetie inspiration and treatmn but these themes have largely baen pre-empted by the Robertsian ru and their imniediate successors.Th new group of poets and paeee then, were, and will be, left free.ý choose strictly nativistic or natoa themes, or un-Canadian themes,an te devote theniselves te criginality o invention, or conception, or teehlm artistryr-to imaginative vision,in carnation of spiritual essences,an pure beauty ot imagery, verbal elu and music. And se we flnd il.Th eoets and peetesses ot the Scn ers and natnre-uiusicians, orlrit et love, or singers et \"the. noble lv ing and the noble dead\". By accident et death snd .aIso0 x\u003eost-humous publication of hisea et triE it is",
         "RE-VEWSOF THE L1TERARY HISTORY 0F CANADA -221 tbat Yeoman wouild hanve puibuished either before or synvlhronouislyv with evieslast book of verse (1912) a considerable volume of auithentie poetry. and thuls have beel Ille genui- ine initiator of the SeodReniiis- sance of Canadian nativistir poetry. Buit as rate has herde iimi that distincvtion, 1 tnust give tlle hionour of initiating, at least ehroniologieally, Ille new rovemnelt to anothfler. 1 ean- not, howpver, pass wvlitot briefly vsig- nellizinig soine of thie qualitieýs of Eric Maeka 'N Yeomian's poetry' . The de- rramed port was horn at N(%ecastle, New Bruinswick, iin 1885, and] was edueiated1 at 11alifax, Nova Sc,(otiai, and Dalboilsie UJniversity. After gradu- ating froim college, lie enteredf the fie]d of jouirnali.smY in that city. Ile died of brain fever in 1909. 'Lu the brief tUrnc that Yeýomanii devotedl imiself to literary work, he produced, as Mr. Maen(T.ivishi saya, \"poetry of a uni- formly lofty character and pure lyric beauty'-tinged, let mne add, with a sort ef Kvltie meplanehioly or regret for the periahablenesa of il the love- ]y things of earth and life. Hie \"Rossuec\", a sonnet sequence, la full of be-auty and contains miany arret. ivig linos. Beauteous, tee, are suich peems of bis as \"To a Violet\", \"Au-. tumu\", and \"Sing Low, Wild Bird\u003e'. I ean give a suggestion of bis lyrie 9uality snd of the note of rnelancholy in bis verse by quotîng Yeoman's two- talza poem, \"\u003cThe Sweetest Things are First te Die\": d-4Oa. morn in meditative mood I wadered where the flowers grew, And fouisd beulde the green wildwood The fnireot flower I ever knew, ,N'ext uiern 'twa8 dead. 'Ah. mret' y id 1. iThe sweetemt things are Jirst to die'.\" 0I b. hd a love; gold was her bair, Her eyee were blue as Fummner aies. se. showed me jywas everywhere- Tagtme Time'a wings dropped melo- But she la dead. 'Ah, me!' I cry, $,M s5weetoes things are first to die'.?) Little, We may suppose, dld the yugsinger of that sweetly sad lyric reliz that Ill waa, te use that most expressive Giielic tern, \"keenriing\" hie own passing; for hie went the way te theP vate of Avalon barely atfter rcaci(h- ing mnheliod and thie frtexpression of bis poPtie genilns. 'We his eiders, Who wiatedt bis cominig and waited for the glory that waks net to be, eaun now onfly write lis epitaphi: - Vir opli- miae ipi-aman oif the( fineat promn- ise;ý but, alais. promise, given noe hance by Fate te fullfil itsel!. The ih onour of giving relty f not a cmutive inpetis, Io *the Seconld Mena iîaance of Canianiift poe vt rY seemai te belong te Mr. 'loy d Roberts, whio, earlyN in 1914, puiblish- edl a vollme of deetbeverse en- tied, Egln Overseas\". Mr. Re-. borts is the son of Mr, Cllones G. 1). Roberts; alid thioughz borl ait Fred- enicton, New Bruniswick, wais rae and edctd duing Ilhe years in whieh his father wais prof essor of literatuire and creative mian of letters at Klnig's College, Wiindsor, Nova Scotia. Aside froin the imere tomi- porary place, of bis birth -for the place was a mnero doinestic ineident- the yolunger Roberta la esontially a Nova Svetiain, and lad bis peetie geiis forned, his eye for colour and the beauties and the mualei ef nature developed lu bis Nova Srotia homne and environinent. No doubt, lie in- hierited the bias fo poetry fromn bis father, and ne doulit learned the prin- ciplea of fine technical artistry trom, hlm, but, as a matter of tact, ln bils publlshed verse, yotung Roberts shows quialities--love of sprightly nature and the gitt of a singularly lyrieal lilt-tbat are nearer the verse o! bis father's cousin, the inimitable lyrist of the seasons, the vagromi beart, and the open road, Blias Carman. In bis firat volume, the younger Roberts is an enchanting lover ot nature, a vivid colourist, and a meut melodious verbal musielan. lu this volume, nature la, in bis own phrase, \"the star\"ý-aways the theme and lu the foregrouxid. In a reeut letter te me bc atates that in bis next volume et verse, now lu pre- paration, hll bas changed bis \"pagan",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE penchant for a more, as it were, Christian or spiritual attitude\", and will use nature only as a background to his imaginative and musical verses. The. youinger Roberts, however, is, as I have said, a brilliant nature-paint- er and a winning verbal melodiat. I quote an examp1e; THE SCARLUT TRAILS Cdmsnon and gold in tii, palinig sky; Tiie rarrpikes black wiicre tiey towerion And w, ollow the, trails in the eaýrlyçldawn Tiirough tho glades wiiere the white frestm lie. D)Own whcrA tiie flainprg maples ineet; Wlwro tii. laves fir, blood bofujre our feet, W. f.ol1ow tii. lure of tiie twisting paths Whld.e tiie air tristes thin and.s~t Leggiixls fsd jackets are dreniched with dew; Tii. long thin barrels nre vold and 1111e; But tii. g ow of the Atitumn burns in Our Veilus, And tlii e. aud hainds aire truc. Where tiie sun drifts cloewn frein overiiead (Tanglcd gleamis in the searlet bed), Rush of wings through tii. foreut alle- And thecléaves are a brighter red. Loud drami the, cocka in the, thickets nigh; Gray i. the umol:, whcre the ruffed grouse die, There 's blackened shefl in the trampled fera Whe.u the white moon swims the sky. The ncxt important poet of the Second Renaissance is Robert W. Nor- wood, an Anglican clergyman, rector of Cronyn Meinorial Chureh, liondon, Ontario. Mr. Norwood is a Nova (Sco- tian by nativity and education, bav- ing be'en born at New Ross, Lunen- burg, Nova Scotia, and edueated at several Canadian unîversities, includ- ing King's College, Windsor, Nova Scotia, where he came under the. in- tellectuai and iethetie influence of Mr. Charles G. D. Roberts. Like the youxiger Roberts. Mr. Norwood is an exquste colomist and musician; but he iigeneri as a singer of spirit ual love. It 18 hi. mastery o! verbal colour and music and his power of spiritual exaltation that made his flrst volu~me o! poerns, '\u003cfis Lady o! the. Sonnets' published in 1915, the. most novel and appealing volume of original verse by a Canadian that haa appeared iii a quarter o! a century, 1 quote two examples: I metYou in the myNstery of the, aigkt, A dear )roeaim Goddess on a cresceiit moon; An opalescent splendeur like 2t moon 0f lilles; and I wonidcr that the hcight Siioulil daiken for tiie depth to give me llit- Lliht of yonir face, so bovely that I swooU With gazing, sund tiien wake to fiud how soon Joy of the. würld fades when you fade frein sight. Beholding yen 1 arn Endyvnien, Lost and imnimortal iu Latinian dreama:- With Pian bendl(ing down te loek uipou lier siiepiird, -whose acoulain slumbej, s'oins A nioment, twvinlçling like a starry gem Amwoug tiic jewels of lier diadeni. 1. there any love-sonnet as sucb in American or in English literatuxoe more winning ti cobour and verbal music than the foregoinig f romn Mr. Norwood's arresting aind emiotioiaUly pervasive sequence ? An ani exampl of his rare genius for spiritualizg love, 1 quote the following: Lafst night I crossed the spaces te your Ride, As you lay sleeping iu the, 8arred rooma Of Our great moment. Like a lily',, bloom Frle and white were you, My spii. bride, F'or pain and londliness with yeu abide, And Dcath had thought to touch you with i doom, JUntil Love stood angelie at the tomb, Drew sword, amote him and Life\u003es doqr opencd wlde. I looked on yen aud breathed upeu. YgU hair- Your hair of sutch soft, browu, rnlct gobi I Nor did you lcuow that 1 huait dowa in prayer, thsed uutold Magnifience of womanhood divise- God 's miracle of Water tuned to Winet In those exquisitely wrought, snu ously-coloured and yet spiritually ee vating or transmuting verses, I ds cover a new note o! authenticety as if Dante, or Rossetti, orKeto Patmore, or Tennyson had rtre",
         "RE-VIEWS 0F THE LITERARY HISTORY 0F CANADA 228 to earth, reincarnated, 80 far forth, ini the genius of Robert W. Norwod- a new note heralding the coming of s novel quality snd a freali excellence itb Canadian nativistic poetry of the \u0026erond Renaissance. 'Mr Norwood expresses his poetic gen jus aiso in other verse- forms-d rat nas and dra- matie dialogues-mn which he showsj derided originality of invention and treatmnent. But, in my view, it is as a colourist, musician, and interpreter of the spiritual meanings of humnan ciperience that hie is a superh and superior poet. Like a boit of lighitning out of a clear sky, camie into the revival in Canadian poetry an unexpected lyrlat, having a new note or notes. Thisu was Hugh John Macleani, sont of William Macleau, M.P., proprietor of The Toronto W'lorld, and ixnself min- aging direetor of that journal. The poet was boru near Toronto, and edu- c.ted at Toronto University lu -I Februsry, 1914, there appearedi in The Nete Yoerk Times SundaY Mlaga- zive a poem,. with the uninviting, laonie titie, \"Juait a Clerk\", by 11, J. Maelean. It caught the attenltion of the, New York literary crities, and st tbem inquiring who the new poet OGuJld be. For they hiad noted in the peem an utiusual sincýerity, a direct .implicity in treating poignantly a lowly thieme, and refined teclinical artiitry. There was hardly any colour in it, and no elaborate structure and music, but ouly elemental humauîty and pathos. Thtese, then, are the new inotoe that Ilugli John Maclean lias inj-oduced into Canadian nativistie potr f the Second Renaissance, uam lysncerity, hunianity, and sim- ple pathos, winniugly phrased. I quote Mr- Maclean's «Just a Clerk\": Lord, Y am but s littie clerk, That scratches with a pen; 1o in est snd toil aud sioep, jugt as all other men. The on1y colours iuniny life Are drbs, ad dans, sud grays, Tet on the wh5o I amn content T. troad the boston was. But 1oinetimes when tii. mid-Spring mie? Flloata on the scented night, Mtrnnge spirits whispor Iu iny ont, Andvisonscross my siglit. I use moyself a grarious youtb, In Purpi. snd bright attcei; The golden spurtq of lcnlghtly worth Are glilitening on eclih heel. 1 ride into s world of dresins, And with mly pennoned lance 1 Pierce the myc. tis veil thtbi Te land of high romance. But am I pneus through Galftsd 's gladea, Adiventturing on my way, A ghoast iReOver nt my back, The. ghotit of every day. And soon or ]nt(, it horrtd hsRnd, That nover ytelds or uttym, WilI ur mnme from the lnd of drosme, Batik to the beaten ways. 0, Lord, soine Pray to Tiire for gold, Somp for a %voman 'a *mtleo; But al] I mû ta bhreath of lite, Once for a littIe whule. Grant me, bofore 1I pase beyond, Onsp chance to pla 'Y a part, To drop tii. gutie of tho lttle rl.rk And show tiie mafn at hierrt. 'NoW that Ppm miit have been only at brilliant sturit. But Mr. Mfac- lean, in a subsequent poemn, entitled \"A Maqeshowed convincingly that the gift tO envisage and poign. antly to express elemettl hunian ity îand pathos in exquisite, though sim- ple, verse, was the essence of his poetie genius. In \"A Maqe'the poet re- veals the nobility of the jester's or the \"low comedian's\" rôle ini the. drama of life. 1 quote : Thiese three before the, Judgmn-eaot: A Priemt, a Soldier, snd a Clown. THE SOLDIER 1 fought Thy figlt, Myt sword's red rock Was \u0026s rare luceace at Thy SIuine. Ot Vand5a tiiat deAIled Thy name Few wero left standing in the lino. TRE PRIE8T 1 spoke Tiiy Word, Aud men, enthrsjled, Fell penitent at Thy desr test; 1 won the sinner troni bis min, I mought the tares sud made thera whont.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE THE CLOWN 1 cotild flot prünch, I eouild flot flgbt. My woûz wa. Mmall through aul My y carm, Thy Childrai' Iny in agony; I made thom ormile amnidst their tears. THE VOICE AUl tbr.e hava. served, And. mûrviroe donc, The. well of pence shahl ulake their thirst. Tbc KingdIm lies bphind the Thronc; Enteýr--Btt let the. Clown b. Pirqt. Aýs a poetic, treatment of a moral paradox, or of the disecpancy be- tween tlod's ami -Mani's ways of think- ing and of iiusticee, Mr. MNaelean's f 0cm is as original in conception as Liegh flunt's A B en Aýdhem\", while in ehoice of poetir f orm, dra- matie presentation of truth, and in spiritual vonelulsiveness Mr. Nlaclean's ppm indubitably surpasses Lieigb 11int's, and is unique, at least in Can- adian, if net iu 'English, literature. I amn net eompiling an anthology of later Canadian verse, but notiug and uignaliziug distinctive persous and fresh original notes in the Second Renaissance of Canadian nativistie poetry. Much, then, as 1 wish to quote at length from other members of the new group of Canadian peets and poetess3es, 1 must deaist !rom fur- ther illustration, aud merely mention Lucy M. Montgomery's poignant love lyrie «You\", aud her exquisitely win- some nature-pastel, \"Memory Pice- tares\", with its memorably fiue liue, «Eyee holy as a prayer\"; William A. Creelman's lofty lyric, \"Along the Skyroada\", Charles F. Crandall's coleurful sud romautic descriptive verses, «Inlaud\", Andrew Doane Mer- kel's daiuty miniature, \"The May- flower\", and hie fine descriptive aud narrative poems, \"Ses Gaflh» and \"The Loyalists\", Andrew Rae Mac- donsld's sensuous and musical love l-i,\"The V1rom Heart\"', Miss Clar Gifins nb]Asonnet of spiritual love, \"The usigHatMs Norah M. Holland's exquisitelY col- oured and tender war-iyric, «April in England\", Carroll C. Aikins's im- pressive apostrophe iii blank verse te the Province of Alberta, and Arthur S.Bourinot's moving sonnet te the memtory of the late Rupert Broo~ks, find his tender and musical war-lyric, btginning, \"They are flot dead, the soldIier and the sailor\". I have men-. tioned only a fewv of the beet poenl by a few of the Second Renaissance group. But there is one whose work I miuet specially consider and esti- mate, namiely, Mr. William E. Mar-~ shall, 1ly rie and elegiac poet. Prior te 1914 enly one Canadian poct had comnpos.ed an elegiac poemn to which could be applied the epitheta \"egreat and noble\", or which coiil4 justly take a place heside such mno-q dies or threnodies as M.ýilton's \"LIic- das\", Shelley'a \"Adonais\", 'Matthew Arnold's \"Thyrsis\", or Emerson\u003es \"Dirge». This Canadian mnonody ws Mr. Charles G. D. Rolberts's \"Ae\u003e which, thougli subtitled \"An Ode for the Centenary of Shelley's Birt.h\", je so suffused with ideas and emotions of death and of spiritual loas that it i. essentially a threnody. The next really fine and noble Can- adiagn monody or threnody waa r W. E. Marshall's \"Brookfleld\", he ie a memorial te the geulus andchr acter of the late R. R. MacLead, h was, or may be called, the Nova Sc ian or Canadian Thoreau. Pubih ed in 1914, it consista of twenty-f.v etanzas, composed in the Spencra stanzaie form. Before publication i bad received the high commendto of the scholarly and brilliantCa - dian editor and essaylst, Dr. Ande McPhail, aud immediately on ita p pearance ini print was hailed as a nt able poetie performance by critics i the United States, particularly b Mfr. E. 'W. Thomson, Jiimself a gfe poet, and one of the literary rte on the staff of Th~e Boston Trncit",
         "RE-VIEWS 0F TITE LITERARY IIISTORY 0F CANADA even Rucb as immortalize Bishop King's 'Exiquy of luis 'Wîfe', Emer- sn'a 'Dirge' and 'Threnody', the 'Lycidas' o! Milton, Matthew Arnold's ~Thyrsi' Whitinan's 'Captain, My atinKipling's9 'A Charmn'!\" I (Ilot t be roiwluding stanza of \"rookfleld»\" to show something of the poet's quality: 0, friand, who ,qo didst jo of ]kuewoledge, That m'en look up nnd brighten at thyv same, And mpeak of geniuoe, and put by the news To tell morne goed of one dJetth c-annot claiJn, Nor lifa raquive te rvad1 in sculptured faine, Tha wlnd tipon the. bull baith aweete4t bush; The day laq reltlug into tenIdtereat flilme; And from the valley, where the waters Cornes op the. evensong of the ioni lier rnit-tbrumh. 'Mr. Dncan Campbell Seott's -'Unes in Mfeiory of Edmnund 'Mor- ris\", publisbed in 1915, is the third elegiac poei li Canadian literature that bas lin it the quaflitie8 of quintes- sentisl1 poetry. A detailed apprecia- tion of these three elegiac monodies would require an essay by itselt; -I \u0026hall, therefore, say no more about themn except to remark that it is a signal distinction that three Canadian poets-two of the First Renais;sance (Roberts and Sotand one of the Sec.ond Renaissanc (W. E. MarshaIl) -shiould hiave written monodies thiat artistically and] emoi(tionaillyv vonsid- ered have won the admiration o! seholirlyv and sinepere rrities who hanve praised themi as being noble and ex- alting and worthy to be rmmee wvith lte grent theoisof the Eng- lish and the Anierican poets. Elswhee have Siluiugi thalt a renaiçssance i ai pe llterature- is equally a renaissancee o! that pol' geniius and national life. The eiur- r-ent reiaàkening o! the pei spirit lin Canadians nust be notedi as significant of progress lin national civilization. Tlhe true poet iq ne mecre \"idie singer o! an emipty day\", but the essential sp)irit of a people ex- preossing li subliniated speeoh thieir dearet and xnost ardently desirvd ideals. \"Vain was the chief's, the sage's pride 1» once sang the great 18th century English poet, Alexander Pope: vain wils the li-~, he m prideo! The-y had ne poet, and thoy (lied. The. zixt article of thia scris 15 entitled £LCa3adiali Poetsandii Potteua.. as Lyriste of Love \".",
         "TFIdE SQU4ýATTERS CUT Ogilvie. ANADIAN was a very tali chestnt horse, with three white \u003c'stockings\" and a \"blaze\"' down the face; lie carried a il Queensland brand, and 1 had no reason to) doubt~ the word of the drover from whomn 1 eventually bolught hini when hie said that lie was bred on «Thep Cooper\", that his mo- thier was one of the fastest mares that ever looked throughi a bridie, and that if this lanky, untried colt could not gallop with any race-hors. on the ~Lachlan River he'd eat his stock- whip. Pave Wilson liked the look of him, and 1 had an immense respect for Dave's judgment ini horsefleali; so the bargain was struck. 1 gave over my fat brown horse with the wire-blem- ished hind-leg, and a cheqlue for seven pounds in addition, and led my purchase home. He was as lean as a rake, and very leg-weary, and drag- ged hopelessly on the hailter. We came in for a good deal of chat! as w. rode up to the station building. c'isalloa! Billy, where did you get the hat-rackV' asked the Boss in jov- il greeting. \"We was just out of dog's meat,» was the cook's comment. Ned, the cook, was our licensed comedian. Ilammond, the book-keep, thouglit the uew acquisition would be handy in flood-time for paeking rations acros the. swamps, and Jlughie said the. cap-rail on the. stock- yard gateway would bave to be raii if xny horse was to go Under it evi Morning. But there was nothing wrong w Canadian. Hc fillcd out and flo iqhed-he was only thiree 76\u0026Ts oI\u003c on the rich bliiegrass in the back p. dlook, aud every nmonth saw hii i, proving and thickeniug, tilt at I even the cook admiitted that h. ç %a great slashing fine colt\". Nine months after 1 bouglit h I took him up snd ro-de him, andi first morning J mounted hi cauglit me unawares as 1 was getti on and threw me heavily againat 1 fence. I introduced himi to whip a spur, fouglit hlm, and beat him, a therenfter we became the beet friends. 1 got him thoroughly qui and then one morning Dav. and went out along the. sand-hills a gave him. a half-mile gallop with g Mosquito. He left the old horse, A was himself pretty useful ove i distance, so far behind that wo col hardly believe our eyes, till a aeo gallop put the question beyond dou A little later we tried hlm agaài Paleface, Day.'s fanions little rI marc. He beat her so handily by t lengths over a mile that, even alI ing for the difference in our eg we knew we had \"a good oue\". \"Tii. Squatter'. Cup la as gooê won,\" said Dave as we rubbed 1 big colt down with a buuch of baia grasL. 'W. kept our knowledge too î: y 7rdi Yý[.",
         "THE SQUATTER\u003eS CUP slves, and traiuod the chestnut with- ouit any outsido assistance. Hoê thriv- ed on biard work, irnproved in his gtIe of galloplng, and fiattered us in- to betieving that, bar accidents, ho waa as ncarly a certaint «y for the big rae nt UlilIeton as anything in rac- ig cau bie. At lait the eventfuil day arrived. T'he sun hlazed down on the parched brown course and paddock, on the square, harn-like grand-stand, witbi iti; gaivanized iron-roof, and on thie rrowd that xnoved in and out ln au .ver-ehangitng kaleidoscopo of colour. Huere and there one of the race-iorses held court in a tittie circle of aidmir- ers or a figure fiitted through the ernwdl carrying a saddle or a w-eighit- eioth. In the shade of a kurrajong tree on the siope of the bill, Huighie Warren held Canadian, awkwardl and strange in the uinaeustonied elamnour suld movenment. The colt looked imi- meusety tait and leggy and was very ligtht lur fiesh,. but his coat betokenoed peérfe\u00264beath and the mutscles stood out uipen hlm like cord. Dive haLd pushed through the eowd. UuIlghie met uis with an amx- loua facee. \"W'here's the bioy?\" ho \"1Just welghlng out,\" 1 sziid: «here b.e eomes 1\" And our diminutive joc- hryv. ;addte on armn, stepped up at the moment. is amaitl cunning face seanued sach one of us furtlvely as though to question how mucli we knew of bis Jhst misdeeds, for ho hiad the reputation of being a mnagnificent horsmanbut a coniscienceless scoun- dIrel, *he woiild selt his own brother wt a r-ac. Tiovever, ho was the -nl1y boy we could get at Canadian's weight-even stonie-ten-and we cou- sidered that hy promising hlm the Embtstantial premium of seven guineas if h. won this race we had precludled the chance of any of the bookmakers, ore tiiors, briblng him to pull our Dave Wilsn bad agreed to run ?aleface lu the race, so as to ensure astrong pace for the colt, and as her weight was nine stone llughie was able to tae the mounit. Albert took Canadian's bridie and Hlughie weut off to weigh out for the mare. \"Now,\" 1 said to the boy' when I hiad fastened the, sureingle and Swilng lmi into the saddle, \"the race is a mnile and a half, and this colt is a good stayer and is vcry fast. The brcwn maiire will make a paco for you, suid you'll steady hlmk behbind hier tilt yin corne to the mept.At that point youi'l tak- ni) tlle runi- iig, sund iinless we're ail out lu our ree(koniig, belIl cornte righit iiway with Von and nlothing rail hi\\v withl hlmi uip the straight. Buit, whatever yen dIo, dn't wait after yoin piS, thle iiileý-post, wherevrr the mnare may ho. lUe nodded sulikily«,v and Ilhe to)Se of his hlead implied thait ho kriew% ilure abouit riding a race thani it any owner cold( teil hlmn. 1 waýtc-hcd hlmii walk Canadin downi to the oýtliir heorses; I niotcd thle easy Seat, thle lighit hiandi, thie Confident asur-ane of tlle stioutl- doprs, and 1 thoughlt it al pityý se splen- did a horsetinan should heair so tarn- ished a reputation. Hlughie rode uip te mne on Paloface, Hie featuirea were a stiidy iu anger, disgust and dismnay. Uce bout down te me and speke hulrriedly. \"We're bet\"lie said, «beat before ever we start ; the ceolt'4 stiff oued. The boy's been bought by them con- founided bookies. Bairtoni's off ered hlm ton qulid to pull the cherstunit, and ho meaus te dIo it. Jomi Rutherford heard 'em fixin' it up, and hoe came straighlt over and told m. 1IVWs Staiggered by % this bit of ncws. 1 atoed te lose rather mnore than 1 could afford if the chiestunit faildI uis; more than thait, 1 had set mv mmid, for inonths back on winiing this- par- ticular race. Above il, iim'y best frieud and dlevoted comrade, Dave Wilson, was «on» hlm to bis last pouuid. and I knew what failure would mcma te hlm. For a moment 1 had nothing to say, ne plIan te effer, Dive Wilson joined us, and we told hlm the plot. For a moment his face",
         "THIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE darkelied. Then a smile, Dave'. per- ennial sille, broke ever it. \"The chestnut's a bard horse to stop whien lie's galloping, isn't he, B3illy t\" 1 kuiew this wa4 true; mny shoulders stili achied at that moment as the re- sult of the moruing's gallop ou hum. No horse I ever rode before or since pulled go strongly and se steadily. But 1 Ioeked at the workuiau-Iike fig. iire of our jockey as hie rode dlown towards the post. \"Yes,\" 1 said, \"that's true enenugli; but where's the horse on earth that erooked Nat can't liold V\" Dave only smiled, aud whispered a word of two to Ilughle, who gathered up the mare sud cantered off after the others. «Well, of ail the sceundrels 1 ever knew or heard of-\" 1 began, but Dave Wilson stopped me. \"Wait a bit, Billy,» lie saîd; \"the race isu't lest yet.» I marvelled that hie should take things qe eaeily, and folewed him, weudering, as lie threaded hie way te the rougli grand-stand. There were seven herses lu the race, and Bygene, froim La\u003cchlan Springs, waa faveurite. Paleface, on hier repu- tation, was backed te win quite a lot of meoney; but the ethere, includiug Canadien, were practicaily friendiese, and it was quite easy te get twelve or fourteeni to eue about the uuhxiown chestiiut colt. \"Fil1 lay tweuty te one Canadian,\" yeiled Barton, the bookmaker, as we passed his stand. «Tweuty-five to, oe te you Mulga Plains gentlemen!1\" Le called te us. Pave straighitened himself, aud a eteely glitter camne into his benest eyes. For a moment 1 thought lie wa going tehit the man. Theu he speire very quietly, sud with a court- esy that must have coet hlmi su ef- fort: \"'H take yen, Bartou-twice over, lu pounds.Y The layer ef odds beeked the bet with ill-eeueealed avidity. I was aghst at Dave's confidence, oonsderiug what Ilughie had j, told us, and 1 remeustrated with 1 as we climbed the stepe o! the grai stand. \"The chiestnu\u003es a liard ho te hold when his blood ie up, BiU was ail lie weuld say. The start was a good one, but se HIughîe, ou Paleface, pufled out in i Iead, aud the others foilowed in string; Bygone second, 'Wiuuie thi Canadian fourth, sud Donnell gray a bad ast. At the end of hall a mile, with 1 pace a cracker ail the way, Palefi liad increased lier lead te th,, leugths, Bygone and Winuie Wi racing ueek and ueck, sud Osuadi puiling Nat hall eut of the sadd was a lengtli behiud tliem. \"If that infernal sceundrel st( him,» I muttered, but Dave put 1 hsud on my arm. \"lWait a bit,\" said. «Watcli Hughie!\" At the mile-peet Paleface was t ing, alie Liad ceme the full distar at the tep ef lier epeed, sud uow E began te drop back te lier liors Winuie now gained ou lier rapid sud Bygone was only a leugvli 1 hind. Two lcugths fartlier ba\u003cik t big cheetnut herse, full of ruxmiir was flghting for hie head, Nat up the stirrups holding him easily wl geutle, maguificeut biands. Siek heart, I turned my liead away ar l'in afraid, swore deeply and whà heartedly. There was a roar of \"Pa face ie beati» sud wlieu I leoked i Wiuuie sud Bygene were raelug ne and ueek iu the lead, sud Palefa had dropped back alougsideCa dian. Then, suddeuly, 1 saw Rug draw bie whip sud bring it o once, twice, tlirice, with ivhat em \"Wliat's the use of hi l gg your littie mare like that, Davel nid. «8he's doue; lie muet \u003c that 1\" But Pave was chuekliug to im behiud hie race-glasses. \"Godeold boy; giveit to hml And, even as Le epeke, the hsn colt, iuaddeued with the lw",
         "luIS SOLI)IER MOTIIER Tlughie\u003es whip, sprang wildly for- ward. Even crooked Nat's superb hands eould not hold hmii xiow, and he tore up the, straiglit likec a horse pos- seasled by a devii. For a stride or two Tltighie raced the mare up behind hlmi and] gave hlmi a parting slash across the rumnp thiit put anothecr foot oit hi stride. Seeing that ail ehane o! atopping hM without alttraceting the attention of everyone on the course was 1-oW ove(r, Nat loosened the good horse's head, and he shiot np to the leaders like ani arrow from a bo)w. Ili a few strides lie had both of them beaten, and going on alone lie won the Squaltter's Cup b\u003e' a full four lengthis. Ilow wve chevred as thei riders , aineë back to saie; whole-heaýrted chevers for Ilughie Warren, who had saved us our mtoneyv andl wOn ni( th(' eup. \"'Yes,\" salid that dapper littie stoc-kmiat afterwards, as wc stood lin Canadian's box talkinig it ill over aind exainiing four siNmage-looking welIts uipon the colt's sbinling quarter, -yes, 1 laid it on to hlm pretty heakvy, p;oor beggar, but 1 haxided Mr. Nat a couple over the thigh iat the saine time just to show there was nio favourit- HIS SOLDIER MOTHER By MARGARET VANDIS BRVAIN A QUET iglt, -it jut adisantroar Life gues on li the saine old way, And as the dawn inust ushier ini the day Se we must fiud our hope-s and hold them truc, Our, hopes for vietor\u003e', for home, and you. If ive are brave, dear one, whlo gives us courage to keep oin Our way, and to bemianly, to bestrong? Whose letters bring to uls inost joy and chieer? Who tells of home news, neyer letting fear (Jreep li those Uines? Shwho lias put us li God's ae MNust retlect strength and love to uls li prayer. Who gave lier sons wlith ail a woman's grace, And Ieft a memlory for theni-her smniling fae. Iler faith. lier trust, lier love? There may be herees, dear, Upon the battlefield - but those who speak no fear, Who figlit their battles silent and alone, Sitting beside the lfreliglit at home, They, too, are heroea; for it la most truc Ood made the braveat of the brave li suei as voir.",
         "THE WHITE GARDEN Bir LOUISE MOREY BOWMAN YOU care for mne (oh, 80 tenderly), And you bring mie to sit in the garde», 'Watching me ail so axiously. And 1 love you and a8k your pardon, Because 1 eu laugh no longer. But 1 try-oh, 1 try-to tell you That it's really not ail sad And that here in my white, white garden I arn almost, àhnoat glad! For love (0, my Lover J) is stronger Than blood anid blackness and death. le was sueh a glorious lover! (Oh, the years of golden weathcrl) And how we joyed in the eolour That we found in the world together: Fromn the tawny shades of our E aster» mugs And the gleani of our copper-lustre jugs, To the rose and the green and the weird ice-blue 0f winter and sumrner and springtime hue! Oh, the hyaeinth-beda when the \"south-west\" hlew! But love (O, my Lover!1) is stroiiger Than blood or blaekness or death. 1 wlrsh 1 eould make you understand As my Lover dos in his far-off land. For he knows why my flowers are ail silver white; Hie knows why the sun la like pale moonliglit; lie knowa why the brown and golden becs Are white, and thc grass and the whispering trees. Only the sky so far away Orows bluer and inearer every day- For love (0, my Lover!) is stronger Than blood and blackness and death.",
         "T10eHE GlODMOTHGK 43y dazgrie\u0026 Jee5ýves iY, mademoiselle, what on earth are you doing out this slippery day?» lu . \"It is for mny soldiier. I amn 111 godmother. There is of sosie linen, somne tobacco andi tenez, madamne, 1 send Morley alse,* shp replied. Sewas standing before the money- order cage at the post.offlee, the old flgmtrembling with eagernecss. The liteeyus were as piercing as glimiets, an4 an expression of beatifle sati.sfac- tion illumined a face of his and 1161- Iowa 11k. the brightness of motor- lights overspreading a worn roadway on a black niglit. Seeking le mot juste, 1 siaould say that mademoiselle presnted a Gothie facade. Her hon- net of ametiiyst velvet was a pointed arch with a delicate tracery of lace ornamenting the apex; the whiite hair wa pompadoured in a eorresponding point; the. nose and eyebrows were Gohead the. bigii cheek-bones owli. 8h. was alway8 garbed in gSd tast. I o! ten wondered iiow she id t.8h. looked so, genteel ini ber black mantie, and the purpie ci.- mai on the. bonnet contributed an UnmitakblyGaulai cach\u0026et. ly'ou must let me take you home inth motor. With this coatiug of deet on the. streesa it is not safe for yo t be uaounting the. eleetrie cars,\" 1 a visiions8 of mademoiselle with a brokeni hp laid] up for mionthsq nt the Old wonian's HTome, lier ultiniate siielter sinre she had becomie too f(elble, to hiold her place at the Seîuinary. w-here she had been instruetor in French for years. \"Madme,\"she excitedly contiuued, nodding acceptance, \"the mniracle lias iiappened. Figurez-vous, when I read in Les A n nales the announeement that Monsieur Brieux-ah ! ce boit BRiux --was selling the brushes Made by the sighless onles, the pour soldliers wýho have loat thefr eyes, I wrote at once and sent two dollars for a brushi; ordinaire, pas grande chose, any brii froni ce cher l3rieux is great thing. is it not, mnadamie? This morning the. bruali arrives, sud tiiere was on it carved a naine in sitraggling letter-- letters traced by the fluagers witiiout the eyes.» ler lips quivered and the. cracked voice enddin a sob. I took her arn sud led her to the. automobile, inquir- iflg: \"And the name 1» \"Lt was the, usine that bas beea\u003e carved on my hoart for fifty years.\" «Not the, youug professor at Amn- sterdam r' \"Tes, the, saine. 1 have just posted a letter to André Rouet, care of M. Eugène Brieux at Chartres. 'Peniiaps le Bon Dieu ivili send meo isnw alter sUl thes. years.- \"Tiie saine naie,» I considcred; \"it may be lais grandsony",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE «ict will b. four weeks Wo get an answer. Then 1 shail know.\" «eMademoiselle, do tell mie tome more about André and those days ai Amsaterdam.\" «You really 11k. Wo heart\" «Indeed I do.\" \"Ah, well, 1 was a governess for two years in the family Maertens. On tbeir waflh there wtt an ancestor by Rembrandt, a burgomster-they were grande famille. F'ulda, my chiarge, wtt thirteen, and Urlus was eleven,» \"She wtt very delicate, wtt the not t'\" «Conmumptive. For that we spent muel i ure lnthe open. On fair days we made promenades in the country, ps ing th afternoona among the ifelds and by the. canais. W. sang always; it was good for Fulda tousing. André was tutor for Ulrus, for the Latin and the. French, and they iiked vey~ mueli W aeeompany us. Ah!I we have niany happy afternoons Wo gather thiepoppie 1t Andr like to hear me sing He.ald it wtt Wo hlm the rossigol at Salons, and lie saw al- ways the. long whilte road and the. ttill poplars of hi. dear Provence, One day, wlien we returned Wo the bous, ai the, door André pieu ln my band a littie box and lie say: 'Léontine, it may 1may it l For amomentiih eld my hand and 1look into iteye like mirrors and feel my face red 11ke the. poppies on hlii\u0026bt. Thenl1go to my room and loek the. door Wo open thiebox. It isa gold beart on a cin. On the. front, tiiere are letters: 'A. pies 1 stopped to pick a er one, and itie-the flower chari a snake and stung me on the. head. I awoke witii a start, con of a knocking ou my door. ' moiselle, mademoiselle, you a corne at once!' It was the vo monsieur ai my door. I tiirew q long mantie an!d sougiit the. ments of madame. 3h. bad the face and the. eyes of tragedy. 1 ing at Fulda'a bedside, tii. wast iug to ber and rubbing the. 1 Fulda's eyes were eloted and shi ed like a waxen image. Tii. tin~ threads of velus on lier temples the. only signa of 11fe. Thes1 the. white inge-zZl-all asU ed with the red blood. I kne dreaded iiemorniiage iiad corne. \u003cf Tiie doctor, madame, lie corne ai once l' 1 said. «'MNonsieiir bas gone for hiii quickly the. brandy and the. hi ter,' she replied. \"The xnaids, aroused by moi entered and w. worksd Wo put çç into the lUttle wite body. Wh doctor came, lie found the. puls weàk. By morming she iiad a gone Wo leep. Tiiere was no bood for the. beart to pump stopped. During thedas hi lowed, I never left the. chami madame. Tiie bouse wtt a Every evening I found Pppie8 room. Franz, the. butesi André left tiiem for me at thi One evening tiiere were no p XI wtt. about theii.xiii day. 1 aacrea i for lier \"That",
         "TI-E GODMOTHER \"And you eerheard from André fglin V' I asked. \"Neyer. I left with Franz a letter for André should lie return. HaP had ise, iny addre8s, but after one letter 1 be4ar nothing fromn Eranz. lit is as tliough the eity of Amisterdlam were s4Wallowved by tiue sea, I hand heard thie b)are ouitiines of mademeselleS tory biefore', but with- out tiie dramnatic him\u0026 values whieh thie riamne on the brush hadno brought forth. 1 dropped her nt her dooxr, and dlid net see lier again for several weekg. Upon mny return fromn Nipwx York, 1 weut eut to resume my Frenech lessons. She was dietating to mne the opening chapters of \"l'ère Qorlot\", and] the interminable sordid- ness of tii. Maison Vauquier offered feW ailurements, save as art-whieh in always long. Ulpon entering tihe building, 1 envountered soine of the. memnbers of the board and learned that mademoiselle had failen into dis- grâc and ws not in faveur with the laymanageris ef the Home. She had offen4ed these bomnba.7ine seuls, wiie, eutlironed on horseii\u0026ir sofas and sur- rounded by an aura of piety as un- yldiding as the horsehair, st in judg- ment on lier frivolities. Made-moiselle fllowed a road to heaven ether than the one staked ont hy the board of manaen.She had comimitted an unpadonale sin; sh. liad the eff ron- tert remain seate-d at lier knitting wbule prayers were being said in the. prlour for Miss Lucy Brown, wliem the Lord had seen fit te release at the aW of eighty-one. 'Tbere she mat, knitting gray yarn for the sildiers. just as though Miss Luywere in lier bed instead of lier \"lYet.rday ahe ordered a dozen grap-frut from »rone and Jackson, tnktliey are living at the. Plaza Fte.I never saw anybody se care- le with money,» said Mrs. ()losen, -h wouI4 never have that partieular \"What shenid she de bit, spend four dollars for a ewfnldelpee- trie pad just baueAuint Marie Owen bas cold feet at nighit! And our elet-tricity keeping it geinig,» re- jeined Mrs. Keever. \"Il3ut the worst of ail was that se w%,rote Dr. Sirucox when lie treated liernergi. \"What wasq Wt Mrs. Ceoe4nV I ssk- od, knowing that ah. wRs bursting te tell. \"5he . sent hiim a hust of Liord Blyron and sait] ah. kiiew thint Lord Byvron was tired et living in ani Old Wemnan's Hlome. And hier reemt se ,oinfortablIe, with two windlowsi'\u003e \"lIt is a ruile- ef the Honme that hait et what an 'ybody carnq shonld b. turned into the treasnir v. Thefse oid ladies are 11k. ehildren. they qhould b. disc-iplinedf,\" renewed(ýi Mrs. Reever. \"ýAil winter long alie has been giving French lessens and sendling bundIes te the, trenehes. Spends every eent on those soldiers, and says she la a godznother. 8h. even sent one a wateh -as if they* had timne te be wearing bracelet watches 1» (On. would have tliought tliat the entire Freneli armny was struing in watches as tiiek as seagles on a fisia te have senl MIrs. Keever's expression ef intolerancep) «Now ah. has spent ail lier mnoney again and \u003ccan't go te Chatauqua this summer. lIt ain't no use at ail send- ing ail that money te Franee,» con- dluded Mrs. Keever, who on ecea- siens of strong feeling semnetimes « Isupecedas muoli,» I replied. I did nlot tell them that mademoiselle's frienda had ou foot a littie sehemet te defeat the ends of justice. alia Old Womau's Home managers. \"Can't you t.ilk te ber and persuade lier te give loua?»l said Mns. Closen, appealing te me. \"~But it mûkes ber a. happy te give. Her whole lite bas been spent in giv- ing. Tht is why she ishere. 8h. givea me more time than I pay for. 8h. gives ber books te lier pupils, ber fruit te the. o14 ladies--and ber heart",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE to France. Plesse don't discipline lier this time,\" I pleaded. 'When 1 arrived withiu the portais of mademnoiselle's room upstairs, 1 fewid ber even busier than ever. She was aewing up a bundie, headed for Paris, in the stout cloth demanded by the Frmnch postal authorities. Her littie nest gave out an innocentl-y il- logical air of gayety. There was plenty of freshi air;- a pot of primrosea waa smiling on the~ wiudow-sill, and be-. side it lay a basket, of Indian weave, full of oranges. On the table, ready for reference, there wau a fat La- rousse and several numbers of Les Annales. The place diffused a littie atinophere most unexpected in the chamber of an inmate. \"Bons jour, madame. Se you are back again; and 1. have a letter from France!\"\u003e was ber beaming greeting o me. \"Goodi1 Amn I te see it 1\" \"It la wonderful-quite wonder- fuI,» ah. replied, psssing me a letter of xuany shuets of foreigu paper. 1glanced at the writing i dismay. It wathe finest posible script, be- ginning at the very top and extend- ixig te the last fraction of the page. \"The writer ef thia la certainly en- dowed with the national virtue,-the thrift which mademoiselle lacks,\" 1 thouglit, \"Surely 'A la PrévoyjaÙice' banda over his lintel, even though itI be not a visible sign.\" \"Mademoiselle, do read it te me! It sounda so much more beautifuil on your tongue,» I said, returnii'g lier the steel-point manuscript. And ahi did. I found it younger and quite as vital as Balzac. The following translation la made froni my note- since Maitre Brienz sella the. brushes, t' cannet work fast enougli. Tihe whole France wants a bruali frein the sihop the. Maître; even you of the far Tennem have sent tiiem your aid. \"T1 amn so hiappy tint André and 1~ msrried before lie went te the tron and gave his eyes for 'La Patrie'. blds me thank you, cher. Marraine tlieusand timem for your letter snd money. The. letter was to hlm the vi of the. past speaking te the present. is aL great-nepliew of André Rouet, Salons, wiie was once a tutor st Arna dam. Uncle André told him inany il of the. great love that camei to him ti and of tie evil misfortunes which fol] ed.* To the. end, lie lioped that the blei Providence miglit eause yen to know 1 he waa neyer f aithicas. \"Wlien André, as heir, made the, ex inatien of the. papers and thingg wi Uncle André iield dear, lie found a yelJ cd 'mouchoir' witli the. naine t.4oa embroldered in the. corner. Folded be it, there were sorne po~piO5 whlch fei pleces when lic toeuched themn. André me write yen tiiat Uncle André weni once te seeli yen when lie reeovercd\u003c f the long fever which carried hlm alr to the. gates of the. Great Beyond, lad gene to London, and is former p knew nothing of your address. 'famille' Maertens could not pardon long absence and refuRed to rerelvei There was a maitre d 'hetel named Fr wiom lie sou ghlt, but Tran:z had retire Volendam te live with lii. son, wiio ov a schooner. Together, tliey had sniled smre port in Deninark. Neitier Y nor the schooner ever returned. It an accident that cans-1 the. fever, lJncle André knew nothing from the ment tint lie was struck on the liea4 the. boom ot the. boat until lie awok the. hospital. Wlien i. began te remet and inquired viiere lie was, Soeur E rice, who nursed hlm, told hlm tint im we.eks had gêne by wvile he laid tl pardlied by the fever anid tertured b effort of the brain trying to tink .nid ftint h. was liroutiit to them a i -LI U e called",
         "THE GOtDMOTHER T'here ia yet iihac that lie mnay aev wbea-i the dortor remrovea., the bandaifgea4. I piray every daY to the Ble4aa6d( Virgin, whun vats once a mother, that he may see thie fae of the littie one 'who la (coming aoon1. Your grateful godvhild, \"Jeanne Roue(t.' 'Ah! ademisele,\"1 sighed, \"al] the romnances are flot in boolks, after aiLl Did you have faith lu himi al these, yeatrsiý 1 \"TFli faith of youth is strong-\" \"And yours did not grow feeblee with agef\" -André was so c1ean.-eyed, madame, but if i. good to know, This, iq for the. litie orle, and this ffannel wilI màke him warmi petticoatsq, and 1 shlall embroider themi with a f estoi biens solide for the dear Ieantie,»' she said, disphaying billows of pink wool and white flannel with that radiant expression whieh every woman wears when she fondles the trappings of an anticipated baby. \"Mademoiselle, I amn afraid that thie army of France wili wear your Chautauqua trip on its back this Sulm- mer, as it did last.» 'II have su miucli W make 1 wiil not know if it la hot. Besides, there la thse younig Cordon; lie wants lessons ail sumrmer to pas. the exaxainations of thse auitumn.\" \"But, mademoiselle, you know sec- ond summers in the heat are often dangrousfor old ladies, as well as III can be very comfortable on the ftorth porcli W crochet the caps, and there wiIl be letters oWit, h Parried. \"Asi weil try Lu stemn a torrent with a toothpick as Wo attemlpt tô divert the earning-s of madn(emiois,,elleý froit the necedy, I thouight whule taking leave of lier. Two mnonths laLer, Mien the heat swooped down upon us like a swarm of clouids fron Rlades, and thv in- agers of the hlome grwrestive under the apprehiension o! another spel simiilar Lu) maiue l'slUness of last summner, lier friends made upl a littie purse and presented it with an instant commrand for miobilization at Chautauiquai. When 1 wenit out Lu tý,ay 1odbe foinid her Woo happy for expression and overflowing with a gratitude that put miere words Wo shame. -To think, madame\" she said, -it la a littie girl-and they have named lier L\u0026\u003entine. It is suci a beautitul world, and everybody is su good to me.l\u003e \"You caat your biread uipon the wa- ters-\" 1 began. \"I cast bread ? What have I ever dune for anybodyt Diteas, madame,\" she eagerly eontinuied. \"«I arn mnaking the christening-rohe. Would you use the bluie or te pink rilbun T'\u003e \"II would use red, white and bliie. Tic tri-colour for L4ontine, by ail means.\" \"Bien.. Of course, she will lie a patriot. Vive. la Frascel\" \"'And la V'ictoire!' I fervently con- cluded.",
         "NXOTÀ1BLe MMK4x JJdfJ3 u rwaskh E t iti1e \"Notable viarys\", may suggest a ,Omantie vision-the vis- on of lovely, ha1less vlary Stuart, and of er attondant Marys busy 1 lute and aong and deli- ýries, as iu that fanious -palace of pIeasBtlue pa.ttern in Portuigal or they eneirele their brilliant Qusen. It la a eharmlng viuion, but the. notable Marys with whoiu this sketch bas to do must b. vi.wed from a more pros- aie standpomnt. They are notable chiefly to-day for their personality and work, rather than their beauty; for their promin- ence as forceful thinkers of their cec- turyr; for the faet that in elearness of imsigbt and breadth of sympathy, they stand more eloeely lu toucli with the proresve woman of the. moment than do many sisters of ber own gen- comparison with that of ber decessor, as she died at the a thirty-eight, in the autunin of 0f the eaqe and brillianey of Mary's style iu writing, of lier ui experience as anibassadress ii East, as of ber clever and ayr chronicles of the Court of Georl First, it is unnecessary here to i Many eriticismsand appreciati( ber work have been written. few, if any, have empbasized th that she was the first woman ç century to make public p against the limitations of ber or Y year 216 Mtght be a Franoo\" e-311jy",
         "NOTABLE MARYS ber own bands. Escli joint was car- ried up in its turn, te b. operated on by lier and ber alone, the department of the ost being topush the bottle atter dinner. As for the. erowd of gnusts, the n'est inconsiderable among tbem-tlie curate, the subaltern, or the. squire's youinger brother--if suf- fered by ber negleet to help himself te a slice of the, iutton before hlm, would bave chewed it ini bitternees sud gone home an affronted mnan, half inadined togv a wrong vote at th~e next lck4* . There were then pro- foud carving masters, whio tauglit young ladies the. art ucientifically, frem eue et whoirý Lady Mýary said @b. took lessena tblee times a week thst sh. miglit lie perfect on lier fatiier'@ public days, wheil in order te perform. ler functions without in- terruptions alie was forced te eut lier dinner alone an heur or two betore- hand.Y Mr. St. John, a more unsparing eritic, declares that Lady 'Mary lived inans age wlien wexnen ln general atudied scarcely at afl, when they re- oelved ne instruction beyond what wa then (lie is writing ini the ltrst year of Vietoria's reigu) beatowed on cooks and housemaids. Other writers indicate that ber educatien was large- ly seIf-aequired, bier studies under- taken .portaneeusly. Yet suother allegea that ahe was intruted by the sme tuters as lier brother, rsoeiving with hlm the sme sisuical training. If this b. true, Lady Mary stands forth a meut signal gu,,e as a first product et that ce- edctinwhich was te b. so ardently My upon the. subject ot woman\u003es edu- eatio in ber day iz expressed very el$ry ina letter te Bishop Burnet. ste u apology fer tou\u003cching on suc ipreper» subjects as Churcla \u0026 State, sh. continues: \"For n'y Mx in usually forbid studies of this n\u0026tre sud foJly reckoned se mucli Du prpr sphere, that we are par- doned sny excesses of that sonner than the. least pretension te reading or gond sense. We are permitted ne beooks but sucb as tend te the. weaken- ingz and effeminating ef the. mind. Our natural defecta are every way indulg- ed and it is looked upon as in a de- grec criminal te impreve our reason or fancy, if we, bave any. W. are tauglit te place our art in adorning our eut- ward formsand permltted without reproacli te carry that eustom even te extravagancy, while our mindS are entirely neglocted, and by disus. of reflectien, filled with nothing buit the. inost trifling objects our eyes are daily entertained with. Tbig custoin se long establishied snd se industriously up- held makes it even ridiculeua togo out et the. common road and terces one te find as many excuses as if it were a thing altogKetiier criminaî net te play the. fool in concert with ether women et quality whose birtbi sud leisure only serve te mùke then' the. Meut uselessand meut worthless part of ereation. There is hardly a char- acter lu the. world more despicable or more hiable te universal ridicule than that ot a learned weman: these words imply, aeeerding te the reeeiv- ed sense, a talking, impertinent, vain sud eonceited creature.Y This was a beld enset, sud tii. col- lege girl to-day rejoieing in establiali- ed liberty lias resaon t. remember that beldneas as a petent factor ef ber freedon'. Of marriage Lady Mary makes ne mention, but on the question of niotheniiood ah. bas reglstered s plain opinion. lIn a letter t4\u003e ler daugliter, Lady Bute, oeugratulating ber on th. birth ef a mon, sbc writes as tollowa: «That part ef lit. whlch we passed together you have reason te remember with gratitude, theugli I tbink yen misplace it Yeu are ne more obliged ~te me for bringing yeu into the. world that I am to yen for coxning inte it, sud I neyer made use ef that cemmon- place argumient as exaeting any re- turu of affection. In the easeoftyur infaney there ws mo great a mixture",
         "THE \u003cJANADIAN MAGAZINE ~of instinct I eau scarce even put that in the nuxnber of proots I have given yen of my love, but 1 coufess 1 think it is a gret one if you compare my atter cenduct tewards yen with that of other mothers who generaily look on their ebjîdren as devoted te their pleasures and bound hy duty te have no sentiments but what they choose te give themi-playthings at first, and afterwards the objecta on which they mnay exercise their spleen, tyrauuy and i1-humeur. I have always thought of yen lu a different manner. Your happiness was niy first wish and the pursuit ef ail my actions diveated ef selfinterest. Se far, I thiuk you oughit, and I believe you do, remem- ber me as a real friend.» Here this writer of au eider time steps f ar in advance ef her coutemporaries in that, at a perlod when parental au- thority was rigid, she established a confidence between her daughter and berséif very similar te that of the modern mother and daugbter, beat ln- trrtdperbaps iu modern speech as buig chummy.Y Finally, Lady Mary is notable as a pioncer in social effort. That she was oue of the few women et ber century te realize that a womau's sympathies could he useflul outaide ber own tour wafll la beat show-n by ber endeavour te introduce inoculation into Eng- land. Ever alive te new ideas, she quiékly realized the worth et that practice whose results she studied while living lu the Est. Satisfled whlle there et its effllacy, ahe had ber yenng son inocxulated during ber stay lu Belgrade. But on ber returu te London, ber proposai that the prac- tice should hî- tried in that citv was daunted, flnally prevailed se far a have the experiment tried upon criminals. Four recovered satia torily, the fifth contessing that he had smallpoic in ehildheed. Stil proot was net considered suffiel Lady Mary then had ber il daugliter treated, inviting four of moat emineut doctors of the el1) watch the progress of the case. se opposed were they still te the i that she writes te hier sister that was afraid te leave the child al with thein for a moment, se unwil were they that the treatinent sh\u003c succeed. Noue the less the tact is i acknowledged that the benefits vaccination which f ollewed mnoc tien should be tested in England Two hundred years have coe gene since ail this happened. I little and how great has been march forward et wemen dui these iutervening centuries it ma) iuteresting for the weinan et twentieth century te investigate herselt. Glancing backward, an torian et modern tixues reminda that the generai ideas as to the n tai education ot wemnen in the. ej days et the Georges were entiý different from those which dictA the education et men. That idea that a sister should read study the saine books as her br.i was as toreigu as that s ab( learu te swim or te manage a a The more boueur then la due te L Mary that bers was the sole -f raised in protest againat such 1, tation. The century had pasued ts lm dian when that voice sud preteRt;a sank iute their final silene. Bu ,ready new things were at han\u0026. ready there was growngu n 1~ don a second Marv- whn w- a",
         "NOTABLEMAS ed Lady Mlary from lier birth. Puy- ery, struggle and sorrow were the birthright of MNary Wollstoneeraft. By bier perseverence and energy she managed Wo eduicate herseif suiffirient- 17 tii obtiain a position first .4% ristrass ofa school, later as private goveriu. ef. Andi it was while occupied w'itli private pupils in Irelanti that she wroto lier first novel, now chiefly ini- trestiing as a record of lier personal experince. It Was not tiil she Settieti in lion- don i the year 1787 that she turneti ber attention seriously Wo letters. »uring the four ycars spent in that city she worked for Mn. Johnson, the weIll-known pûblisher. bringing out several books for eilidren, eduicational in aim, andi occasional articles for ~The Â.altical Recview. Mr. John- son tboroughly appreciateti his young Irish friend. From first Wo lust, tbrough ail her dark days, as lier brigbt ones. lie remaineti lier unfail- ing counseilor. At hia bouse i Lon- dIon many of lier happiest hiours were opent. It was frequenteti hy miany of the foremost men of the day, the meadieuît and keenest thinkers. andi ainong tbem, as a listener Wo andi siiar- er i their talk, Mlary feit lier mid qpurred on Wo freshier effort. It was durig these years that Burke's celebrateti easay, \"Reflections on the Revolution i France\", wus pubised ad it touched the mind of hsyoung countrywoman as with a flve eoal. The discussion it at once stirred up regarding the Rigita of mani drew froxn this second Mary lier prmtargument for the Riglits of Wonn lier alert brain was instant to ndestadand at the moment seredt be the only one to under- gUnd that the one proposition must folow the other. She was the first vpman to, bear the faintly growing murmr of remonstrance of lier sex. the firut to gather up the growing gniet regarding the emaneipation. Iti for this service to hier genera- tio that Mary Wollstonecraft iu not- able, and flot as somne wvould raither say, for the romantie experiences of her lite that shortly followed-the ex- periences of those stormiy days iii E'rance, succeeded byv such (Juiok de- spair in Enghmnd, thiat hid it flot been for a kindly hand streteheti out to lier at a very awtul miomlent, the dark waters of the Tharnes wvould bave closeti forever over yet another victii It i coritorting Wo know thiat kintiness, love and borne awaited iber beyvond that darkest bour, eveni thouigh bier final tiays of sunshine were dles- tinvd Io be sbort. Iler book \"The Vindication of the Righits of Wornan\" is mieinorable as being the finit proclamation ot that niovement peculiar Wo the nineteentb century, and which is stili continti as the -Woman Question\". Its de- muanda, summeti up, are two--those, of equality ot education-alike for womnan as for mani-andi equality ot civil riglita. The evils it setji fortb concerning woman are first tlie abject nature of lier economie existence; an(] second- ly, the stunting of bier growtli, intel- lectuaily anti moraily, by the rigiti exactions ot men in holdinig lier sub- ordinate Wo serve their pleasure. Its author admits the mental interiority of women in bier day, but boldu it largely due Wo the over-wrought senut- bility demandeti of themn by mani, Wo the neglect of the development of their powers ot mind. Perhapa no better treatise bas been written on this subjeet of over-sensibility than the seancbing analyuia of MNeredith in bis novel \"The Egolat». As a furtberance of bigher educa- tion the book in question proposeti lfrst a systeni of national scbools witli co-edueation. For very young chil- dren it foresbadowed kindergarten methoda. It argueti further that sbettld such higher education be grant- ed te women, ail professions sli\u003culd b. openedto thein choice as freely as Wo men'\u0026. Fialy it suggested a wo- man's capacity for theo study of medi- ciue and nursing.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Su\u003e mucli a matter of course is every one of tiiese propositions to-day, une is apt to forget thie courage disptayed by their originator in throwing lier gauntiet so boldly in the face of pub- 1 ic opinion. The saine methods of reply were custoinary tiien as now. Sarcsmn, jests, flot alway8 of the. fin- est, patronizing pity were poured forth upon lier. Horace Walpole pro- ctaimed bier abruad as «a iiyena in petticoats\u003e, thougi lie admitted he had nover read a word of lier book. To his niind sucli a work was distinct- Ia revolutionary factor, aud lie liated revolutions as noisy aud dis- turbing. Hanuiali More, famous as a meniber of the. Blue Stocking Set, Iikewise refused to read it, on the plea that ah., personally, liad all the. liberty aie waaited. An array of in- fluentil perlodicals fiocked into, the fray. The Monthly Rview wa.vered. Whle agreeing that botli tlie condi- tion aud chlaracter of woman was cap- able. of improvement, and admitting that the. book sgetdmucli that was deserving of attention hy the public, it carefully sidpped ont of danger by adding that the writer\u003es opinions were fanciful, her projects roxuantie. Other critiea adviaed lier manfully to returu to the. weak et.- \u003csuce of mind, the. sweet doeility of manner, sud te the exquisite sensi- bility whi was the, acknowledged ornainent of ber sex. F'inally, h Critical Reviewcapped the climnax by lordly suggesting that to commit botli author snd book to oblivion would 'b. the. kindeit treatment that could lie miiown, Amidat this clainour an encourag- iniz note was heard. 'William Go- in the cause of a fuller sud womaniiood. Hie logicat mind ized tliat if the. abstract riglit oi will bear discussion sud explan the. abstract riglit of womnan c be excluded fromx thie saine tesi cousequence lie admired Dot Mary Wollstonecraft's insiglit lier courage in striking straigl atone at the false foundation on wumsu's wiiole 1f. was then I but the courage likewise of hi tary liope tliat it miglit be r upon as fin sund free a basis i tif. of inu. Witli regard te the second pr tion, the. demand for civil right littie book in question voices fi first time wliat John Stuart A botdly pro4ilaimed a little tater, given deinocracy, womau mu main comparativcly powertess s4 as tiie franchie is denied lier. practical accomplieliment of thi mand remains to lie thrasied future, but as a matter of abi riglit it stands to-day unquest At thec date, iiowever, of the pli tion of this book thieadvocati univereal suffrage was disi siioeking. Noue k-new better i than Mary Wollstonecraft herse ridicule it would provoke; t] would lie considered and con44 as the. wllde.t of ail lltopian ael Yet, laugliter to the. coutrary, hi mand su early formulated ha ouly pereisted througli two eeni but repeats itself anew as a c",
         "V.-WAR INFIRMITIES AND TI4ERAPEUTIC MARVELS N a study of thie war it ia unecrtain whielh rouiýs the myost wonider, the en- gines of destruction, the unprecedented phiysical effects on the soldiers, or development of surgery and medi- !. The remarkable adivane(,e of the truetive mnachine» I have already ited in p art, although each stuc- jing week proves that there le no it to it. At the time of the pen- z ot that part there were no0 s\", althougli a few of us had ~e unproclairned idea of their coin- ; and even they are but the bc- rxlng ot war's frightfulness. bhe u ide of war lesa known to the ,lie, becausqe les dranistic. les tsant to contempltite, le-ss iinedi- y inaterial to the progresa of vie- r, is the physical conditions in- ed by this novel struggle. In the days of stand-up fighiting, of uiere s and rifles, where smie shadow ào.uonr clnng te both sides, there g'all incentive to advanced suir- Li methoda and praetically none new medical idea8. Soldiers fell roed by a bullet or a sword. or a ýe'and the result differed imma- allyfromthe accidents of daily Sikeswas merely the sick- opf iviian life and was treated iut wlth the arrivai of trench war- y vrything altered, frein the niiro the .Ôldier te bis ailments and treatient. It is no longer a inatter of paasing out fromn a camip to a pre-arranged battlefield, like a great military tournamient, with re- tirement at fail of dairkness for rea;t and care of the wounded. There are noecamnps now, save rest-camps, where the soldiers are ont of the struggle for a definite period. Tho fighit i. carried on without. roasing fromn ex- poaed trenehes that imake camp lite at the rear a reot indeed. And retire- ment la temporary defeat; reat is biit the substitution of brigades or diviq- ionis whose period o! relief lias ox- pired. Whoever heard of \"trench-shins» or «trpeh-foot» before this war? Or of sheli-shoeckt?» And even nepliritia and rheumatiam and hernia, wbile ilinesses o! poace, have become mu4eh more the- illniesses o! the style of warf are ini F'landers and France. \"Tronchi-shiins\" may sound liko a flip- pant naine for an unimiportant ail- ment, but te the sufferer it is tomnpOr- arily as bad as a serious wound and lois oager to respond to treatinont. In reaity it itqa form otrheuxatism that attacks the lowor part of the. leg in painful terni, duo tu standing in mud and water. It is as incapaci- tatingin tino as a shrapnel wound. \"Shel-shok\" a more desc-riptive, but tala utterly in the indefinîtenoas of its application; for shell-shock maY rag froIia niere mental surrender of te mmenttoataring maduiOsa Or",
         "TERE CANADIAN MAGAZINE complete aud everlasting paralysis. Nephritis, an inflammation of the kidnecy s, bias attaeked many an other- wise strong soidier, and at the first of the war was not appreciated in al its seriousness by the doctors, iargely because its induceient by suelh a con- dition was, of course, entirely new. But soon it entered into the list of diseases which received special eon- sideration and yielded Wo modern therapeuties with gratifying readi- ness. Of course, iu its favour stood the phiysical record of the sufferer, whose presence in the army denoted a constitution prepared for its eradi- cation. That it was taken iu time stands to the well-being of hundreds of Canadians whose previous health had unfltted them for describing their symptoms to the docetors. Other kldney diseases have been iu- duced by exposure in the trenches, bc- ing assisted by conditions of diet and bodlly protection and came. But with the more careful stu.dy of resuits the soldier bias been safe-guarded lu a manner neyer thouglit possible at the beginnlng o! the war. The menace o! rheumatlamn was more thoroughly understood from the Et rst, and it bas always reccivcd spe- cisi freatmeut. \"Yrozen' feet are seldomn frost-bitten, but a form of rheurnatismn caused by the eontinued cold aud damp. The provision o! trench mats, a raised slat walk aloug the bottom o! the trench, has donc xnuch Wo kecp feet dry-at least Wo give themi a chance Wo dry. Neyer after that awful first winter hiave those fathoiesa depths o! mud so lucon- venienced and threatened the soldiers. der ail kinds of conditions. 1 are wire fences Wo ereet, wound4 bie retrieved under fire, istrez. night patrolling. And, while r transport bias been developed to pletenesac at the rear, everytblug the front lune is the work of i hands. Take an ordinary nighlt' dutiE relieving column la golng iu. in itsel! is a novelty of this And each mn carrnes a load woiild frighteu hlm under peace ditions. lIn addition Wo bis equip of rifle, cartridges and pack, lie1 ably staggems along under a rN barb wire, or fence-posts, or q supplies for those wbo rmin a front. And the conditions ol proacli to the front line are lu t selves a strain. Perbaps for the lucoming soldiers twist and aud bump along through utter 4 ness in a trench not wide enoue give them case of swing, an crooked that a wall always seeu be faciug thein. Here and therg holes, probabiy filled with w cave-lus, the chaos o! recent sb.el dropped equipmeut and supplies. physical stralu la, of course, tre dous. And Wo evade thre lrmltati\u003c bliud trench progress some who ferWtorisk the open stagger into 1 holes or deep trenches whose firs nouncemeut la colucident wltlr a broken ribs or a brulaed body. 'V mng unannounced luto a six trench lu the dark la not a recm Wo encourage. Thec most iuteresting of thre h effects la shell-shock, both ro varlety of ils evidencea and ro treatinent. Essentially a tigo war, its every mood andtws or rifle 1 must be trenches",
         "WITII CANADIANS FROM THE FRONT to some slight extent from, it; and my own observation leads me te helieve it. Ita existence is noticeable in a petul- anee at unnecessary or sudden noise, and in the apparently unireconeilable affets of extramne sensitiveness to ir- ritation and extreme indifference. [n ita Iêet serions recognized form it uiay go no fuirtier than a slighit trembIing under exeitement, perhaps a profuse perspiration. Suifferers by th. thousand8 have been temiporarily relieved of trench life for nothing more than a startledl shrinking nt the gound of a gun. Ith las been fouind that it is mit better to give the suf- ferer a chance te recover fromn the flrmt slight symptomes than te leave it until monthe of careful treatment ie r.quired. A slightly more advaneed stage in smre is the, perspiration that breaks out. the debilitating affects of whlèh anyone ean appreciate. O\u003ef course, sheIl-shock ie the resuit of the. guins. Ini morne cases it may corne from the mare overwhelming roar itseaf, as anyona may have fait the. mental irritation caused by the uproar in a staînpiug miii. But usuai- lthe physical condition of the sol.. dierprotctshlm until the sheill bec- gin to erowd hlm in quantities that legve him ne tima fer reeovering his pdise. But the. avant of bombardment tbat claims its shell-shock victime by the score ail along a much strafed line in fring huriPA by tihe earth thrown up by an exploding shahl. Very few ae of siiall.shock have 1 ancounter- ed tiiot were not indueed b\u003e' thiq ter- r4ifng experience or started on their way b\u003e' it. The. stor\u003e' of ehell-shock lends iteaf t. dramnatie effects, to startling nar- ratin of incident, for ln it lies at tie, the. weirdness of mental nbal- \u0026nc of phy-sical uncontrol, of ludic- rogaction, of mystifylng and sud- Wnere the. effect is sligh-it ma\u003e' Dotappar light te the uiuntiated- lytat the. onicêker sees but the. funu\u003e' im fit. This is increased by the knowledga that shal-shock le ordin- arl\u003e but temporary in its serions af- fecta. For instance, seated at a caird- table one evening with a Frenei(h.Catia- dian soidiar who ieokad fit for any trench, somecone brushed a tin\u003e' ash- tra\u003e' into hia lap. Instantly, trivial as the incident was, oe, hand hegn te shake s0 vioiently as te tbreatan the table itself. It was early in mny acquaintance with shcll-ehock, and while I rpeognized it imimediatoly 1 was nxueh embiarraed for the sutf- ferar. But embarrasmnt was uni- called for. For a second or two hae watched hie own right hand waving back and forward as if it helonged te someona else. Then he calmi\u003e' seized it with hie laft and hald it. stili1, simil- ed down on it, and addressed it iu the inoqt plaasantly detaehed nmnner:* \"blld on, thoe. Easy now, (easy.\" Twepntyv seconds later ha was deaing. The raiaving featura of it la thiat the boys themaisvves trcat it so lightly. A certain faw make fun of it in others. and ]av it te \"funtk\". But there la non(e cf that in the vaat ma- jority of c-ases, V..' uffering with othera, colonels with privatea: and maïn\u003e of themn are, as eagar as their more fortuniata coinrades te raturn te the fight. While, cf course, it la \"9nervas\", it le a formn that comne so suddanly in its worst type ai; te be uneoinhattable. To me it lsa lways distreqqing, and soetimas beyond de- scription ln its dlira effecta on the narvous systenu for the tinie being. One cf its worst forma la te depriva the. sufferer temporaril\u003e' of silht, or speech, or power of movement. That mental equipment has smre influence on it seame evident frcm the tact that, at least ln tbWse forma, it la niuch more prevalent among Imperial than axncng Canadian troopa. One Cania- dian soldier 1 khow was paraiyzed at first freux head te foot. When I met him power had returned as far down as his legs, and he was most cheerful and bopeful. Slowly 11f. erept dc'wn- ward, accompanied b\u003e' pains- lik. nheumatism, and sccu lie waa walking.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE The cures--that is the wonderful part of it. I3eing '\u003cnerves\", it smre- times demanâs treatment that miglit appeai to the. outsider as cruel. There are in Londo\u003en special liospitals de- voted Wo its cure. It was fouind that the treatment it demand\u003cjd could not b. administered in the ordiniary lies- pital, nor could the disease b. studied save by those whose attention wa8 undiverted by the other injuries of ivar. TPhe essence of treating niere trein- blilig is absolute mental rest, with mufficient physical exertion to keep the mind engaged witliout fatiguing body or mind. This, too, is the inethod for thie final stage of recovery in aill cases. By the experiences of one con- valescent home situated in the. xidst o! a large garden, werk in the. gardan produced surprising resuits. The pa- tients were set Wo raking or tending flowers or keeping a certain path in condition. On the resuits was found- ed a specia liospital at Buxton. The work must be quiet, free froni suddeu noises and movernents, and restful ini invalid's chair and leaped in Thames Wo save a sinking gir a \"'revue\" an actor flred a pist\u003c a helpicas paralytie jurnped feet. It la the knowledge of these cries that lias developed a trei along lines hitherto, unrecogni; therapýutics, In shell-shock ho~ mesîncrismni s a standard expe: that is frequently effective. Tb2 tors bully unmnercifully at tirn\u003c tii the exasperated dumb patiE presses his anger. More than o, found it impossible except by o! rnouth Wo convey his repug at the doctor'a frank convictio lie is faking. A doctor cornes chair of a paralytic and suddei ders hlm Wo stand. In slieer si: and alarm the patient inay obE tlie doctor seats hiniself quietly bedside of a speechiesa patient and begins te, talk. Thi. patient*a and replies before lie rernemb( affiction. Once a nurse so ai a patient by telng hlmn that 1 no gentleman that lie ezplode\u003c vivid recital of lis impresuic lier, althougi lie liad not spok, weeks. In another case speech retur- Lui, WUUmz5 UILAVM their work, mia mself. The reco-, nusrng. A duni presses to, is lips cigarette--aud the One",
         "WITHI (ANAULANS PROM% TI-E FRONT a~t further maltreatment; and yields.ý The. dumb or blind or paralyzed shil1- sbocked soldier leada the 'life of a dogfor his own good. For the ordinary cases, especially wbere tiie evidence of shell-shock ia localized in a limb, massage in most beneficial, the subtie progresa., of the. treatmnent froin sooting gentienesa to aitiff kieadmng and rapping-always under medical advice-breaking clow-n the. barrier of nerves. Pthapa the disease which the pub.. li and the soldier have xnost feared i. spinal ineningitis. Evideuce seems te prove that the Cana.dians brought kt te Englatnd early i the war, but its spread-in 80 far as it did spread --atinot b. ageribed to the Cana- dians. The infection of an English nurse who (lied from it was traced te ber association with a Canadian offiosr, who was found to b. a germn carrier; but other cases have develop- edi France where there were no 4Canadians. Tiiere lias not been muchl ous of tif. from it, and its treatment liasad yanoed *0 the point where there is Uitil, danger. I have talked with à umber of Canadians who have cern- peeyrecovered, althougii rccovery ig 1*w.I seerna that the. disease ia being carefufly watched, and when take early ia net neceasarily danger- oup Three or four English physi- ejas have made a apecial study of it. At thistine it isaafe tesay that at one stage of the, war the most seri- ous menace te the Engliali amius was me e. The details of its preval- ence during two or three montija of the second year will probably never bekown, but wiiole camps were in qwratne. No one but the. authori- tiswill ever know the. anxiety that temst remarkable advance. It was slebut front a variety of sepsis tbt oeeied te breed in the. very soit .f Pance. Wounds i thernslves trivial dcveloped seriouisly, snd the word went forth thiat the utmnost eni- denvour must b. made ti\u003e dresa the Sliglitest wounds as quiekly as pos- sible and to, get the wvoindcd mani back to, the. hospitals witheut delay. There the main effort was towârds frustrating septicomia, luicsas been marvellous. EN-en shirapnel wominds, the worst of ail and the. meut likely to become infected, are looked uponi with tess anxiety. The very method of disinfecting altcred, and as thuls is writig it is atiil altering. That, of course, iR the. esscee of wound treatmeut. The old application of peroxide of hydrogen. the. standard the. world ever before the. war, lias been 1.1* somewhat i the limbo of tii. past. lodine, ini various forms, is thie imm.diate hope; and it has justified itueif. lIn hea- pital it changes again. A Simple saline solution that anyone cani make in a few minutes la the universal dis- infectant a.nd cleanser. Its curative properties have astounded the. pro- fession. It is a returu to grand- xnether's rexn.dy, but uligiitty altered in preparation andi strength. Now anew method is being experi- ment.d witii by the. eelcbrated Ameni- can physiciaxi Dr. Carrol. lits solu- tion la simple but more or ts arbi- trary at tis stage, snd its appica- tion la a development of ftusiuing tia.t has prevailed for maxny monthu nt the. front. Tii. result thus far la a wowxd iieal.d in a fifti of the. tinte formerty ewxsidered aifcoy with the. application of a celluloid eovering *0 the. wound beneath tii. dreuing. Tii. oellutoid does net ad- here, and in r.dreming the 'wound la never irritated and the. patient la saved mucii guff.ning. MuMh of the. suceeca of the. hespi- tala depends upon the. attitude of the wouuded. Neyer have mxen goe tiirough so mucii with such lightnew",
         "THE~ CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE of beart, such unfaltering courage. I will nover forget a viuit te one of the largoat London hospitals whore spocial attention was paid t\u003c\u003e face wounds. The doctor, showing me smre of the worst cases-Il would soon have had enough had it not beon for the cheer of the suifferers-brought me to a bed wbere a Scots lad bad recoivod enougli shrapnel lu the face te bave killed him at any other stage of the world's medical devolopmnent. I will nlot doscribe bis face, as it bad healod. Sufflcient te say that one oye was gone, the other equafly useless for any practical purposo. «How tbe thinga. to-day?» inquir- ed the doctor, iu that carelons way which alune admits inquiry conceru- ing health, In the broadest of Scots the poor, doformed face lifted iteof towards the doctors and a patient amise twistod it. \"Canny, doctor, canny.» Thon with a surge of exul- tation, a if every il had dropped from hlmn: \"I cen see the light.» \"I cau see the. hght 1\" Jow petty the. indispositions of civiliau life! \"What got yen?1\" I skod a Toronto lad, the terrible condition of whose bead wam conceaied by dreusings that had been ebanged twlce a day for a year. He grinned. «Don't kîiow. Must have been a ixteon-ineh. shell, direct bit, I tbink,» ho laugbod. His only worry was how the silver plate which be weuld be compelled te wear through life wuuld act under tho cold of Canada. The work of the surgeons ia beyond belief unIons one ia moviug amidst it. Thousands of men will return te Can- ada capable of resumirig their work, who would nover have had a chance w'der the surgical knowledge of even the. beglnning of the war. And thon- the theorias of pro-war dayE su much of the recovery la pra painless that the wouuded sc openly congratulated hy bis c ions. Tt means \"bligbty» fg snd comparative comfort. \"You shouldn't be here; yui ho dead,\" blurted ont a dont lad whose forehead, from tet temple, a bullot had pluughod the fortunate fellow knew nc venience save tbe dressings. Hospital la pretty nearly lie the soldier who bas spent mui lu the front linos in tho, win- son, 1 porsonally know many who, convalescing lu the eunu from old wounds, purpoely d the doctors su as te roturn tronches by oarly fail witb the. of getting back woundod te t pitals for tho winter. It le ont best influences on his fighting moldier dreads the tronches mie the wouinds that will moud him rear. Hie may ho killed-al the chances are unbelievably i but if he la only wuunded ho ing te take the chances. The last stage o! relltting i dier for tho flght of life la v book te itself. New limbe ti almost like the original, nery boues that are made once mon thoir work, muscles that are ri -the dotails are as wouderful rarenees of amputation, An medical science is ln its infancy is une of the grandoat resuit. war, that the science of huma sorvatien recognizes more than did ite iucompletenens and ia mined te seek the remedy.",
         "TI VILLAGE STREET tpaintinE 6\u003ey )X-divralKowm",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "rbc Ztegçc of 0ernt1a111 trom tbc %Ca BY COMM.ýANDER CARLYON BELLAIRS THE PIRST 0F A SERIES 0F ARTICLES ON~ WHAT MIGKT BE CALI.ED \"THE LAST PHASE OF THE WAR \" 'articles by Englishinen, addlrcssed to neultrasý it ie frequenttly arue that the Kaiser'e silly charge l u ~that we bronglit on thle war leiepoe by vour taillure to prepareý an armny. It wvould b. botter te receognize any Iack of pmparation as oir taemnsfolly, adIa the l\"son to look ahead and mne.t the future. AR our alliance consists of five frt- (!]a navieg agait two, and wiel ding foeý ofe at least three to one, the con- ditions afioat are more favourable than these for whichi we have always lie! our navy prepareti. The Allies bave a reserve ef naval strength f ar gr#aler than bas existed lu the land wgr. They have consequently hati no ditri,-ulty i earrying ont the chief ôje et ar in thfat they have main- teln'd at sece all their military and ftnmfactivities while completely d.en:Dr. the surface of the sea te the tnmy. exeept i the Bialtie anti the Se of Marmoera. This sueeess we bnw froni history eould not end a wur but it le a condition leadlng te a !ýtrioiis peacep It je enly wlien we eamvine the seeondary objecte of n valwr that we see indications of fatrdue te the fact that we did m l ahead. and that the different navies dli not thses le co-ordinated and i nitedl effort of onev fore, under asing1le diretion. Our forefathere, for instanler, knew how te hnndie a situation where nieu- trais like Ilollanti snd Denar\u003c were supplying soie of the trade an enemiiy could tnt get into hie own ports di- rect. Vasýt neutral itereste have been Preated in thus,. modern formn of emugging.interestsa which nlot only Nvork for Geyimany, but will power- fully, influencee these neutrals, whose territory mîiglit be so uiseful te usq i th(- strategy of war, against iterven- ing at a favourable moment, as Hou- iania lias (lonie. Driftig ito errer la, uisusaly fellowed by cioncea1ment et err-or, snd this bias net only been the cp.se i regard to the blockade, but in other directions. For instance, '.\\r Bplfonr in hie eentroversy with Mr. Chumichill, revealed that the Admiirai., ty hati faileti te antieipate the need for- cruisers on the routes te defend, our trade, and had net previded sa single suibmarine-proof harbour on the six-hundred-mnile streteli of our east cst. The worst case of uriexplain- ed inaction was the failure te mnake cotton eontmaband. Hlad this beeii done any time durig the flrst six menthe et wam, the enemny would have exhausted hie available efficient pro",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE peilent explosives, and the. war would have ended months ago. What that means to tihe Empire, and alinost every faniiiy in it, can easily be ima- gined. Taice the Zeppelins, as an- other examrple. W. posscssed photo- graphsq and] measuremients o! every detail of the, Zeppelin type bef ore the war. 'We did flot build one, and yet the. argument is clear. Germany was sure to use the submarine and mine, and nmade no secret of the. ini- tention Our naval s.ouitlng eould tiierefore be most efficiently donc by a Zeppelin, whieh cotild mnanoeuvre for many hours elean o! both these dan- gers, and sec earos mnuel greater ancas than a surface vessel. Another exaxnpie wiicre imagination would have helped us was the. mine-field, since w. did not provide any ses mines until long after war was de- clared. Lines of mines are the trenches of the oea, more potent than trenches on shore, for their position 18 nnknown to the. enemy, and no artillery ean destroy thern. So long as tiie enemy's fleet exists, mines ean oniy be removed by vesl protectpd by a superlor ficet, and that involves too great a nlê o! attack by sub- marines. On. more instance is per- missible o! bow the brain o! the. navy failed to get Wo work. W. provided the best submarines, but we dld not send any Wo the. Baltie until a !ew went tiiere several montis after war broke out. What waa the. obvious lin. have catused us to send a large flo- of submarines to the Bnltie on about the outbreak of war, ere rangements could be made to prci us. The resuit of our failure to face future-and miany other cases ci be cited-is titat after over two y of war, againet a navy whici (lare engage in battie, we bave yet 1 denied by mines ail entranee into Baltie, the Dardanelles, and iute tensive areaR of water off the Cier coasts. 'We have vacillated iii a known to ail iii our blockade, an( have faiied to terminate Germun trade wýNith Sweden. Nearly al inovemnents in the Northi Ses an( vealed to the Gerînans by Zeppe and to judge by the numbecr of tr we ireep in Great Brîtain tiie n authorities have given no guanol against invasion. Across the ture of \"the mighit have becn\", i bc written \"Too Late\". W. are starters, good stayers and sure fiers; and our navy lias splený atoned for administrative inist: It was broughit late in thoe criais t unprepared base, but seanmanship superior to ail difficulties. In the. tie of Jutland flot oniy did oiuw show tbemselves superior in mla but the. Germans were both strat aIly and tactically defeated, es only through the information \u0026 IIWL",
         "TUE SIEGE 0F' GERMANY FROM TuTE SEA Board should b. relieved of their ad- mninistrative rouitine work. and hold the. po-s among themi of Dirertors of the. War Staff, Operations anid Air Services. The present Detosare not onu the B~oard, which is kcplt to\u003c\u003e busy with miere rouitine dutiesq whlich tax energy and] crampl imaiginaition1. (hi thie whole the navy hias (Jonie se w.Ul afloat thiat one longis to se itsi own bighi standard ppito thiose in rontrol ashore. Thekowdg tbat tiiere is rooni for irnprovemient is reaIily a moqt enconragting thouight, berauise with every dvnewe in- cease tii. str'igeney' of ouir siuge of Qceimauy. The navy's grea-t seirvice ar sn obivionis that M r. lBlfour's aie statemieit. of themr drsic to the coeuntrymeni of the navil hiistoriiant Admiri Mahan, secmied hiardIy nec (es- sry. Thi. fuisa mrade over the. Moerce and fthe Deut.qchland, by a nation whieh in peace-tirie p)os'ssed the sec- ondt navy and tii. second mercantile marine in the world, apcaksý volumes oa te tihe siege of Germianiy in one dirertion, and contraqs with the vqnularity wlth wieh fie suopp)lies of the. Allies pass over the saas. The fail of the. lai of the. OCrian colonies aend the conaequent release of B~ritish ship- pig mployed, shows vividly the. opsr.tions of our sea- powe-r in an- other direction. The Ge(rmains know of it, dr.amn of it, feel it in every fibre of their bodies-thiq tyranny o! \"ilpowr. it leads Jlindcýnburg te ei,ýinthat England la iie enviny. It. is wiiat brouglit. Napolcon dowu ad tie hlm ery ont t. bis generals atter a victory: «W. wanit greater thnsthan tuis, we wvant ships, col- oeo anti commiierce.\" SlowIy thie dir coviosnesa that British scla- pýwe wil make an end o! Pruissian militarisa turuing te stark reality. Ourbransmust get to work ou tiie polmof iiow to use our sca-power wtb theut effeet. If tii. Qermians \u0026fkthey can cireurrivent it, that tugtwifl prolong the. war. For eeYman and woman tti.n the pro- blmis to make the Oovernment bring home te Germany the bopelessneus of such'1 an idea. ri O n thod ii piib- livity«.- If w, are really buiilding t.o t110 filil limiita o! our 'resouirres, the more Çlermainy' knows o! it tiie botter,. If wc ,;itk ubanethie sooner Geran hars o! it tii, hetter. If Wc 1 gt muitilons from Amierioka let Ilic faet b.rubbed(, in. To -onartrain neutlrals hoefronticra mairch witii thfio of Germnany is the. wayv to rea*sh tliciiiimmd of tlhe ilin»,. for h.( wlill very soion hevar nnd feel our action. When he feels that li. is se ringed in thait there is nio reliuf fromn any point of the copsho %ill b. 1» ti. moud teql I Fiuircnder. M4s allies nimst e ouir son-power not inerely paiýsivPly but art ively,. Let uis remember tliat botli Nelson and Duntdonald were keen avatso! coastal operatiorna. Syria, wiici offers a piroini-sin ield for sick raids, was the scene e! Sy dney Siuii'. sucsflexploit lit Acre againu,ýt Na. poleon, -causing tii. latter to say that a Britîsh captain made lmii mii1ss his destinly ! The test o! tii... operationsq la that tii.Y shotfl infliet great damnage ini proportion to the force employed and cauise a large force o! tlii, enemy to b. abaorbed in the defensive inistrati ef the. offensive, othcrwise thicy corne uiider Napoleon's ban that \"the Eng- lisilove to wage war insinai pac- kets\". To know what toavoid isuusimprt-. ant as to know what te do. 1 ain con- stantly teld that we ouiglt te emlpley ail our destroyers in bunting sub- marines, and our fleet iu kniocking H1eligoland to pierea. That eertainty la flot the Jellicoe touch. It was by having isi destroyers witii humii thiat Sîir Jo011n JelliCOe.9 mRble te wO- plish s. naucii at the. batti, of Jutland. It was a terrible mnistake to give up 11ellgoland, but we do net wvipe eut oujr miatake by piling ano'chcr on top of It. There is, hoever, a point at wih it ID redundant te add te theIi. 1gb Seas Flt and thia should leave a large surplus of vessls for )aunting",
         "TI-E (JANADIAN MAGAZINE through the North Sea and proteet- ing the tirade to Hrolland, and through the S-'kaggerack. We eau do more with the Allied navies, and oui' great object la ta make their pressure and offensive feit simuiltaineoulsly with. the offensives on ail fronts by the arnicas on shore. The subrnarine huint is foremost ainong these secondary ob- jec(tivesq because thie suibmîarines inter- fere with the transport of troops and munitions, and seusibly reduce day by day the 3,600 ocean-golng steamers with whieh we started this war. So much are Our' steamers wanted iu this 'war that we have taken over haif, or fifty-two per cent., for the war pur- poses of the Allies. The important thing is te turu the hunted into the bunter hy armning ail the steamers. A twelve-knot Italian steamier is said to bave receutly sunk one subniarine sud beaten off two on her way to New York, and it la signifleant that ln spite of the operations of the UT53 an armed Itahian steamner sailed, while uuarmed British steamers postponed their sailinga. The war statisties are conclusive as to the advautage of arn- ing. not ouly the steamers, but al patrl hotshunting for subnarines. Ifteguns are equally available for siuking fioatlng mines and firing at Zeppelins, all the botter. Econony of guns and men eau be obtained by ehangiug themi over froin vessels pass- inig out of the submariue zone to those passing lu. That is a detail. The im»- portant things to remember are that it takes tino to replace a lest nier- chant ship, it is expensive to build, and it luterferes with naval work. Fron every point of view it isbetter lln nrlat c1iinu ÇLnmPtimM. U' more rapid than by the poor ru Systems to be foulid ucar the co thie eastern basin of the Mcditi eau. Sholdf the military plan i- junetion with Ruissie. aujd Roll open uip a road froin those coul to thie Mediterranean, whcat su wnifl corne te uis b)y a quieker than the Argentine. Always we mlust distiniguis tween what is vital and wliat is ly, useful. Tit is net vital that so of Our' shipping- should brlng lis than whbat is nece\u003e,(ssary iu supplý that it should dlance attendan oui' uavy merely becauise it nl ulseful lu some conjectulral ci stances. 'We ned a stoek-talcij quiry ou the use of shipping si it may bc employ' ed on whiat la Eut let lis keep what we have inerchant RIhips by arming themn a subinariie would dare work c surface in action if aUi erchaut were arme(], and their speed the surface la not more than I kuots, or possibly fourteen kn. a couple of hoursin the Latest Let us, furthermore, recognize t we buiild a few Zeppelins. they'ý be, lu association with our fias seaplanes, moire than a match number of German Zeppelins,,a complicate the Germnu uavy's ing tacties. If oui' naval me were eo-ordiuated with those c Russians in the l3altie, it is quit sible to break the Baltie blocke i ?urpose ,posing 1 DW 10 use LeiOO d the canal syst lien they are on, ast point is the e made more st",
         "TUE SIEGE 0F GERMANY FROM TRE SEA eome under the Prussian heel of miii- ta.risin if it is loat. The geater right t'ô defend c-ivilizatin swalows up thé, luser righit of international laws formed before raiWys gave new, mnana of supplying an eneiny and a nsw meantng to a principle imore than one enunoiated in ouir prize-vourts thlat a neutra ought not tu aequire a new mrade ith our enexny by reason of the facot that the ennysshipping bi been driven) off the sea. AIl these coosiderations point to tlle fart thiat we hae ÉPtimeans ut our diposai of bcinging an inervasig preammue to benr on our envnmy, aind if under the present iuild conditions of' our siege of Olermiaty the Huit las begunv to \"ÇSqiueail\", we have every reason to Ilope for SatifautorY resuits as our sen power strenigtheng1.' to a stranigie. hold. In the case of Gree we have pre- scriptive rights under our guarantee of the Constitution UNd undur the treaties, alid it is-- perillissible to point out that with her coast% the Corinth Canal, and the majorty of the pe\"p1e on our aide, sea power cani very ei ee- tiioly be brouight into action so as to vIear up) the situation inil very short tiner To bring Greeto our aide woild save us inueh transport worK, besides gvinig uis vtryili the East againat the Germait railway systemi to C'OnStanlt inople. Tii Ill xtm aticle in tubs svebs la vmntild -qlq, strage.hol un the chaman y yst.m\". It iâ written by Wiiamn LoQllei, the. famou\u003esu autllority on secret tierdev \u0026a Continvntal 81py systerm, anl author of \u003c'Spi4of uthtei Kainter\". etý..",
         "Cd2%k1,LR NELtUTIkf\\ J/j'c5s * TI1E suggestion arose ln this way. One evening gt dinner we were dis cusgsing the origin of the w ar, and eter some argument Professor Meor- \u003can said, with his usual air of au- thorlty: \"«We have only circumstantial evi- dence, buit it amouints te a dernonstra- tien. Ail the lines converge, and the effeet le cumulative. Germany want- ed and wiled the war.\" \"'Oh,\" said Mrs. Crawford, eue of the day boarders, \"that depends on the poi nt of vlew. Possibly the Unes are pareil An illusion o! perspec- tive, Professor Mefrgan.' \"An ingenlous argument,\" said the pro~feor, with unusuâl deference te a contrary opinion, \"but there la a xnarked convergence net attributabie te the point of view. Indeed, there is but eue scientifle point of view-that ýf fia im ni nhse.rver. the neutral. ,\"fnow should I know. Mrs. ford? 1 amn not the Lord Go~ even the Kaleer. Buit this wil it wals inevitable. it haid te be. \"Inevitiible! t ad te be!\" bi Prof essor Morgan. \"In that everythiing le inevitable. We e disci sqing phllosophy. The qi is-who wanted the war? Who it? Who le to blainet \"I blaine xobody,» said the ln a sad voice, «although 1 ha relatives and friends on botb 1 will say, even, that 1 pardon body. Tot comprenIdre est to- dornner. Not tbiit 1 understaný but the more 1 understancl th iotmi ron i p)art: tý5F Y. 16.Coru",
         "OUR NEUTRAL SPY the Baron. «Ail growing nations are aggreuiive. But consider the aggres- giveneua of England, of Russia. No, the pot mnust flot eall the kettie black. They ail miake the saine isýtake.\" «WVhat mistaike R\" \"Theý mistake of thinking thant there la not roomn for ail. The world is large, Profe-ssor Morgan, and thecre ia rOomIl for boath Clermaiuis am Egls yes. even for Russins. Their inter- mos are muituali, harmionioius, if onfly they knew it. Whenl they reallize this there -wili lie prosperity, good-will, diYou tnlk like N.\"ormniAugli, said the Professeý,r, becoining personal. \"Tes,», said the Baroni. \"I arn hlm dicile sd, I arn proud te i-, i friend. île is an Arnerioan, niirnost.» ,,lie la a god mn\"said flue Pro- frsor, aomnewhat mnollified by the( cern1- pl iient, \"buit he la anl optimiist, a mraier.» «1A11 prophets are direamers, Pro- \"TYes, but iiot ail are safe leaders. If England had Iistpcned te thec paci- fiqts. what vould she hiave been to- ,day? A lamb i the miidst of wolves. It is well that mIe had a fcw Dread- nogta, if nothing else. A Cassan- dri the. prophet thiat England needs, and we also-not fools that cry, ?ue Peacel wben there is no «B1ut» iterposed Mrs. C'rawford, qckyseizing the oppoi'tnniity to rgore harinony between the deliaters, 694puld we not try te ailay suspicion and cltivate good feeling between tenations? Thc pacifists have done g work in this way, have they \"Pmoilby,» admitted Professor Mogngrudgingly, \"but if 1 were plnigto attack my enemy 1would oranytry to allay bis suspicion»\" Thswas a well-aimed shot, anid 1 tugtI Raw the Baron winee as it @tukhome, but lie made no reply. Pretnt h.b excused hinself and wetto isroom, where his light was bninguntil long after midnight. The rest of ns adjourned to the mit- ting-room, where we discussed the~ Baron aud hi-, neutrality. Ile is too neutral for me\"said ProfesKsor Morgani suddenvily, \"Ile la lit lenst a gentlemlan, Raid Mrs. Crawford indignant1y, \"Yen ln- suiltedl hlmn Professer Mra. \"I did so initenttioiually,\" said the Pro fesser grlniiy. l'in Germangy you wouil Ne eailed ent for tha,,t.» \"I1 kiiow it,» replied tii. Professer ralui)ly. \"jXnd it woul int he 0fluir8t timie, bi-y anyv meansiiý. I rernber an- ether sciaristooerat at 1Teide1berg, anid our little afitair. lms s\"rene transpareneyv was pucueand ho was ini the hiospital for a miouth. Oddi- ]y eneuigli, lie was a Poseniberg, to\u003e-- an iunielo, or couisin, no doifft, for the resemhi an e la strikinig. Parillat t \"Why Prfesor, exclaitmed ýMs Crawford, \"I hand ne idea thitt yo»u were suehi a fire-e;iter. But why should youi attack the innocent nepbew or cousin V\" \"le is a spy, Mrs. Crawford.» \"Asp)y! Profteasor, how eau yen?'\" '\u003cMasuingas apcfs. «Impossible i lan absolute neu- traL\" \"Suispiciously $o,\" \"If you are right, Prof essor, h. must b. a most consummnate hypo- crite.» '«That la what 1 think. D\u003eo yoiI know that h. wam an offleer lu the \u003cJermnan armny for seven yearst' \"What of that, Professor? Hle is retircd.\" \"Tes. And after that lie upent somne years iu England, ehieily as a student at the University of Oxford.\" «Why nett There are many Gjer- malis in Eiigland.Y \"Exaetly.\" \"But h. waa a prominent advocate \"Eve o. The movement bas been worth ,twenty arycorps oGr \"Tes,» broke in~ the instructo in",
         "TUIE CANADIAN M-%AGAZINE phyuical culture, \"the Baron's whole mariner ia that of a German army of- llcer. Notice his posture sitting or standing, bis walk, and the way lie clicks his heels together as lie hows. He shows his training.\" 4'ýWhatt square shoulders lie las !\" said the suffragette. «A'ýnd how sien- der his waist! Ucl wears corsets, you xuay be sure. -But did you mark bis maniner toward women? Overbear- iug and offensive to a degree. Yes, indeed, lie may well be a spy.» But have von noticed the change in tie food since hie camet\" said the instructor in dornestic science. «The cook la a Germait, you know. Now she puta caraway seeda in the soup and vinegar lu the potatoes, and we have httd sauierkraut twice in one week. It coqspiexous.\" «WeIL». said 1, trying to divest my- self of all bias, \"I have said nothing hitherto because I felt that we lad. not Jooked at the question from al] ides. Oue of the chief vices lu modern thinkiny la that we do not take ac- co fail the facto\u003ers lu huinan lite, that w-e do not consider social reality as a whole. We omit to allow for some cause, some motive, and our whole train of thought la vitiated. Tour method la wrong, Professor Mor- gan, You should have more tacts, and still more tacts, betore allowing yourself to theorize.» \"I have ail the tacts I need,» said the Professor very positively. \"You sociologiats are always looking at tacts, and neyer perceive their tmue relations. Ail thc great discoveries have been made by a sort of leap lu thonght, a streteli of the imagination, tion. It la most unfair, inhospi, un-American.\" Mrs. Crawford's desertion tc eneuxy's aide was something of a to IProfessor Morgan, as le had on very good terns with the y widow before the arrivai of thc B and the, boarders were beginnir gossip about them. Bunt now the fessor lad an additional moti% spur hlm on, and lie redoubIeý efforts to prove his case, with thi suit that le soon collected a cons able amounit of circumstantiai evide(ncýe, vcry damnaging, as Mu us thougît, to the Baron's neutri, Only Mrs. Crawford and littie Miller, thc exponeut ot the M.No soni system, doubted and even culed bis conclusions; and, we b( cd, told the Baron what was 1 said, thus putting hlm on bis g and preparing hlm for the luevi crisis. Meanwhile, the Baron appearE bc quite unconscious of our su~ ions, for he conversed amicably everybody, and showed nu dispos to evade a discussion of thee question of the day lu any oi phrases. Indecd, lie took part fi in ail our conversation, and no eould tell by word or toue, or other aigu, that bia feelings wer volvcd in the slightest degrcc, or lie tavourcd onie aide more thau",
         "OUR NEUTRAL SPY Baron as an interloper and iia enemny, and tried to mnake hilm comnpromise bimsf in every possible wnty. Strange to sy, the Baron pre.#'nfl gave hirti txactly the opening wti i e dc-,cr2,d, ad the astute Professor was neatiy lad into a (lerman trap. We were apeakinig of the . German army, and] of the fearful losses of the Death's Ilead Hlussars on the bank-s of the Yser, when the Baron casuially 'lThat wvas my regiment.\" H.e Mw appnrently exposing hlm- self to a dewdly blow, and Professor Morgan instantly replied: -I wonder, Baron von Posenberg, that yen are not with youir regiment at the present time.\" The. Baron looked at Professer Mor- gnwith an expression of mild sur- prise; was silent for a moment; and thn replied ini calm, even tones: MTbat is a very personal question, froter Morgan, but 1 will give you the anuwer, if it will allay your eurio8- ity. 1 wss expelled frem the regiment for refusing te fighit a duel with a brther officer, my dearest friend, saine *1'en 1 have given my life te the. cause o ef c? Profeer Morgani was ataggered, but returned feebly te the attaek, try- hfg te colleet his tboughta. 16You are a diseple of Toistoi, it 41J do net stand withi Toistoi, Pro- fessr Morgan, at sueh a time as thia. When the. world is at war, a mian's paeis with bis country. 1 would go s!ko course, but that they made me ive my parole when 1 left Eng- t'h! excIaimed the Professer, pereivnga chiik in bis enemy's armi- Ou,\"obls you are serving your eanr quit. as well as though you ,wer at the front.» ow se, Professer V» queried the \"I will tell yen, sir,\" said the. Pro- lmwitii cld steel i his voice. tmgiyen have beau posing as a paciflat, I comnpliment yenu on your bistrionie ability, and I deneunice yen as a spy--a. Germanii spy.\"1 The Baron Iiglaghe aloud. «Aspyl Lo)rd (ledd! A\\ Cem SPY! WhaIt neIxt? P'resetly 1 shajI lie thle devil imiisIf. W\\old( yen like te sec ny hornas and hoofs, ProfeasorT I have threm in mny box, withl .11 the othier properties. Ilistrioiie a1bility I Thatl is goodl. Heow we find our latent talentis, little by littie I If oly 1 hand known it sooner! But it was lft te you, Professeor, to mnake thie great dis- covery. Youir researches inipyse are thrown in the shade, In m1Y turn, 1 wouldl ýomnpliment von, sir, flot up- on your histrionie abity.ecty, t upen the power of your ima12ginýation. You also hiave !nissed yeur voi-ation. A great detertive--a sleuth, I t1inik yenl cal] it-was lost te t11e world when you becamne a prof ess-or o! physics. Thlnk of it! lIn a chasq with M. Lecoq and Sberloek Ilolines. Ha I! Ha! TIow refresbing it is te have a good Iaugh?» \"Ridicule i4 net argumienit,» snap- ped the Professer. \"No, but what argument ran I gi vel1 I arn a German, and therefore a spy. Now that I think o! it. I w-onder what I arn spying in this reginn, se fagr ln- land. Penbaps I arn interested( in prairie dog4, or cactus, or sagebruÀbh, or mounitains, or gold mines. A h, snowv we have lt-gold mines, o! course. Germany needs tbem. Yen li*d bet- ter Ioolk inte it, P\"rofesser,» «That is yeur best argument and our oiily diffieuilty,» admitted the Pro-. fesser grudgingly. «W. believe that you are a apy, altbongh w. do not knew what yen are doing bere. But Wait a littie, \"As long as yen like, Prof ess-or,» said the. Baron nising. \"Before I go, let me compliment yen once more up- on yonr vlvld imagination and yonr eourtesy to a stranger.Y The Professer was clearly worsted in thia prelminary encounter, and wlsély made a etrategie retirement in- to the bakrudof the be.riîng",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE bouse. There lie did bitter penance for his premature offensive, wbile striving to equip hiinself for another forward movement. Meanwhile, the Baron held the field. le was now eonipletely exonerated in the minda o! mxost o! the boardiers, wbio were aishamed of their previolus injurious suspicions. There was a re- ,vulsion of feeling in bis favour; sus- picion and restraint were dispelled, and lie was received into our fellow- ship as an honoured guest. It wns oue tbing, however, to treat a dlistinguished traveller with due couirtes 'y and hospitality;, it was quite another to receive with open arrma one about wbonm we kuiew but littie. In this respect the men of our cempany wore corret enough in their behiav- ionr; but the women were, as I tbought, sonewhat effusive; aud of these the most coxiepicuous was the young axid charming widow who had ao eurageouqly defended the B3aron iu the time of bis unpopularity. It was only natural, after wbat had oc- eurred, that she should be more or less interested in hlm; but that she should so suddenly enter upon a career o! co\u003cuetry--or love-with a eom- there is-nothing uxcomni fair of that kind. lu society widows do net selves on funeral pyres theinselves in couvents; aged bachelors are f air semsons. The Baron biais than once conunended: marriaoees as a means c death of an aunt in New York tremendously interested, and bled his attentions. It began t therefore, as thougli the fli were developing into a serli affaîr, aithougli it was less thi years since Mrs. Crawford Iii ber hiusbaud-a young engine ployed by the Guggenhlcinu whcre in Mexico. Oddly enough, the Baron é. aeemn te bc at ail jealous of t Mýr. Crawford. On the contri professed te be much initcref his brilliant though brie! carei talked about hiim frequently. 1 us that he had at one time in te bc a ming engineer, and 1 had even stuidied at the cebi l3ergakadanxie in Freiberg. 1 neyer been in Mexico, but I thouight o! that country as tl for bis mining career, aud w acquainted wvitb its geographi turcs, its people, and even il tical affairs. Surely, we thouý Baron weuld net talk so fri Mexico if ho had any conneetio- ever with the political troubles country. One day Professlor Morgan xuy rooxu with a mystcrlous tell nme that lie bad discovere\u003c thing of the greatest signil",
         "OUR NEUTRAL SPY that prove t Ail spies arc hars, per- bap4. but net all liars are spies.\" \"Tour brain le flot werking to-day, Wiggins, or you confl se further im- p letions. Wiiy did hie say that lie adneyer been luixn ot 1«H. may have had oue of a thon- uond reagan., or ne(. reasen at ail Puneii(tliis trinth-tehhlini i an Eg. liai, not a continental vru. -'Wiggins, yen mriss thec point. Tiie Buron wvished te deceive uq-for a M'atpurpose, the(n T\" \"That remnains te lie seen. FIe la et lenst ucting a part, or part of a palrt»\" \"Does the. widow know t» \"Of course,.» «T7hen shie aise le a spy,\" \"No, not that. Wait awhe. We walted patiently for some days, but rieithier saw non heard nytinlg of cnsýequencee until eue da.,rk and gultry evening, as I was seated on a boni in the park; 1 heard two pe-- pIe walking on the gravel path, en- gaged in eamnest conversation. Pres- ..tly tiiey sat down on a bencli di- Tectiy behind me, and through the. zhrnbberY 1 conld hear every word tb.y Raid. lit wasthe Baron andM'%rs. Crawford; snd I had ne compune- Mions about lstening, ail thiings con- iyumay b.e rlgiit, Max, in con- cnigyour true opinion, but I abudlike tI\u003e heur yen tell those peo- plewht yen think e! thein. 'What an bsurd collection they are--that ponosathietic person, that aggres- andth ersqy professer e! physies. monomaiac-dn't yen think sol\" cle, replled the. Baron with a Snl \"Thoy are a pack o! asses, and 1 J ol lketo tell them, o. ButI1 fer hat 1 wotld inet do se witiiout yo co lay the part passe my cern- ý.aAnmon.It must b. a foarulù \u003c'Frigiitful. The calmer 1 amn on the surface the. greater is the inward tension. I arn 11k. a picrie avid bomhi. Somne day I siiall explode. anud there wili be hiel let loose. Verdammnt ! 1 muait net speak of it, or soire(tlutg wilI hiappen, Yet it la a relief te talk with voir. Berthia, for ywu under- stanrid. Ah, miy dear, yeni unider- stand.\" '1Yes, Max. No!I Nol Yeul shlah not! '.\"Not yet, NO, tell yenl Il'et us go new. 1 had ne idea it wasq se late.\", At once I liastened ta Profes-ser Morgain te tellii hl tiiews,epet ing fliat lie weuld b. wild wvith1 e-xvte- ment, but lie took it very ohly, as theugli hee had knewn-it ail ali bfore. Eveni whleu 1 tolil lm fthit Mnr. Crawfordl and tii. Bairon wetre, airendly ealling cadli other by thieir first inies, and going stili furtiier along the path- way of love, h. seemied quite unewon- Cerued. 1 xas puzzled, aud evvdn irri- tated, at his indifferenc, ami wvelI- nigli reqolved to have nothing more todo10with the case. It wls noafftair o! mine, for a spy ceuld neot injure me in any way, nor a wIdow contri- bute ln the. uliglitest degree te my happiness. Yet it distreased me te think thant another Ievely Ainerican girl--for Àiie 'was a more ginl-xnight b. carried awaRy by the scion of a foreigu pauper nobility. Two day,3 Inter, atter the close of my lecture, as I waa nt my desk xnak- ing some preparations fer tile follow- ing day, the. tebephone rang, and au 1 put thie receiver te niy ear a low, sweet voice speke: \"Professer 'Wigginst\" \"Tes, Mris. Crawfordl,\" 1 replied. \"Yoti know my voce, 1 ee.- \"IIow could I forget it, Mrs. Craw- fordl» Sh. baughed gsiby. '\u003cPretty geod for a inarried mn. But tell me, Professer Wiggns--is Professer Morgan near byl» \"In the. next office, Mn. Crawford. Shall I eal hlm 1\" \"Thank yeu, Prefe.or Wigglus. I",
         "THE CANADIAN-MAGAZINE wleh to speak to hlm about a niatter of someI importance.» When Prof essor Morgan camne 1 offered to retire, but lie particularly requested me te remain, saying, ini a joculair manner, that lie miight need me as a witness. Then hie gave hie undivided attention te the telephone, or, rallier, te the gentie voice vibrat- ine there. \"Are you there, Mrs. Crawford?» \"No, Mlrs. Crawford, and I bave been feeling quite disconsolate, I as- sure yeni, since my rival appeared on the scene.» \"No rival? That is good news, Mrs. Crawford.\" 'yes, Prof essor Wigginis le wîth me. Silly seciologist! Hla! Hla! Yes, w. are botli lere. He does net quite nderstand, but I wil explain the situation.\" \"'Th*e spyf Yon haire some further evidence. 1 amn gad o! it.\" .Yeuir husband's papers! He lias net asked for theni, of curse.\" \"TYour 'roomi searched? Fine! expêeted that. 'Wber. was the Baron?»' \"eWith »yeu at the theatre? Very good! A perfect alibi. Then it was- the cook, or Miss Miller. Rer name le Miillier, you know. But tliey got nothing, of course.\" \"'The First Trust Companyt Tes, perfectly saf e. If they were puhilli- ed we sliuld beat war wthMexico within a week»\" te save the Patherland. 'WelJl Mrs. Crawford! A great ga on with iti Tou wilwin!\" '\"Oh, that le a mere detai wiU, of course, net surrer papers without aeking that th show hie credentias-a lett the Ambassador, or at leaat I Consul. Then yeu will di sealed package addressed te i bassador, containing bomet] ether, and yen wiil receive a That is the bareet eutline, Mr: ford, Think it over and mi te suit yourself.\" «,Thien *you will, send the papers to the Department 0 with a full aecceunt o! ail the stances up te date. The wb will bc expoeed, the Baron d ed, your husband avenged, s will have donc your country service.\" \"I shall have helped1 y\u003c\u003ei Crawford.\" «Good-bye, Mrs. CrawforqL' \"Well, Wiggins,» said Moi lie put down the receiver, «4V yen think of thiat ?\" «Think ?\" said I, somewliat \"ILow can I think when I h facts ? No materil for though ail this mystery? Those pape: «Forgive me, 'Wiggins. It i xuy secret; but now I arn perni explain. They are notes made late Mr'. Crawford in Mexico- account of the Madero-Riai spiracies and other rnatters.-. intiniate exposé of state sopi one wlrn knew-before ho. wi",
         "OUJR NEUTRAL SPY vouid put a sudden end to the export of munitions, for one thing. You see, Wiggins V' géYes, Isec, But this gives us8no conclusive evidence against the- Baron.\" «Conclusive enouigh for nie. Orily on.e lik miss-inlg, and nlow we have it--a motive. Preae(ntly wve shall have documents to clinch thev argumnent, and tii. cliain will b.comlt. «iOh,» aaid 1 duiusy Thtl mot go clear o mie. Thiere are too mauy unknown quantities ini your equation. The Baron mnay b. no baron nt il], for example.\u003e \"The famnily reseniblance is strik-~ \"m~Or the widow rnay be no widow. There was no murder, perliaps.» \"It is attested by witniess;es.» \"Or there iuay be no such papers u gbe deseribes.\" :11 have examiued theni.\" '\u003cOr you may have searched ber Mont youirseif.\" ,qWiggina, you are losing your niind. goeolgybas softenied your brain. renge to look at reahity as a wbole, for Hjeaveu's sake, anýd follow the elueg thait we have found. Your method giveg us a tangle of diseon- weted thrends, leading nowhlere.Y 4iWpl,\" said 1, in a eoneiliating top .speng that 'Morgan was irrit-. able. '¶1 d10 nOt denY that Yo1u have a gtrong case, a very strong case. 1 wa merely trying Wo show the. chance ofej or. Science sbouild make us Jt \u003ewas fully two weeks before any- tigdefinite oeeurred, and we were grn-gaxious about the outeome, al Mng r. Crawford sent us re- amirnz essgesfroni tiie to turne. ,Moe tnnonce it oeeuirredl Wo me that temgt bc playing a double game, bu 1 ntntly dlaxnissed the thought ag a unworthy suspicion. As for hogn.b trusted ber with a lover'a suihad bis oxuly eoneern was wbe.. thr h couid accomplish ber diffi- e came to an end. Tt was hlgh time. for the sum- mner session was about W ose and on the following day our littie corn- pany would disperse, neyer to ineet agar:in. So it %vas a gladl welcomie that 1 eave to Morgn as hia hxurmt intn mny office, frantically wvaving an opened' letter lui the air, andl exýliingii, ln a voioce thpt soinnded like a truinupet eall-ailthou)lgl it vouild flot have b'en londer than ai staigei, p \"We'N-e got hlm!ii Ah, the danedv spyl1 Wv have hlmi!», \"Abla !\" cried 1, only a ahifado less excited than mi vcolleaguie. \"odfor yon, Morean, What la it 1 Otit with it. But ]et mev close tue door firt- qomieone miizbt herar.\" «True,\" hie whlisperedl. «Wal art-, uiaily dIo have ears. lin theev daym of physical science. But liten Wo tliis: Auraria, FIlorido. Ji1iy 25th. 1915. MNy Dear Proteseor _Mtrgan: After emai delzy niid mui esse I' haRve obtained the Cvidenre abolit wleh wve mpoke. The Ba-ronn lao tii.mt eliimive pereozislity I bave ever knoiwa, Be. cars. fui, or ho will eseape lis yet. Please use the Ipers am youi mayi tui 1west, nnd believe me. Verx, slncerely rourq, Blertha von Arindiorf Crawýford. «That is satisfactory as far as it ges, I Said. \u003c'But the widlow*s name -What dlocs that sgiyt «Nothing7, replied Morgan. «Tiie name la Germian, but the fainilv bas been Amneriean for thrcee gene-rationnu. There la nothiugL bypbenaited there, but it mialed tiie Baron ail ili. saine. le tbinks she would give ber lif(- for tbe Fatberland. But bere is smre- tbhing else. Listen!» Myfs. Bertha von Ârsidorf Crawfordl, Rumiford Hall, AUTIIria, Eldorado. Dear «aaA V0o1 haIVe a rdnie for a statement regarlng tbo Fr,,ilerr Max von Pouenberg, it rgivesý me great plea!;ure to assure yen that lie j, a) geis man of ldgh finilY 11114 emlbe repu- tation, and that RUY rnlde(ineet wbieh von inRY repose in him will b. abseluIitely'ro- sp.eted.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 1 have the honour to be, dear Madam, With hihreect, ConsulGeneral of the. Grman Empire for Eldorado. «That covers the grouind, doesn't it 1\" said Mýorgan exultantly. «Well,\" 1 IVdemurred. \"It appears te eover altogether tee much ground -like'thie Delpphie Oracle. I wish it were miore qperifl,\" \"WViggmes, you are hypercritlcal. Lot me read you this\": Roeoivod froum Mrs. Bertha von Arudorf Cafra sealoed package atddreuqed ta tii. Curmnn Ambassacdor nt Washington. Tiie important paperq whieh it contains are to bi, rotinrned ta the, owner es saon as pasaible. Max Frelherr v. Poseaberg. Witne-m, FrEdei(rick Hermnnn, Congiil-General. «That is botter,\" I admitted in re- pyto Mýorgan\u003es look of triumnph, «and yet 1 have an uncomnfortable feeling abgut lt-a vague sense of un- essiness whieh 1 eannot explain.» \u003c«Yout talk 11ke a wornan, Wiggins. Get rid of your intuitions and vague proso;ntimenta-nothing baekotthemn.\" \"I hiope net, ?Mýorgan,» 1 retorted. «But your mnathematical deinenstra- tions are flot always satisfactery. You may get a plus or minus resuit, both fulfflling the conditions of the equa- tien. Von ?esenberg is or is not a spy-not very conclusive, that?» Morgan langhoed loud and long, and ini that moment of confidence 1, too, felt that mnv fears werc groundlless. «W. have, indeed,» retor Prof essor. \"For one thing, y' nover been in Mlexico, and speak Spanish with a meet accent.\"\u003e \"I got it in Argentina, Pi Qnly an expert could tell thi once between the dialeetF. A else, my friendV1 «Thon 1 amn an expert, Bai let that pasa. You have bei as a neutral, for reasoxie of y( but 1 have to tell yen, sir, i neutrality is a farce. It mi fearful strain te maintain so exterior when the inward te so great. Some day yen wili like a picrie acid bomb. Wc like to explode now, Baron?'V \"Se 1 was overheard,» i Baron, in sharper tones, hlm eye8 searehing our cirele an upon me as the probable eull you listened, Professer -Wiggii I trust yen heard ail I sai4, are spies and spies, as I see. wiil tell you, my frlends, thi are two Mids ef neutrality- trality of the head and the. n( ot the. heart. ln the. fermer amn absolutely neutral, for 1 the latent and active causes o every country; I deplore the. f futility of it; 1 bisme ne Cswi ne persen; I hope and blii war will cease and the, rign be estatilished in thieearth. Bt pnil opntlg-mP fip.nAa anA",
         "OUJR NEUTRAL SPY eaos 1 do net choose te declare rny sympathies in an enemy country, I am a py. do not seo the connec- tion. batarn 1 spying, then t\" 4.I vill tell you, Baron von Posen- b.rg. You have been tryiug to lay rntr hand on somer papers reiating te Mexio state secrets, that, if puibiish- .d, mighit plunge our country into war-a war that would be highily ad- vaitagecOUs to Gerrnany at the pres- et tinie.\" The Baron vas silent for a moment, en thoughi stunned by the unexpectod attark. Then, recevering hinse-if, ho burat loto a harsh, mirthless liugh. 11I1a! Ili Weil doue, Professer I So yen have spriing the trap? Weil laid, 1 inust say, Papers about Moi- ie I! State secrets! That is news te fe. And wherovwas 1tofind these papesMr. Dtetive 1» 4fTey re heproperty of Mn. \"4Mrs. Crawl ord-Berthai Isl this \"Yem.» sald Mrs. Crawford. \"And dld you teit this man that I vust trying te obtain psein of is. Crawford, it becomes duty te say lu the. pros- viiole \u003c,orpaxiy that yen ig tho trnth.\" deliberate lie, Baron von said Prof essor Morgan nd a stupid lie, tee, fer proofs at haud. Do yen ou presented this letter erman Consul te Mrs. thorizing her to trust yeu ,,uments t» lai gennine, rny dear Pro- -on are utterly wrong as )se of it. Read it again, intérpret. There vas a 1 conditional proposai of tveen myseif and Mns. id the Consul's letter vas 1 te my social standing baracter.» ial! Moral character! Baron. And the reoipt whieh yen gave te\u003e Mr. Crawford- ne doubt you eau interpret that, aise.» \"kssuiredly,\" said the Baron with a smile of triumph. \"If, waq, as I understoed, a receipt for morne- papiers establishiing the right of Nr. C'raw%- ford te inherit the property of an alleged aunt who reeontly died in New York. As the aunt was (if Ger- man birth the Ambaiissadior %vas in smre way cenoerned, and tho papers have been sent te hum.»* «'Highly probable, 1 miust sav. And what intorest had yeu n lutis pro- perty 1\" \"That is anothor very personal question, Professer Mforgain, but 1 wvill satisfy your cuJriosty onve more. T'li inhenitanee vas ain essenltîail cotnditiont te the. proposed rnarriage. It vus the dowry, yenl Reo.\" \"One more question. Baron von Posenberg. What possible motive cati Mns. Crawford have lu denioning yen?\", \"Ah, Professr I Who ean fatbom the mid of a wernn?1 If 1 vere to guess, I should say that the dowry vas a fiction, and that tho lady vas plqued at me for declining te take lier for herself aione.\" \"Oh! Oh !\" exeiaimed Mn. Craw- ford. \"What a tismue of lies!\" \"Lies, madani 1 Thon it is yonr word against mine. But the Consul will testify fer me.\" «I aise,» said 'Miss Muler. \"The Baron told me of the. projected miar- niage with Mns Crawford and I waru- ed hum against lier.\" \"The testirnv of Friilein Miler la thrown out of court,» aaid Prôfes- sor Morgan, delivering his tust idiot, «for sho Nvas seen leavuxg Mrs. Crav- ford's roem on the. day it vats search- ed. There ia more than eue spy, it vould Seem, in Our mnidat. Againat the. testirnony of the Germanii Consul I viii place that ef Professer Wig- gins and myseif. tegether wvithi in- formation from othor sources which I wiii show te anone Nvho rnay care te seo it. We have proved our case, I take it.»",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MÂGAZ11NE «Yen may think so,» retorted the ,Baron, as lie rose te go. fIe elieked hie heele together and made a formai, bow to each ef the company in turn. \"\u003cWeil,\" said 1, when the eompany had dispersed, and only Mrs. Craw- ford, Professer Morgan and 1 were left to talk over the reenite. \"'Weil, Morgan, we did net eccure a convic- tion after ail. The jury disagreed, as I colild see. It le a pity that we could net present more concluive evi- Whtmore wouild yeni have, Wig- gins? You did flot expect the Baron toeconfese, did yen ?\u003e \"No, but lie hiad encli plausible ex- p\u003elanations for everything. AIl the faets fltted his theory quite as welI as ours.\" \"Net at ail, Wiggine. Yen miss the poinet entirely. You do net donlit Mns. Crawford, do yen 7\" Surely not;jbut a purely niased judgo miglit. From the scientifie peint of view ail things are possible- ail good and al evil. I believe in my friends-in mysef-but 1 know that we miglit ink ito the netherinost pit. 1 tremble when I think o! it.\" \"Tremble no more, Profeesor Wig- gins.\" said the window langhiug. \"Talce this littie diary, Profeseer, and after yeni have read it tell me whe- ther yen have a shred of doulit Ieft. If yen have, 1 wiil show yen some let- ters from friends in Mexico, and an interesting phetograpli of the Baron. lie was concerned in the death of my husband. Do yenl wonder that I play- ed thie part of Delilah?\" 111 believe yeni fully, Mre. Craw- ford. Buit why did yon let him go?\"» «lIlfifi 'hqq t \u003cYnnp-A! brarA in Pro-. np one more doubtfnl po we could have seen the pal the Baron wae trying te get. which lie actually received. ehould bave practically ail tial documents in the ease,' \"WMTe will show yen thi documents to-day, before t te WaVsbington. As to th, of the eealed packagre, there ing but a letter addreese Baron, a eepy of which we Shall 1 read it aloud. Iv ford 1\" \"Certainly. There mnst rets fromn Profeser WiggIi \"Except one, Bertha.\" \"13e careful, or yen wii eut ef the bag, Please reE ter, Professer M.ýorgan.Y \"Weil, here it ie\": Auraria, Eldorado, Juiy Baron MaIx von Posenberg, In eare of his Exeieney t Ambassador, Washington, D.C. Sir,-Boforc you see tbis leti have rezilized, I hope, the impc my granting your request. Th( lating to Mexico have been s Government at Washington, ai 1 trust, in saving my native ]i.~ assauits of declared enemteu trenehery of pretended friende As to the evidene relating heritanee from iny grand-aunt Arndorf, about which you we, concerned, you ean, if von wish statements at the Probate Col 'York. I have the honcrnr to bcsr Siiieerely, your enemy, Bertha von Arudorf (",
         ".....s..",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "T1ÀXET H)?WKITEK 13y 2J\u0026muK7rlýpàhy ( d neye.nick NF, bas yawned anid sail how the y ear i4s iloth- iing buit open anil close. Thisý was a idli, say- ing7, and il-dielike declIarýig the coesare all there isto abook. lit the 36-5 pages of the year's vol- umep none\u003e are, blank. for Timeif's pen iever nt point anid its record iý, in- eraicale.Nothing eau erase, it. nei- ther teari, nor blood; neither st.qmp Mf rensor, nar pencil of bluev. Time, i4 a grimi inexorable scribe, -What- 1 have wrltten,» he, éaaya, \"I have written. Marconi w-rites on the air. The ,Nazarene wrote on) the sand. Moses wlth him lingePr wrote on tables of utoiie. We ail write somrewliere, solme- bow, Time keeps the copy. Not a sig ia lost, neither a commra nor a dassh ; nay. not so mnuch as one blot. Lady Maebheth iniglit wash lier bands and gay. \"Out, damned spot\"', but the Polour remained. \"Yet, who eould havé thougbt the old mari bad so muhblood in hlm 1\" once of a day, with his submnarine, the ?rnmlian Spoiler wrote beneath the uea-wrote with stealth and swiWt ne-but Tinie set ont the limes for all the world to read. WSe! Woe! Thî wns Time's most baleful story. Merry of Goi! this wsthe record of a nains Supremie sin- On] onev page. i la % a e apt Timne, the, caligrapher. draws out; onm others a computation of figuires, at ehiexuial formulaei a stailnard of armai, the sitarinig foly of a vnani's hoeart mud how lie fashlionsi evil; a yoling song thiat la, likeý sweet honiey to oir uxouths, oir a stroTlg ideal thant bas sprulutg ftill-armied from tbo hevad of the world. Yes! this is what lie sets down, and other thing, I cant nund. for Tinie kn)ows nothiugnj of an eiglit-houir shift and lie is the Lord of Language. Doeps a womian weep that the heavy white yoears have corne iupoi bier; 4i- cause- of joy or weariuesa; that hier love ia dead; that she is toçased into the diseard? Doea at worman cryv for deveittuinesq; becausqe of a raging shaxue; for loat anehors, brokenr exa- ternis, or for any of life's taise -grails? Time couints bier teara. Hlis inexor- able peu i-a a match for al] it secýs. SDoes, a %voman serve 1unno(ti,-cd at an obscure poat? Timne aeesa and takes the story. It mnaybe she but knlits gray soekaq for the gray trenehes, but inito their web alie gathiera the strandu ot lier broken lite, lier aorrow-yes, or even ber sin. Oncee, a certain Maýry, who was a courtesan, brouglit the im-",
         "TITE CANADIAN MAGAZINE plement of lier sin, which was a box of sweet-smelling spikenard, and broke it at the feet o! a just mnan made perfect. Tixne lias told the tale in scores and hundreds of dialeets and, as yet, it is only in the flrst edi- tien. Once, a humnble marn stood out against the world. B3ut liaten, O Gentiles! while this story is most strangely bewitching, it is an old, old one and ott repeated. Let us leave it then ; let us leave it and hurry on. Hlere at home, our Mother Canada bas hiad many and diverse scribes. Lest she forget, the Jesuits have left lier their Transactions; the Factors of the Hludson's Bay, their Logs;- and the Riders of the Plains, their Re- ports. That she may then better re- inember, the bIdians and Esquimaux have set demi their lineage, their bis- tory, their religious tenets, and the atories of their chase-each i bis own tonuie, eacli by his own peu. They have set it down ou totem poles, on pottery, on walrus terika, and in bas- ketry. Tey finished their story and are goine. But, Time, the annaliat, lias neyer written Fiisi to bis volumes, for his talcs are never cencluded. 'The story of the Magna Oharta, the Crucifixion, the flnding of Ainerica, and of the dhacovery of anoesthetics, are atill in proccas. There are a seriate whielx bid fair to continue te the end of the wonld. The translation o! the Bible i s4Iid te have eut off the head !rom Charlcs I. The Frenchi Revolutien was the resuit o! Rousseau's Con~trat SocialZ, and the results of the Frenchi Revolution are still a continuons operation. - s irable--and ever holds lisi peu narrow sud proper confines first person singuljir. Whule it is truc that bis yea corde mnay naturally trame ther into an epie. a lyrie, a dramm pastoral, yet, neyer by auy de they become didactie or sophie. Time, the chronicle presses no opinion. 'Tii a e( mucli abeve our deserving, zi shail have praise et me uncea And, hark, ye people! As thor, li lias othier and strang tinctions. (Where, cati yen fi like?) Ilere is a peuman \"Iode\" is neyer workcd eut; w1 eue \"diacevers», and whose las le net ef necessity \"lisi best aeks ne publisher; takes no tics; reserves ne riglits. Hi. are open to ail, and have ne i translater. Does he serilible ou the pages ef our faces? They w may read. Docs lie scrawl dlay? Nature, ln lier cool disj ste mauner, takes the page ai it away that a million yearn some weair-eyed, hairless, long cd geologist may decipher the tive and republish it witiann( te the confusion and tamn pniesthood o! bis day. Some have it that Time ha writteD on the ses, but lie wi day-without a doubt lie wil these latter times, it lias cm that the sea thinka and el a-thrill with lite.",
         "TIME. TUE WRITER womtani's face ais \"the waves of old Why. Timie writea 1 cainnot saay , uni- Ie-m it lu, as the on-evt e\u003c Eternity. Or it mlay bc that thev ahawr- lut of hqaiol with the foolhffi is hjis eue and alllotted( mlission in life. Sorne- tirnes, 1 art] incelinable te thle belief tlzat hie writes just for thle ji)y of it. likeýii alliter goodi writer. caring rio whit fo;r the( reader or critie-. Did I gsay lie waka a \".good\" wvriter? 1 rnusqt have, for already thie feroclous te.lonsg-thiat is to SaY, thie nt lies- have- risen to abject. Tiiue lias no crigiriality, they say. As aut auithor, lie is a mnere narrator of fada. 11e opens ne0 virgin territorY and is wvith- ont distinc7tion of style. 11e ismul too hceavy-hand(ed;: te mnadly *luciid. liut such commnenta were te be vx- perted , for rio people, whiethier they e citics or the actual readers of boo)ka, have ever loved thec faithfiil ebrenieler of their age or couintry. Bpeak admiiringly in the Souith ef a southerru writer and( the roonm rises ta protest- \"~Thot lame boy.\" they will »ay, as Mary Chaworti siaid of Byvren. Tel] the North abouit thic charmas of thiîr sperlul annalist, aud a score o! pistois are te your hesd. Like Byron, too. lie i\"ad, bad aud dangeroius Ye!this la thev trouible wvith Timie -li 110w what veryvone dovs bot- ter thanu any ont,, There i la a gssip-taleý that. soiîne day, Tirive will djie andp thjat thevre Will be0 ai, end te Ilis pvestiferousq peu. One JnIii, iselated ont the lie] of Psit- mes, hiniseif a writer of neo rieait calibre, d1eclaredl hew lie hiad a vision and in ilIth, saw a mniglit\u003e' angel corne dmi et of thp he01v0e11. Andi this angel, wliese face ias like thei siin, stoed with eule foo)t uipon the sesa arud one, uipen the land sudii swore by hlmii who Iiveth ferever and ever thati Timei shouild lie ne more. Whieýnao Death mayii cernei te Timeii sail idle Sperulation. 1 like te think lie will live alwaya. It wa Irai Zangwill whlo aid (abouit Robert Loisi Steensn, (.i you bring haime te yeourself the death of a isu like th.at V, Buit if Time shotu1d die--if Trnie lue duast sud saleaven as, youi sud 1) then let uis wiali for imii the Samel agreekable end desired b\u003e' the old pro- fesser in Hyei\u003cwtla li mglit die witli a prinhetl has hiad. saine have it thint Tinte ila aed uIer witli a pack z sorma say lie is s reaper wvith a scythe; 1 rdi a new symibel. Tiirne ii a peumaii with al Pen.",
         "Our llew lRortb BY R. G. MAcBETH AUTHOR OF *'TKE MPAKINCG 0F THE CANADIAN WEST.\" -OUR TASK IN CANADA,\" ETC. IEN theFathers of Con- federation were graduai- ly evolving their great plan for a niew nation uinder the 01(d flag, they were denling primariiy with the UTp- per and Lomer Canadas and thxe arcas dowu by the Atlantic. But there is arnp le evidence to show that \"their moula yearned beyond the sky-liine\", andi that they were looking forward to the an-nexing of the immense do- ar.w!..r stretching out froin the Great liakesý to the shores of the Pacifie and the Arotie oceans. lu other words, as Sir Leonard Tilley ia said te have ex- pressed it in the language of the wonld-visioned ?salmist, the hope was cherished that the Dominion mlght lie from sea to sea. Accordingly we find thiat men of both political. parties co- operating in a commo!' cause, with the approval. of the Imperial authori- ties, Itook occasion by the hand te make the bounds of Empire broader yet. And so it came te pass after smre negotiations that the lludson's Bay Comnpany surrendered for a consid- Pr'atinn the charter which had prat- \"hyper-horean regions\". Andi Canadian Pacifie went on driý iron hiorses across the plainsi mnountains to the western se the hiuman tide followed closel footbills of the Roekies, wb surged more directly westwa lowing the wake of the railw the ricli mining, lumbering an ing areas of British Columbia. But for years the great i hinterland towards the Pea Athabasc-a and Mackenzie Ri- left ini its aboriginal wildnmm settiers began to percolate tliz old Fort Edmonton, on the Saskatceftewan, but some vç shook their heads and wonder wouild become of these adVE spirits. To-day not only is E a flourishing city at the heu. wealthy agricultural provi away' hundreds of miles bey( monton there is opening up North, to which there is flowixz Wy but increasiugly a strearn o. Saxon immigration. Thais movement northward sider a good thing for the lin ily, for the -north has alwa the mother and the nurse of tl1 nations of the world. Not torial lands where a dreayn auuuu, pie op tryig 270",
         "OUR NEW NORTII tli.re is .Àomeý need for effort, where thie crisp air gives a hetalthiful tanlg to t'Ii, atlmosphere, anxd whereý tIe sweeping breeze puts iron inito the bl(xjof cd men. ec Canlada shouild b. gL'ad thait she is finiding aul eVer- wideingiL hoûrizoni and that a htct unikniown- and woniderful iotlandii i.s e-oing to the front to be the nuirsing. mioiier of a virile people. Net lonig ago, in connection with homne mnissiori work, 1 had the, satis- factioni of tlkinig a trip with two0 othvra cnlgaged in Ilhe saine errand, iii- to and ilirouigli tIlemkhe Peare River ountry, anid the de.sire Io iiiake moreý dlnlitely known this latest and lat gzreat fer:tile area of Caniada is stroug wýithin 11ne- When thie war iii ovr eiveryonie knows that: the Domin- ion of Canaida \\%Ill once more beth Mecva. for immiiigranlts, and it is goooI t'O kuow0 thlat not Onlly haveý we rooml for millionis in die parts of Caniada aireadyv considered settled, bult thiat there is a niew portiOni of the lanld viiere manly thousands of eonfortable home \u003cian Rie founided. Butbeus rea home(s are the citadel of al nation jetil exereise discriiniation lest we invite immiiigrants to whoml thie idea of th. homne as ani institution is un- jWtallwr agreed at tRie end of Our journey that thie people we met in the seattered settiements and vWlge of thie north were o! a sigolarlv good type. They are ini- t.erested )i religion and education, tbyare enger for churches and scoÔhs and have them wherever there is population enougi', and they joined in witb tRie rest of Alberta in saying emhtic-ally that tliey were going t» bidup their communities without the moral and economie handicap of tii liquor traffic. Hlence the people who now go int the north will fin tbatthos whoare already there are living ý to t e et traditions of thie .Mde settled portions of Canada. This M a field for the operations of thie hutert(t anid trappe-r and 1rader tIe Peace Rivýer colliery«ý da;tes ilany jlng years baelc. Biut its hiistory as al field for thie fariner, thie maxiii who is the real basis of a eoiiitry's prgr sau onfl y o! thîs genert-qioln. For Il. is le's, thl thirty\"v years sinic tlle latqe Sir Jonsehltlz, tiie asenator or Can- ad, egI o uirge upion Parliamet(j thie dei'sirability of ivtgtIng lte neow llortl. Aý grvlat man eoîsicre thlat her was unlrcasoniable ill dosir- ilig Io pult the eotry bt'. th le trout- withl bis well-knlowi lujatca- adiulinpcsisedald secuired tui appinunnto! a1 omisOn. f tRlis comissliIo he was nude chairmanii, afid t1ie resuits of te inivestigaitioni, as rentedo the floulse in I 888ý, iipi jstifle(l the troulel( and cx- pene udertaken. Thiat ani enormtons aigriofltural areal existted theore was a Lad etahlihedbyonld aL doubt. Buit ii thie report there was a note o! hies- tation as to urging peolel to go into the. counitry ini view o! thie faet tRiat il was a long distance away f rom rail- wyfac.ilitie(s. TResaine geleral nlote ran through. nearly all tRie literature publisied, iii regard to the country up to recent years, but il ean niow b.l renuoved. For the Edmonton. Dun- vegan and British Columbia Rail- way, starting at E dmonton, is to tira Verse the great diatrict northward and w-estward to tRie houndary o! Bnr- tish Columnbia, where it will eventuial- ly Rie linked up with tIe coast cities- Fýroin Meliennan, a divisionad point on tRat road, the Central Canada goea, iiorthward. to Peace River Crosaxng, w1e.re it will bridge tRie great streaini and tRen go onbeyond it And fromn EdpiitoRve, on tRie main line o! tRie EdjontnDunvegan and Britiah Columubia, another branch will runi southward to tRie famnous Grande Prairie district. Witiiin a few montRa moaI o! tRese pointa in tRie l\u003eeaee ountry will b. reached 1\u003e7 the siteel, so thaàt setliers now going ini need no longer feari, lau",
         "TIRE (JANADIAN MAGAZINE lation or great distance from markets. In ouir recent trip we lied the plea- sure, of travelling by rail, trail and river, going from Edmonton to the end of steel, thence by trail to the Suinky RivePr, and on that swirling rapid streain in a primitive boat down to the nmajestic Peace and the new town at flic crossing there. Fromn that point ive passed over and went over- land by inotor through the Blue Sky coiuntry, north of the Peace River sonie seventy-flve miles westward to the \u003cld Fludson's Bay post, Fort Dun- vegan. There, crossing the river again, we drove by wagon-trail about ninety miles throughi the Spirit River settiement to Grande Prairie, f rom which point we drove thirty miles to the Smoky, and wcnt down a luindred miles more to the point nearest the steel agaù) We went through the country in the harvest-time and so had good op- portunity for seeing what it could produce. We krnew beforeliand, of course, that, at two world's fairs, the prize wheat hail corne from points nrth of the Peaee-from Shaftesburv, miles almost due nortl ing. And we kuew t wheat froni a tbio f whielh we visited) i district, had been st by team and train to it caused smre excit, inç the highest grade this knowledge we ii pared to find,aswe è ig to the prolouged vest was considerabl3 nointq farther est, round climate they had known. experienced no stornis or high N during our three or four wveeks i eountfry, and people claim that are few, cither summner orw throughout, the territory. S-, thi snow in winter does not drift. At Peace River Crossing, there is alreaidy the -nuc.leus of a the scenery is suiperb. Into the F fiowing and mnajestic Peaee at point there cornes from the s eastward the rapid-rushing St and from the south, through a mi canyon, the Little fleart River. river banks anid ravines are h( wooded and the water of these sti glistens through tlic everyg-reen directions, so that for the lest or eighit miles into the Crossin4 Central Canada will bc a wonc scenic route. So beautiful is il a fanious old Vermont miner, had travelled widely, told his fr that when hie died hae would l be buried where his grave wou.ý up sud down on this incompe seene. Hie died many miles awai friends fulfilled his wish, and the higli south bank of the Peui grave is found, with this patheti goody epitaph: H. F. DAVIS, Born in Vermout, 1820; died Slave Lake, 1893. Pioneer, pathfinder, miner ai 'Hem wania frien ftmmluer n",
         "LAND 0F TUIE NORTII tor M edwho, with. the passionaite love of thef homneland strong withini hirv. eaidit aftvr it seat of his gallant clan iii thw Isie of Sýkye. S irrcqapousible exploiters in reýa1 estate put Dunveýgan on the iinariktet afew\\% yeairs a9go, becatise the ra(ilway, thoughi flot projected to the( fort, had put the, niine inito its tite. lin order to dsrb thv well1-knowni distric-t through whieh it %vas pasainig on its way towairdc, British Columrbia. Buit the old fort, thougrh neyer lieyto sec( a oityV, is gtili in the old businevss as a post on1 tii. fronitier. Uts naine\u003e remnaixs als a tribut. to one of the grini, hardy, con- w-ienitious traders whose love for the. h0oeland did 80 iieh li e arly days to hold this, grent vouintry for tiie Ean- pre. Spirit River, Grande Prairie, Sau- katooxi Laike, Ponceý CoupéN, Beczanson and miari other ninesii stand fôr splendffid farning areas and sonrie of themn will bw entres or population lin th(' shape of towns. Ail of them aire yet ]i their infancy, but their pos- iliities are, veryv greait. They are\" offly beginingto hear the sp)iish of tii. wesont the edge, of at wde land son to be e-overed by a great artd increas. ingz human se\u0026 LAND 0F THE NORTH BY JAMES COBOURG HODGINS L ANI)of the north! tothee we riii,o A sorng of love, a hymn of praise, Pride of our hearta f we piedIge to the,. Our utmnost strength and ioyalty. May thy pure faine no fouiness mar, Nor clouds of passion dlxxx thy star; The future thine te hold in f.,.- Thrice-favoured ehild of deatiny! Thou Greater Britain yet to bel Thon nxightiest of lier progenyl1 Flold as thine own the sacred trust 0f rule beneflcent and just. Defend her honour as thixie own; Unhare thy aword te guard. the throne; Should threatening foes her place disturb Aid lier their insolence to eurb. Frein sunrise on the esteru sea, To the. Pacifie giad snd free, Pace day and night the long patrol That binda the E~mpire of the seul.",
         "»Y)JYK I3RLLEK1-NS W\u0026[£ ý3y Y'dank1inM.0 I\u003c4q7q 'S2 the most curions courtship you ever hepard Younlg Eýliot Lerwick offlliglancoed upl at the speak- er. Shie was; Just settlin)g into the car-seat aliead of his witli the dieft, sidewise inovement that women make li swinging their skirts out of the way as tliey sit down. He cauglit a glimpse o! the rose-tinted eurve on an ovai check and the white phnnpness of a slender throat, froin whidli -,be was pushing back her hîgli jacket collar witli a sinail, daintily gloved liand. It was her voice rather than lier remark that lad attracted lim, and le listened uow with a pleased intent- ness to lier clear, musical tones and inflections as she went on talking to lier companion, a fresl-faced matron dressed li mournu'g: «Tley met at the 'Mayhe#s soon after lie settled ini Maxfleld last April. But lie didn't eall for the longest timo, aithougli lie was invited to, of course, and it was perfectly plain tliat lie was deeply interested i lier. Tliey liad nearly given up ex- pecting lim wlien, one evening about hlf-past nine o1ock, lie called, and Eliot was stairtled byv the mentlion o! bis sister's naine. 1 ed lmi with ai sort of sliock fr Mood of r-estfuil satisfaction thi stolen over himi while lie was mindely conteiipflating the- gi adxniring the graceful poise head, the well-bred jauintines whili lier styliali lat rested lustrous cols of ber dark h\u0026~ the entrancing effeet of a tiri that nestled just back of one d shell-pink ear. lie feit a natural desire t more about this strange afi whicl his sister seeiued t4\u003e ho cg ed. But the girl's next word drowned by thec strident tonE trai-hand as lie liurried throu car callhig out the naines o! t tions at whicli the train was t A minute later the car began tg: and the uext moment it rolUed tlie linge, duaky interior of tIE slied into tlie failing liglit of t September day. Unable to make ont am14 thi hie and jar of the train wliat t was now sayiug, Eliot leaned c( ably back in lii, scat and loôkq out of the window, while ti1 qnino wit.h oetb no ~ae verwi not ui 274",
         "MNAJOR IiRUERTON\u003eS WEIDiNë. stiol an hour? S-he must have known that it would be talloed about; se why hiad file net, stoppe)(d it before peopla begali te gossip? But at this point lie reflccted that there was, nio uise in puz7ling over the mnatte.r wblen Ilie weuld soon be at borne andi coult1i ask his melther andi siis-ter themnselves about it, FIe tingleti with lasr at the thouglit, and his memiory wenit back withi a leap te the ehilly April day whien lie had last accu, tbemi, more than two years be- fore. lle rememibered withi wliat al forlorn sinking of the herart lie hiat respondied to thle final good-bye they waved te hlmi fromn the front verandfa as the cumrpanly imaérchiet past on its way te) the station; andi lie reoalled with a faint sinile liow liard] it hiat ben juit thenito carry iimself with the martial dlignity. whichi lie felt was demandeti of him as a second lieuiten- ant. tic wondered if they had chang- eti very mueh, andi if they wouild be gurprimeti at the alteration in himself. ()f course they would net expect to ftud hlm exartly the saine. But would tbqy be prcpared for the transforma- tion that more than two years of eam- paigning in dlistant landis and chimes had wrongt in him? To be sure, lie utill showed te some extent the effecta of the wuund that hati resulteti i his b.ing invalided anti sent home on a gix menths' f urlougli. But the home-voyage hati done wonders for him. Hie was almost as bronzed as before le hati been shot, anti lie bati reaineti more than hait the weight h. hati lest while in the hospital. lie might stiil be a trille gaunt and sal- pardoablepride, that no one coulti hepremar*xng the difference between, the boyish subaltern ot twu years b. for andi the veteran captain of volflnteem who waa now ehafing with impatencete realize the briglit an- tieipti et of is home-coming. Tetrain had already lett the long Mws f city bouses behirnd, andi wus Ispedi z aross the pieturesque ciedl Fens toward the open country. Seme tait peplars ani tii. hig i arcýli of a smnall stonie bridige stooti dark againest the crimseni west. Theni tiie view was shut. off by tile woodecd sheulder of al low hiU, past whivli the. train dashed i il re- soiunding roar, andi swept hlite thle streteli of straiglit traohk that ruins like a ride fromi Iaoyfr te len- Wood. Elliot leekett wvitli deliglit ait Ille fainiliar features (it the homne landi- Iep.li the fading afterglow, me1(a- dows ani bullslopes, biouise rouf', ai churoli sp)ires seinedici almoag)t as uni- Suhatanltial antidradk Ilý Mu the( visions et theml thlat b. hai se ottenl seen in bis inidl*s ec b y the varnnp. lire and on the niarcli. ]tut bis beart Sang wîthin lm that it wii, ili il joy- fi reality, andti s huniigry vyes fest.. eti on each we-(ll-kniowni prospect as the train rualiet on. Before illsborougli wvas passeti it began te growv dusk. aint wil th train stuppeti at MaIxteld, tlie statixi. liglits were gleainii threugli Ille groing dlarkne\u0026s. Ebeot nligliteti just behinti the two ladies, who hurrieti acrora the plattorin andi entereti oe of several carriages that were in wvait- ig. Ail thleculd s\"einthe un- certain liai! -liglit ws that the younger one was tait anti trii ot fig- uire anti quick andi graceful in meve- ment. le did not get alook lthler face, but h. heart iber voice euce more, andi was sure that iti vibrant melody would enable him te know lier agani. As he atarteti homewarti it matie im fei4l almost 11k. a stranger te finti that the straight board walk wvhich useti to leati frm end uf the station plattorni to the turnpike hati been replaceti hy a ciurving gravel path bordereti by shrubbery, anti le welometi with a mumnentary sous. of relief the siht of the old familiar elma in the littie green on the other side ofthe roa. le e\u0026 te wontier what changeai le wouldfn at home, anti te question 'whether lie hati doue welil in planning te surprise",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE hia mother by arrlving before lie was expected. The niglit had fallen swiftly; a few stars were already out, and here and there a window wvas lighted up. As lie pauaed at thie crossdng to let sev- eral carrnages frein the station go by, tliree menx came up behind him. \"I tell yen there is seme mystery about it,\" one ot them said. \"The whole affair la eertainly pecn- bar,\" declared another, wiiom Eliot instantly knew by bis voice te b. Manrie Venor, an old elassmate; riand on. of the. queerest things about it is the way lie acted wlien Gregory eongratulated him on bis engage- ment.\" \"When was thatt» ex\u003ccaimed the. first speaker. 'I ladn't heard before tis afternoon that there was any en- gagement.\" «Neither liad Gregory,\" replied Ver'nor dryly, as tliey mo'ved on only two or tliree paces behind Eliot. \"But you know hlxu-always taking things for granted and putting bis foot inx it is wife heard some gossap a short turne ago about Mis Lerwick and lier mnother having 1,oen shopping in thie ity agreat deal, and told him. that she believed then. waa au en- gagement, aud thiat tliey were getting the trousseau ready. Of course it didn't take hlm long te twist this liarmiess bit of con jugal guesswork into a positive statement that the en- gagement bad aetnally been aumoune- ed. So when be saw the major at the station yestenday morxxing lie stepped up and congratulated hlm. I neyer in my lite saw a mani look more p uzled than the. major did at finit. Ten, as lie grasped thie meaning of wliat Gregory lad said, lie flusled pense of the young lady whosE yen have so uxxwarrantably e witb mine, I shail hold you peri responsible.' Anxd with that lie on bis lied and left Gregory l quaking.\" \"But look lier.!» enied thi speaker. \"Yen say this bl yesterday morning, sud tih. w, invitations were posted early E to-day te go eut by the last m livery tis afternxoun. You mean te tell me that thene la turne enough in the interval foi te corne te an uxxderstanding, i day, order the invitations, ai tliem exxgraved, prixxted, add and mailed so as te reacb us tbey did?1' «It doesn't seem possible,\" Vennor. 'ql tell yen,» punsued th(i speaker, witb ipresaive em- \"ceither the. ondlxxary time-reo dolng ail these thinga lias beex, en into littie bits, or else the. lied te Gregory.\" Tiiere was a signifleant whieli Vennon ended. I give i b. said. \"It's beyond me. tliene's soetbing wneng.» 'Ionly wsh 1 had thie riht terfere and ait t the. matter,' out the hitherte ilent one of th I'm certain Miss Lerwick is imposed upon in some way. I JiVU»!VJà- . snd look at instead of 1 place at the 1 De bail net jei bear a:i",
         "MAJOR BRUErRTON'S WEDDING \"Oh, M4r. Gilbert! Ilow fortuniate I 1 wus just on my way to yoiir bouse. Would you mind taking this pareel to Uarriet? Seneeda it for to-ilight; and I\u003e'm afraid myv mother miay be growing aniouis about me. Thiauk you ever so m i! Yes, 1 eamne out on the express with Mrs. err.Shie returned fromn Washington this af- terneon. I've iiuat left hier at lier bouse. By the by, sbe*d onily hecard a hint about Phulippa Lerwi]ck and the myajor; so 1 hiai to giv-e lier thie details.», «V1i1 wager yon didn't give ber the vr latest news abouit thein, Mise Pereival.» «What makes you think sol What in it 1» 1«Their wedding invitations are eut; they came lu the st delivery this afternoon.\" \"Mr. Gilbrt! you don't mnean it I Why, 1 told M1rs. Mercer that lie had- n't proposed yet. When isit to bct\" \"T~he seventeenth of next month, at Saint Paul'.» \"Oh, Fin sure there muet be smre mWatùe. 1 shall go straiglit over to Piippa's this eveuing sud asic what it meaz's. Why, Mr. Gilbert, the major vent in ou the train witli me tRigi norning, and lie neyer rnentioned Philippa ner gave me the slightest hint that there vas anything between thein; and he told me ho would pro- b\u0026.ly b. away three or four weeks.» -up.ee or four weeka! That'. cool! The ,sventeenth le oxily a little more thau three weeks away. He'll have tp leave off the st week, il lie means t. b. at the. wedding.» By this turne Eliot was beyond car- sht hurrying on more auxioua than evwr to reaeh home-his head lu a wbfrl; a thousand thick-eoming fears and conjectures treadimg tumultu- ouay on each otlier's heele, as h. bus- tee iuder the arching elins aioug \"tePlias' and up the wiuding drive ]ff faltered at the door, umitten wihreewed fear as to the effect thtthe sbock of hi. sudden returs miglit have uipon his miother. Bt quliek ears withln hiad hieard ies foot- fails; there were ratpid footsteps in the hall, the door op mdud his sis- ter appearedl on the tliresixold, while a little way bielinid her stood his mother, withk one hiand presed1 agatinst lier bosomi. «Dear Eliot! 1 knew it wais youir step,\" cried Philippa, as he ki,,ste hier and then caughit hi. mnother iiu hi. armes. There vas noechanre for anyr ex- planatien iu the eairly parti- of the eveninig, m iiie au Eliot e ilit Even hiad thecre becs no interrulptions f romi Betty tlie 110oueemaid, who trip- ped in several tlimes, bier face wrenth- cd lu emiiles, to asic for direc-tions, or frois old Hugli the butier, who carne iu griunisg broadfly to get Master Eliot's baggage checks, it wvould sot hiave becsi enasy te msilke inquirice, for hi. mother and aiter, wlio fairly bearned with happluess, so plied hlm with questions that lie had littie op- portunity te asic any irniself. Even atter dinuer, wlien they went back to the fire-lighted library, the geutie catechizing was continuied, But at length the tîde of talk begas to ebb; and finally a moment came when only the snap aud cracicle of the burn- lug vood were audible as the leain flames in the vide chimney-ple sparkled over the shining birs of the andirons and tender and the polish- ed mahogany of the furniture, aud gleazned on the gilded bacice of the serried rows o! books all around the room, sud sent fantastie shadows fheckering over wiii. and eelliug. Eliot's impatience for an explana- tion of the meaning of what he had heard on hi. way home had becorne somewhat ternpered by reluctasce te lutrude a topie that miglit disturb the quiet o! this peaceful houx.. But if the habit o! self-control, bon of hi. two years tralnllag as a soldier, bail up to this moment enabled hlm te re- pres eveiy sigu of his turmoil ef mind, the. habit of acting 'with deci- slun sud without delay, sequired in",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE the saine liard sehool, now impelled lini te take prompt advazitage of thia opportnity. te learn at once what lie wished te know. Witheut hesitation, therefore, lie turned te speak te has sister; but, as lie looked at lier, his purpese wavered and a suddeu strange diffidence seized hlm. This was flot the Philippa of formn- er days, girliali, care-free and open- liearted-this regal womnan reclluing lu lier easy-chair as on a tlirone of state, wliile the fireliglit slione on the coiled glory of lier burnislied liair, the white sud rose of lier flower-like face, sud the exquiaite outlines of lier shapcly forin. Uce was stili debating liow lie sliould begin te question lier, wheu slie looked at hlm, a tender smle cuerving lier imperious moutli aud briglitening iu lier clear brown eyes, sud sad with a pretty air of gentie repreacli: \"Yeu have not cengratulated me yet, Eliot.\" \"About wliat, PhilippaV\" lie inquir- ed innocently. «Didn't yen get my letterl\" aIe asked in surprise. \"Whilh one?\" lic respouded. \"I haven't had any frein you aine I left.\", She exelaimed lu dismay. \"I sent it iu care of the steamahip eompauy at Metei»she explined. 4CI was sure it would readli there lu time. But 1 remember noix, yen teld 'us tliat tlie steamer made ah~ unusually quick trip and got in aliead of time.\" «Yeýs' lie assented, \"tliat~s probably why thie letter missed me. But yon liavenl't teld me what, the news is Yet?» \"I arn goiug te be niarried,\"' she said seftly. \"MY dear eirl.\" lie cried. \"Uce is iu response to ber look of quest'i surprise: \"I overhiard sorte talking about yen both, ou mi ont frem the city, aud, to e * wliat tliey said rather startled i \"What did they say V' Ph calmnly inquired. \"ThÉey said, for one thing,» rcplied, \"that 'the mnajor' as thi called hlm, lias been corning aftcr nine o'cleek almost every ing since Seme turne laSit JUIIE staylng until nearly midniglit2' \"ýOh, nol\" cried Pliilippa qt \"lie lias callcdi only twe or tirce a week, sud lie lias nieyer stayed after eleven; lias lie, mother?\" \"No, dear,\" answered Mra. Le: \"But it is truc that lie always after nine eoek; aud yen Philippa, 1 have repeatedly tel lie ouglit te eaU at a more seeaa hour.\u003e \"Rut lie la unable te,» pro Phulippa. \"Yeu knew well enougii yon adinitted that lie lias neyer giye any good reasen why lie esunol turned lier mother severely CC always cafll everywhere ciao E liere at the preper heurs.» \"That la strange,\" remarkcd \"Oh, it la net tlie euly strange about lis couduct,» declared Lerwiek. \"Hc uever seems llke self -wlen lie la lere; le is a aud stiff as an autexuaton; and turnes lie ignores what la said tg lu a way that I think is pos rude. But Philippa eau se ne te critieize, and li la ertainiIy g: ed telier. So far as 1 caulem talks of notbing but Is lovefo aud liers for hlm. In speech h paragen o! a lover. (\u003ethris man is a perfect stick. Wol when",
         "MAJOR BRUERTON'S WEDDING Philippa desperately, \"lyou knew von do.ee \"TYes, dear, 1I(do,\" admnitted Mirs. lierwick at once. \"Ile has impre9sed me from the flrst as one of the best and raost delightfuil men I have ever met; that is, lie has imipressed mie that way everywhere except in mny own lise. It's cuirions4, Eliot, now 1 think of it, how l've seen more of hilm and learnied te know and like bin better elsewliere than 1 Lave hp.e: and Iiew P'hulippa lias seen se littie, of him anywhere. except here that, if lie liad not called on lier se \"regilarly, she would liardly know him. Mý%y belief is that he's se0 sensi- tive and lias Riuch a herrer of gossip that lie lias tried te avoid it, and lias Ximply made matters worse, as re- tfring people are so apt te de.\" '*By the by, liew long have you been engaged 7» E liot abruptly asked bis sgter at this point. '1just eleven days te-merrow,\" she \"lied witli amusing promptitude. Eleven days! 1»le echoed, \"and the invitations eut alreadyl Isn't that ratlier rusliing mnatters?» Phblippa fiuslied. «Mrklad spe- rili resensý,» she explained, \"fer keeping our engagement quiet and for hurryzng tlie wedding. But hew did youn know about thie invitations?» 44I overheard abeut tliem,\u003e he re- Sled \"and more tlan that, 1 ever- hadMaurice Vernor telling liow yoeir major denied at the station yes- terday that yen and lie were en- Mr. Lerwick uttered an exclama- tin nd Philippa looked mystified, bltinereduilous. Befere elle could spaBetty went bustling through tehall, ad inmediately Eliet beard the voiee of 'Miss Percival at the front d4or. and Philippa liastened eut te ret ber. A. ltyw-teued colloquy feilowed, in- terperedwitli silvery laugliter and th sound of kisses, and then the twe ame into the library and Eliot was 6CI've heard se iudh about yeu, Captain Lierwick,» said the nieweomner, graciously eztending a littie liand, \"that yeu liardly Reem like a stranger. I hope yen have entirely recoverevd frein yeur weuindl.Y Iler limpid gray eyes Ieeked soui-i tously into bis,. But when, stiil re- taining lier biand, lie assured lier, wvitli neediesa ferveur, that lie waas quiite wvll again, the humeiironis diniles at the corners of lier large, mnobile, mnti deepened, and lier red lips parted in a am11ile se bewitchingly sweet and yet se reguishly eliallenging thiat, willi soldierly* promptitude, lie lost bis hepart te lier thien and there. Mý\\eaniwhule, Phulippa liad liglited a large piano lainp and neow dre-w her friend down beside lier on a sotfa, anrd for the next baflf.hour the, taIk wus wlilly about lrdm aid sd dress nnd the wedding araneens.Bt Eliot emild siE, that their pre4ýtty neighier liad soxtigon lier mind and at ast eut It came. 'Thilippa, dearsh a-skvd hst ingly, «is the wedding roally te lie on the seventeenti? Ts the dlate, on thre invitations correct?»\" ?Phiippa lookedl nt lier in amane- ment. \"Of course it la-, Rlioda7* she replied. «Wliy deo yent ak » \"I3eeaise the soeenteenth lu onily a little more than tlrrec ek off,\" answered tlie girl, Ihlusliing with emn- harrasemeii(nt «andi( the ima.ýor told me this morning on tlie train that bc was going away and would probably net lie back fer three or-tour wveeks.» Eliot saw bis sister's bands close eonvulsively and tire colour die eut of lier face. But with assumn,(ed re- lessness, she answered lu a strained voire, «Probalily le didr int stop te think exaetly Èow short the time is te the s.evente.enth.» 'Rloda ehanged the sulijeet at once, and. atter a tevi cemmon-place re- marks, said that she inuat go. She declined -Eliot's offer te see lier home, declaring that the maid vile liad coe with ber weuld lie dl the cscert she needed. Eliot did net press tire point. Hie had a question wiie le wue",
         "THE CAN.ADIAN MAGAZINE auxious to ask, and, as soon as their visitor had gone, lie asked it. «Philippa,\" lie inquired bluntly,- «did you kinowv that the major was goizig away 1» \"No, Eliot.\" '\u003cDidn't he speak about it last even- ing? Don't yen know where lie lias gone t\" questioned Mrs. Lerwick. :'No, mother.» 'Humpl 1 ejaculated Eliot indig- nantly. \"By the way, wlio is lie? You haven't told me yet.» '\u003cYou kiiow him,» responded Phlip- p a. «Major Bruerton.» \"Bruerton I Good God 1\" exclaiined Eliot, staring at bier. \"Wliat is it 7\" elie cried, growing paler if possible than before, as alie watched has darkening face. «There is smre rascality baek of ail this,» lie said at last. «Just what, I ean't fatliom now. But I've seme- thing te tell you about Bruerton that I never tliouglit to breathe te anyone. Under tlie cireumastances, it's only iriglit that you sliould be teld. As yen know, lie eommanded our bat- talion for several months, and took a great fancy te me. I liked hlm lm- niensely, and we became very inti- mate, and wlien I was weunded lie lielped te carry me off the field. That evening I told hlm about Aunt Caro- line's diamond ring that inother in- sist-ed 1 sliould tsice with me because alie tliouglit that it mlilit lielp me wliere money inigkt not, if 1 ever hap- pened to bein atight place. I shoew- ed it to hlm, and begged hlm to keep it for me. But lie dexuurred, because lie was likely to lxe ln the field for an indefiite time, and feared lie ilglit ]ose it. Hie was mucli worried ness ef it, *and se weak ané lieaded, that I neyer stirr, spoke. I thouglit it miglit be ions fancy, and ln tlie inrninI ed the attendant if anyone he in te see me. He said tliat Bruerten liad. 1 manag'ed te tlie case and examine it. TI was gone. I have neyer seen ton slice.\" As Eliot ended, liii mther lier arma about Philippa, Mrin my poor darllng 1» and lu, tears. But Pliulippa lierself, en dry-eyed, continued te, regard littie longer wlth auinscrutali Then, xnurmnuring that tlie lar. linrt lier eyes and the firelig pleasanter, alie gently disengag self from hier motlier's clingii brace, and, rising to lier fect, s, herseif wlti lier left liand ou ti of tlie sofa and reaelied over out tlie liglit. Eliot saw that she was tremb every limb, and steppe(] forw help lier. As lie dld se, bis. e cauglit by the flash of a di eparkling on the third finger left hand lu the full radiance lampliglit. The setting was rather peculiar pattern. Hie stock-still gazing at it for an ii and tlien, seizing lier liand, ra niearer the liglit and examn",
         "MAJOR BRUERRTON'S -WEDDINC gone. In ail Maxfield thero was no one about whomn Ro mnuel was sid and se littie was kunown ais Major Mfark Lawton 3ruerton. Buit Pbilip- pa's confidence in himi neyer wavered. Even the shoek of Elliot's rePvelations c.u1d Dot shake it. For lier faith iii ber lover's loyalty and integrity rose miperior to ail such trivial t1iings as evidienve and proof. She knew tbat bo could explaini everyýtinig wien hie cameé back, and] that hie would oomne bsck she dlid flot dloubt. Se the wedding preparations went half-heartedly on, aind the day for the eeremony drew niigh and flnally dawnod. In the interval Eliot had natusrally fourid it necessary to hold troquent conferenees wîth Riioda Per- rival ostensibly about Philippa; and it ws astonishing liow xnany points vore coiistantly arising that needed iminediate aud prolonged considera- tion befere they could be satisfactor- *Iy u.ettled. Doubtless hie derived more profit, if less pleasure, from his discusuions with Maurice Vernor, sud bis occasiofl\u0026l consoultatiofls with ghodla'a father and Dr. lleathi, the family physician ; but lie generail 'y foidilit casier to dispense with these thani with bis talks with Rhoda, espe- risfly when some detail of the wved- ding had to b. settledi. Feeling sure, bowever, that thiere wouldl ho no cere- mony, Eliot had privately hiad a cir-. Cular engraved, announcing that the wedding had been postponed, for un- exetelad unavoidable causes, to a*at that weuld bc announced later; 2ffd lie had arranged te have copies of tliis eircular delivered about au to0ur before the tune set for the eere- Inoy, if tiie MNajor had net returned ,d explained matters before then. Wbcue therefore Philippa, looking liea spcrlDido inher shimrwr- i.n wedig rbeand trailing orange busomissted on being driven te S.Paul's at the appointed hour, it was to peer forlornly inte an empty r sruad pace in tragie silence a ragty vestibule, and then pas iie ith a stony f ace te the carrnage, and bc driven home in diespair to deep for tears. As a luat resort Eliot lxad thitt morning betheught himiself of tele- graphing te a friend in thie Mi1litia( Depatrtmnent at Ottawa on t he chance that, although themar K resigned frein the armny, thedea- ment iniight have kept trwch of hiim. Late in tiie afterno-on came a long ro- ply stating that Major Bruerten had reeently beefn in Vaneetiver in nt- tendance ou a private court of in- quiry held, pouding action iipon his resignation, te investigate charges% against hlmi of conduet preindicial te the interests of the. service. The court had reserved its docisien owing, it waa said, to the perplexing favt that, althoughi the. testimiony probved that tiie major had doule what wals charged, it also proved that hoe hsd un- questiouahly donc it fromn the mnost worthy and commendable mtvs while he himmself denled positively thant ho had doue it at ail. About half-past eighit that e'veninlg, Eliot was sittig atone lu the library nt Merryhili, trylng te inake eut what this freshJ instance of thle maîjor'sý in. coniprehen8ible conduet could meran, when Vomeor caine in with tiie news that the niissing mn bil retuirned aud wa.s at home, Three-quiarters o! an heur later, the. two friend.a were on their way to the major'. i cempaljiiN with several other haatlly summened witnesses, indluding Mr. Pereival. Dr. Heath snd young Gilbert, At thieir destination they were infommoed that the major had gone out at thie heur wben h.e usually euJlod on 'Miss lier- wick. Hseng to erhU thoey entered the drswlng-roorn to find MnM Lerwiek stooping ever Philippa, who was seated upoin a fauteuil seibiig as if her heart would break, while a few feet away, stiffly balaued on the edige o! a reception chair, ws Major Bruier- ton. He was a tail, compactly built, strikingly handsomne mn ihpier- cing eyes and a aoldierly presence. Hia gaze was fixed intently on hia bétroth-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ed, and there was a pathetic expres- satisfaction and showing uion of baffled devotion and deep coutenance. yearning in hie look. As Eliot, c«I ara happy to be able Vernor, and two or thrce Cthers step-, gentlemen,\" he said, «that ped ini front of him, bis glance wav- fects are likely to follow ered as if hie were trying to gaze past whieh M1,ajor Bruierten lia: them nt Phulippa again. Otherwise and whichlinl some instang their presence dfid not Reem to diseon- kind has been attended lý cert hlm in the lest, and lie did not serions resuits. As youi hi alter hie att;iude, less already surmised, lie v '\u003cPerfappe, Major Bruerton,» saîid nambulist of the meet p Eliot sternly, \"you will condescend type. I say 'was' because, te explain your unexpected presence miedical science can forcwa here. this evening after your most ex- iire, lie will never be eue a traordinary absence from tewn this blow that rousedi him. fror morning.» in-sleep broke forever the f, The major slowvly rose, and still bonnd hlma to that exti more slowly souglit ont Eliot's sein- existence. The mystery of nm bre counitenance in the circle of un- acts is a mystery no longer. friendly faces before Mim. the impulses that geverned \"ElIiet,\" lie said, in a monotonone active sleep owed their ori voee, \"T dfid not expeet te flnd yen waking thoughts and fe( here.\" Then, after a pause, lie add- was as cernpletely uncensci\u003c ed, \"I came to see Philippa.» existence o f ail that lie d To the onIfeekers hi% cool indiffer- other as if lie had actually ence of maner and extreme delibera- men, each living mn a differ tien of speech saveured of studiedl in- sphere. 11e tells me that foý solence. Eliot's blood glowed throuigh lias been subjeet te attae*ý thc dark tan of Msq cleeke, and witli powering drowsiness in thf a llerce oath, before any ene ceuld ln- At first, when they recurre terpose, lie struek the major full iu long interale, lie trled the face. them; but, as they ineres The latter, te the ama7ement of queney. he gradually fell everY one, made no effort to war off habit of goingto bed as soo the blow. With a strange, distressed them ceming on. H1e had cry, lie staggered agaiust the chair fear that in time they miý on which lie liad been sitting, and him to relinquÈli society, as clutehed the back ef it. Steadying already caused him te res lumsef, lie gave a rnost portentous the arrny. This dread and t yawn, and straliig back lis sheul- e hanging ever hirn kept 1 ders and half raising hie disengaged showiug the charming yi- arm witli a prolonged muscular con- who lias prornised him ber 1 traction, as if lie were stretching, lie attention ln his wakiug life, ' rose te his fu311 heiglit, and glancing net prevent im. frem follo round the ring of lookers-en witli a irresistible impulse of Mis hei wide-eyed stare of utter bewilder- lite uqlppen Tt~ i heur rary, lad i",
         "nw.g y UU tCfafr",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "TE PIONEER FOLZT, 0F' THE HUD3)ON'S bAIY COMPANJY Chale .I gave birth wo two grViit monopolies, o11Nflle of whieh has survived the attavks of rival comjipetition. The Iludo' lva Comlpany' , thouigh its vlxarter-1 riglits have thelse inany years beei srredeed stili vieldis in the partieulair region in wliiehl they firut exploiteil the tradef a dominialnc ovrall other rival concerns. It is a moooyStili. Or filct if flolt Oft laW, vseiU is tîsso on thev shores of the revat hay« whjere their first trader Ianded- livre, where about two hun- dIrrd andi fortY yeairs ago the ftag Of the '1. %. as first unfurled on land. the c pnyreignas supremle to- diay. Th rougholit thle whole of the Canadliati nortliland it wvielded an in- flucne thiat hais gone far in sbhaping the destinlies o! the land, and in the Hjudsoni Bay region it is still supremne. The (loveriment treaty* agenit, the \"emiassioner\", the commandant o! po- lice,. ail hiold inior rank in the eyes of trapper, Indian, or bal! -breed. Tbeir liege lord is still the factor of the Comnpany. AIl men are niow free, to eorne and gto trafic and sell and gather furs in the northern territories, but dis- tanee and elimiate and the difficulties o! transportation stili raise more .ïYiJdser formidable, barriers aiginst, strangers thani lawv or protection could devise. Nattire's laws of! liaitations halve af- forded more protection to ther fur- trader thaui ail the man-imadev laws of the Statle. It was Heniry HudsI-oni who. in 1607, first siled into the great inland 4va, and though lie, lies in ain umllarked grave the name of the danîcsiar- iner goe-s down te poeiterity attaeheod to the waters which elaimed bis life. Ini thel matulral coreof vets, thei great fuir-tradig eompany adoptedl it asiý teir. ownvt. Radissoni and Groseilliers and 0il- lam1 are to uis bult three o! the 1]nany illustrious nineis ausoeiatied wîth the( riuàking o! early Canadian bistory. v But wo the ileiR of Ille IlleC.\" tbv carry weighit, for the\u003e- were il,.. pion- icers. Two huindred and forty-oddl years ago a ship saile-d awvay fromi Engillnd bearinig iii it a oman of advNen- turers wvhuse destination was the fair-, away little-known h of o James Dy. To-day wve would dread te yen- turc ilet uxexploredl waters in a ves- sel the aize o! the Nonnwkf1c. But these early niavigators and seekers aitter wealth were adventurous spirits. and they fearlesslyI entered the great un- eharted waters o! the nlorth. Though Hudson hiad long ago perished, and",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Frobisher, Fox, Bafln, Davis, and James later on followed the Course of his tiny vessel, but littie information of a practical value had been ob- tained. Despite the ifficulties, unknown dangers on sea and land, the pioneer traders of the great Company sailed westward, undaunted. UTp to this time the greateat obstacle te their amn- bitious plans had been the lack of capital and a royal consent to the un- dertaking. Radisson and Groseilliers were brothers-in-law and lite part- ners. They long had been tamiliar with the Canada efthfie French and the great lands beyond the lakes. In 1659 they had even made a joxurney nerthward te the. shores ef the inland sea, and the. visions of wealth te ho made ini that rogion had fired them with the ambition te make it theirs. But in Quebee and in New England they failed te, interest merchants in the seheme ot establishing fur-tradiug posts iu the. bay. Then te Paris they went. Tlxey had little suc\u003ccess there. Tbey then turned te the English, and ini court circles found their man. The. daahing Prince Rupert became their sponsor, the necessary capital was found, and wltb hearts aglow with enthusiasm over the «great, idea\"' the adveuturers pierced the. nortiiern barriers ef ice snd grxided their little vessel seuthward again te the. foot of James Bay. Captain Zachary Gillam was the navigator, sud Radissen and Groseilliers the traders, «trail-break- ers\" fer the. Honourable Company of Gentlenien Adventurers Trading into Hudson Bay. The. suinmer ot 1668 was well ad- vanced wheu the Nonsch arrived off the. nouth et a river in latituxde north flftv-two. The exvlorinir traders scriptiou ot the. \"fort\" fixe first- erected on the low bank et the . River, beyond that it was of ti conunon te most of their latel! lishments. A steekade et heavy timbers was loop-holed and auj, by four cerner bastions. The. voyage ot the Nonsuck broug] eral suxali brass cannon, whiél, mounted on the walls, but nus little else than saluting purpo Within this enclosure we tradÎng-store and depot, the. ho the. trader snd his clerks, and et less pretenieus shacks that the artisans whe were brought the Company in its earliest yen the little colony grew, these scý about the. bay, sud tijeir place taken by the. French iiud Seote breed progeny that sprang up country. 0f this, the. llrst post \"HL.C., othing 110w remsai a rew et hollows on the bank with crumbled brick-the si Radisson's buildings. For seme fifty years atter it tiou the Comnpany held a prei tenure et the littie fort. In 168 looking men, more Indisu French, under the joint leaderi the Chevalier de Troyes snd lb msrched trem King Leuis'a meuts in Canada ever the beï land te the uorth. They were who had sensed the possibil*i the great trade ef the. northlan( Rupert was raided, and the. carried off fixe little brasa ho, that, though serving te overeoi Indians, failed te check thî coureu~rs des bois. Seven years later an Rnl pedition recovered the. place, b following apring overlsnd force Canada again drove the. Com men from Rupert. Then, n later, fixe British warship.g and Bonaventure workdte through the. iee ef the. bay ai",
         "I IONEKIZ FORT OF TUE l1UDSON~S BAY V M\u003eN tintil 171:3, when the Tr-eaity of Utreeht put an end to hostilities bê.- tween the EnglV.sh and the Frenvh. wçam the. Company's flaig again raised over the much1-eontested tort, to fly un1molestoid to this li va. Front the asheps of tlue old timbiers sp41rantg iip a new storkade. The sp 103- Rhipa retuirncdý in thie summeii)tr with Scottishi fiactors suere ingth Frencvh p)ieneers. anid the traide wais earried on ais neyevtr before. T'le peýo- pile ot Rupwert wert, molested ne miore, and thoughi the trade warfaire was waget-d in the wcsot, and the -North- westers\"' and the free-tradors gained a tootluold on the p)rairies and in the mouintatin.a this p)ost saw no rivals The banners of thie \"113C. ere var- rled northward, eaistward-( and south- ward front Rupert and planted on the. sites ot tribiitary p)osts. It is onfly in rvvcent years thant the house-flag of a rival \u003c,oxpany lias been raiised.( alongmide RZupert's Ilons.. In 1902 the weorld-wide fur-trading firm of Revillon F'rères established a p)ost éloge by. Since that date kcnwtePrenei tradvrs haIVe attVYmpItedi t0 breýak the natives' allegiance to the old Crn- pany'aý,, factors, whose forefathers first bartered \"skin for skin\" wvith tiie aberiginal runners, of the wvoods. M.-s trie, that the trade la uow divided, but the. eauny, elose-dealing Seotamien sitili retain the. liou's share. Austere and haughty lords were the oIdj traders. goveruing with a hand of iron the. thousanda of wild childreu of the. foreat who hunited witii their p)artieulagr domain. Sonie cause for pridehbad tiiese hard-living pioneers, ~for oftentimes the raw Scottisii lad, a year or two after leaviug the. Old Country. would beconie ruler over a deomain' lrger than hi, native Seet- Ia»nd. with undlsputed sway over the. lveg and destinies of the haif-savage tribe who trapped fur for their lord anmd master. For over forty years Alan Nicôlson, the lateat faetor at RuetH-oua., lis combined acbolar- 17 ,atme nd a tste for ahigher literatuire wvith a rare understanding aiiii nuasterly eontrol of the. natives under his influtenre. The, spel oif thi. old Svottislh hosplitiility lu cast about the visiter, wud the, simple, yet. full, lite as exeplliflei iiu that ef tii. fae- tcr draws tlio. who have once met and livedl wîitbhm iuad his kihud bavk again threugh the gateways et o the nort h. Well bans lie eaýrned the, dis- tinetion-\"lz of thi, flneon's Bay kiniga\". SePated amnrg usi on the, dvek oif our littie schoonevr lu the . Rnpert River h.e told usq the story of hi. pat. And, thouigli for mnany long, weary miontha in the north thehoehnr hiia been gnawving at our heatrta, w. fought it doivu. For ti. )tour tht' spIirit of the, p lace field us in ita thral- don -that fasemnating bondagv (if tiie far-away laes. \u003cThe depot, with its p)reeleus store of rieh. silkypjelts:ý the place of barter, whine timle.agedl floor mneeeasined feet had worn and p)oliahied; the little wiiite-stecpled misionhou.,seut] guardian ef the. trade1(r and tiie Cree-tiiese arried outr thotighta far bark inte tiie pat. Ourjj vtsý.;el rode, where hundlredu of years eanrlier the vraft etRaf so and (irosetilliers had tngged at its awehor. Faintly ahroudtd in aU the. beautty of a Jun, evening in tii. north Rupe)(rt 11euse lay before us, the. pion- cer poat of tii. gret Company. Tiny fires burned brigiitly befor. eacii amoke-'stained tepee, and the, atroug twiligiit atili plt*edl eut from tii. white and dark green background the. brightly-iiued dreus of the squawvs. Purple sud erimson and blne aud tiie ever-present shawls; the, tar- tans of a score ot Hiighiland elans siirouded dark-akinued f aces aud -raven leeka, flttiug tributes to the hardy, fearless Seota who had hewn eut of the prinieval ferest these cities of the. wild. Behind ail, froni a gray black, biilowy iiank et Cloud, tii. full, yellow moon eret forth. Tiie beaeh fires let their brilliance, aud the. sha- dews slowly nierged into oue, frein whinh stood forth only the. witenem",
         "THE1 CANADIAN MýAGAZINE of the buildings and the tents. Sleigh d10g8 veascd their wraangliig. te unite i ai ce,ýmIllo cause. Fromn the throat of crne gaunt, shaggy brute issued the ôld, eld ery of the wolf-blood, deep and long; oue by vu otheli pack joined ini, and thkit we-ird, nerve-stirring ser- enadýtie began. As f ar baok il mlanl pan trace, the wolf.dogs have thius herald- ed the riainig of the moon. Gradmilly the twinkling fires buru-ii ed lew te a glowing red; one atter another they faded out. Overhfadi, the stars, this wvhile unnoticed, took tup thieir short riighit's watch;, a emiel of resinous spruce tops, xning1led %vitl the faint smoke of dying diriftwoed 00eals, wais lightly wafted from thi, shore. 'Tour bl!\"rang sharply*I on the niglit. Wef sighied bec-ause, wp could flot rent kipart that curtain of tiîne, 'years and numibers of years, andj Ie wiVth our own eyes ail thait tile fading scene conjured fremn eut the past-the struggles against natureý and wvith jun. the tragedies and suc- (-esses, the seenes of adventure sur- roundfed by the glameour and gran- deuir ef the growvth and being of tii(, grevat Compfiny. THIE COAL MINER BV A. D. MERKEL A WAY. in thec depthis ef theý earth, '' us rouglihewni workîngs mun, Stored there by the eounitiess years And the. xnight of an uinknwýn, sun. fle wars with their allien breath, Their dank and their feveredI gloem; fe lias wveighed and hie knows their worth, Pays court te an awful dooma. fie seps net his fcllow's face, fie hears but his mufled tread; Fer the gliimering liglit has passed, And is lest wvith the ray it shed. Ife bridges somne hidden streaxu, fie knows net its source; uer pares 'Where the guirgling waters pas:s On their wvay throughi the. darkcued ycars. The way ef the we-rld o'enhead Goes on witb its gain and dearth; fIeI feels net its varied throbs Threugii the miles ef the tumbled earth. Ife hears but the pick of his axe, Or, oft ini the dark, afar, TJhe pant of seine weary horse And the clank of its laden car. Hfe has bowed his back tothe task Where the night and the- day are eue; And hie shambles the upward alope, When the toiling heurs are donc. Weary, h. stumbles along, Oh, fer the. strength te run, To catch with his dazzled eyes A glimpse et the. setting sun!",
         "FATHeK FoKsre\u0026R $kdch af' the F'rcsidwn[ofM\u0026wunPt c1kepe TUTDENTSýý of the highi school at Siincoe, On- bario, a littie more than a quiarter of a century ago, will easily rerali the dark-hiaired, brown-eyed mari. sonxiewhat diminutive in re, then known as \"Frank\", who [ishered up fromn a district school Ai the qeriouiqn(s,. andl applica- that ilsually' attend the youtll mrly favoturedl fromn the ouitstart. youth la now the IReverend (Ir Forster, president of Assuimp- Coglege, in the same town. e picture is stili before us, of a ,ho seemed alwaysenonglf le fui, who laughied heartily, d football vigorously, handed iii zercises with serupulous atten- to neatness and developed the ,king capaeity of inevitably gain- be hig'hest marks in examina-. Published examination reports to Iidicate that this latter f ail- pursued him throughout his r asa student. , fOrt year in a high school lends ppruities for leadership, and beewas somnething irresistible the manner of this beardless he snallest in the class, aud even rig and dignifled members of send form found themselves ngto his contentions and views atesunder dispute. Ris ris froin one important posi- tion to anlother lbas nlot taken auyv of i is 1by suirprise. To heur that at'the beginniing of his professional car-eer and ait ai tixue wvhenI the resi of uis were thinkinig o! settling dowxi to the aeriousness of life, hie hiad beeni ap- pointedl head of a Sutheifri Staites col1lege was Just lis tiight be xpetd Ulis reeslI a fewý vears later to the Presidenc-y o! bis own Pollege, ini Sandichfollowed as a niatter o! cur1ls'e. Thiis institution hiai had a mnostsuessu past. Many of itsý gradia1(es are numbilered,ý anong the ifilueitial mlen of western1 Onitario. Mivhigan, and Ohio. Ilt generous of those oldier mnen, who had added years o! valuable experienve to ail th,' greatness withi which their aima mater had endowed thesa to look with fav- our upon the boy president. They really hoped the goodi work would go on. Tt %vas the age of young men, and there was no telling how inear earnestness and attention to dutyN mnight coine to maintaîning the pres-. tige begotten of previouis suecess. Less than a decade o! years lias pasa- col, and the same devoted admirera of former traditions speak with pride of college buildings, almnost doubled iu extent, o! an equipmeut inereas- ing, multiplyiug eonstantly, of a staff beeoming more and more efficient, o! a complete reorganization of the cur- riculum and methode of discipline, of testimonials in the highest forin",
         "THE CANADIAN MfAGAZINE VATHER FORSTER A Western Ontario Educationist who in edavouring ta improe the aipthads af Education ini hi« native Province any educational institution ean iay elaim to, as weIl as the confidence of its patrons. it is one of bis early friends who stands responsible for the following: '«If Iwere ased to say what isthe distinctive éharacteristic of Frank F'orster I should answer an mceapaeity to admit the eistence of an obstacle\"\u003e. DifOlculties there may be in abund- ance, but difficulties exist only Wo be overeome. If vou have a hindIrd this disposition ini his ea days. A teacher, whose sacred, had a hobby. Iý pupils an immense expet time aud energy uipon the, viting tastc of committing t long lista of words which duced as exceptions Wo cor o! grammar. Class after proached this stage i drea( ror, acceptcd the task umdg but submitted Wo the There was absolutely no hi lief: the 'venerable man cil",
         "FATHER FORSTER inge treated his youthful visi- e field hie scat and with ealm aination advanced one argu- after another until the. good crtainly saw hie hobby as othere .Forever afterward pupils of flaas were liberated from this. i told that experiences mucli daring are matters of common -enee with Father Forster in hie it position. Ail wlio have taken ,n the management of a board- hool p rofess a readinesa to face in nthe ordinary round of Iiswitli one single exception irrepreesible solicitude of the. ;e mother insieting upon relaxa- anid modifications of the. rule i of lier mueh-indulged boy, he leu enthuelastie father press- ýo service as an auxiliary. The lias not heard how many ing-school presidents have prov- equal t. the. assault. Nor has ,ord erbaps resiized that the ploe relaxation gradually r hold durig the. pat quarter ýentury ia due in great measure i persistent entreatings of one t after another, urging every leration for that \"only boy\" on President of Sandwich has had parente to deal witli also. Their lia bee» listened to with a ,oe su untiring and courteous as .ntly to guarantee compliance every request put forward. A time was, necessai7 to deliver [seanid it wae nothing kws an heroie attempt to reverse for ne tr) coin. the parents' viei#e jing the needs of their precioue It wae not a matter of refusing uch lew an honest effort te a present conflict of opinion, k. eradication of an abuse su [teIy as to prevent its ever ap- Igagain. From Father For- vepit, nu uther measure, of isatether within the, range uf ,itythat soine day when the. Department of Edlucation, wiIl have s aid \"take a chair» to this almost un- known eolleague they wiil eoon after diseover thiat a long interview is i prospect, because the caller is there întending nothing les than to con- vine. that dietinguished body of the. unreaaonableness of certain favourite nieaures w h i e h mauy sehoola throughout the Provinces are respect- ing undiier proteet. Nor need we b. surprised to heur soon atter that the. Superintendent of Eduration lias corne to look upon the. aforesaid regu- lations as provisions which have out- lived their usefulneKs. lilessed with a splendid physicaI constitution, Father Forster ie tai- ing it to the very limit. Equally at home, ini the pulpit, condueting a class of higiier mathematice, diacuws- inig business propositions in tens or hundreds of thousande, enforcing the. discipline requisite in a large residen- tial institution, climbing to the higli- est point of the roof te accounit for a leakage, inquiring inte new achemes for developing the possibilities of the. cullege tarin, hie round of duties pre- cludes ail hope of leigure. There le n'oday in whieh he isnot engaged in several of these; there is no season when sueli a novelty as ai holiday can be ever dreamed of. 1Ibeliev it is on record that lie was absent one sain- mer vacation on a business trip to Europe, Authorities do not agree how mueii ground was eovered with- in thoeefew weeks, but it eems gen- eraily admitted that siglit-seeing was tolerated atter business hours. Tt la only busy men *ho have any tii». te spare; thie principle muet have guid- ed the sueiety i their choice ot a general maniager i addition to the ever-multiplying dutiee incumbent upon the head ot a large and gr\u003c\u003ew- ing institution. t neetten selves in a career are usually given te inquire about formative ifluences. To sucli, Simeue higii school takes the. credit uf contributig a year or two in this instance. No doui\u003et ether",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE centres of learning and influence did their share also. But it mîght be fairly questioued would the resuit be very different if neither higli school nor college had lent a hand to his educantion. The history of most meni, it is true, depends upon opportunity: but there are few men of achievement for the explanation of whose sucess we do flot look both. further back and forward than to the years spent ini institutions of learning. On a large farin a few miles out of tow-n fine or ten sons were brought up under- standing their duty to God and fel. lowinan and knowing froma early years the value of habits of industry and faithfuùlness to duty. They learn- Pd how to do0 everythiNg that had1( to bedone: then attempted many thini that had flot to be donc. Any b( who lias held his own with eight i nine keen, vigorous, enterprising hi, thers will likely mneet men ini aft, life with equal, assurance and urha\u0026 ity. AUl the mnembers of this exe.\u003c lent family and among theni a hig' ly esteemed church reetor located i this district not nxany years ago, or after another ini their respective cal ings have won the succsa which se ling character, ready compliance wil duty and practical effieiency aloi can secure. A mother gone to hi reward, a father who.c slower StE and dùinishing frame record fou~ score years and more did their pai and did it wcll.",
         "TrHE L153RY TABLE IF, WATCHMAN AND OTHER POEMS L. M. IONTOMRY. Toronto: Me- E-lelland, Goodchuld and Stewart, ri T110UG H the author of \"Anrne of Green Gables\") and -Anne of Avonlea\" lias been known for years te al] readers of mi l'bc. Canadian M1afazine a poet of fine sense and fancy, s i- the first volume t- ofier pema i± hma appeared. That f act is per- ,)s not so noteworthy as the grati- ng circumstance that this timne this ted C1anadian writer's work is of- ed t th public by Canadian pub- ,es. Ileretofore lier books have M publlahed by a Boston firrn. The mnge, Of course, do-es not mean that s. aedonald (L. _M. Montgoma- is ini private lite the mistress of manse iii an Ontario tuwn) is riecting lier large Arnerican audi- e Uer novela have made lier sure mhat, so that if the copyright Iaws mit il, she miglit well publieli lier ýt uovels llrst ini Canada. lier verse narked by gentie rhythm, exquisite mceets, and aetually breathes out fragrance and beauty of field and ý\u003ed and murmlring brook. She is pye ail élse a nature puet. Hlere ia axamiple of lier work: eIy thre lowers of a hundred springs gimply thAe seuls of beautiful things. popis ime with gold and red reth kiases of lovers in days that are murple pasis with dew..drep8 pearled ,Athe rainbow dreains of a youiigliag The lily, %white as a star npart, WaS the lIrît pure pra.yor of a virgin heart The. d:Lisies thnt dance and] twinkle go Were the laughter of ellildren in long mgo. Tiie sweetness of zili true friendsiip yet Liveq in the breath of the, mignonette. To the wvhite nareiqstus thenre mat. belong The very delight of a maiden 's long. And the. rose, all flers of the. earth abov, WVas a perfect, rapturous theughit oJ love. Oh! suroly tii. blossomas of aIl the Fuprings Musi.t be the. molb of heautifi lng THEf WTVIITE COMl«RADE, AND OTHRI1l POEM'S 13Y KATE I HÂu. Tornto: e Clelland, Goodehild and Stewart. H EUE aise is the work of a fre- dioen Maglazite. Katherine Hlale made lier mark as a poet even more widely knuwn shortly after the beginning oif the war by lier brochuire- entitled \"Grey Knitting\". Now, liowever, we have a more ambitioiis venture and one that will place its author well up 0on the list of Canadiaxi poet8. -The «White Comrade\" is a pretentious nar- rative in biank verse depietixig the spirit and emotions oif the gallant Canadiana who have gone to France to flght for the Empire. It is flot su introspective, yet as essentially liter- ary, as some of lier other wc\u003erk, par- tieularly the lyries, but perliapa for that very reason it will mieet witli wide pupular favour. Here are the closing hines, which will give some",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ides of the style and idea of the poem : Sa cernes the. Corrade White, down aîlent pain, Ile canin te woods and battlefleld8 to- day, (Sometimes I tiiink lie loves the. woode the. boat) And Sund. frou seuls Saung skyward, glad Âmong the. lonely and the. pain-raekea He eomsn-nat deatii at ail, but radiant 001110 in the eyen of coinrades, lives in hieurt@ That give all, takig nothing in return. He in a rumeur and a r whiite Uçght, Ho i. the. singig bird, the. oiildren'a flut. Tiiat ral.ed un wooing forth te giveoaur Theofloting glad things of the. bucyat air, Yotung oartii ' warrm children, music and dflght, 14v, in Me5 oyes: thome doatida azure That imi10 open the. momont wo thought bard, And turn our sacrifice ta kdndling ligiit, TIwv. pafs through radiant gates on wiiom Xatherlne Hale la a Toronto lady, the wife of Mr. J. 'W. Garvin, editor of an anthlog of Canadian versei INCLUDINO YOU AND ME BY STRICIKLÂN-PD GIL4uLA%. Chicago: Forbes and ompany. who sont the famoiis message tu ln Onco aL reporter, %vas (illilan, Down on tiie Richmond \"Palladium'\u003e Wiienever the cît y was scanty ut nowuq Ho 'd ciiew ou hii. penil and study h Bhoeu, Thona write a lovoly hexaineter- A poem, two foot in diamoter; That is, tuis Gflllan Wrote it for filin' la. Wiien Gillilan quaffed the, Plorian He wvrote staff in saient Âssyrlsn, 1-e aIma wroto yards on the subjeat of 1ev And twittoring birds and the, blue ak aboya, And the oditor wriniiled his toroiiosd the And sid many things that. wero torr~ thon, That i. to Gilillan, He talked of killin' hlm. One day on the section une Finnlgin, Who rau a iiandcar out and in agiu, Sont ln a report ot a wreck that occurrsê- Sent ln a report that, lu tact, wsis a bir Now, Finnlgin sont it ta Flannigan, And Flaunigan showed it to Gillan. That 'a tho way Gillilan Came ta writo \"Flnnigl\". Thon Fame came and boarded with ei lillan- He'o proved ta b. true Indiania- And Richmond grew famous in lama tbj a night Through ownlng thue poot who st dovq ta write The niiytimieal story of Pinuiglu, Who poncilled the. message ta Flaunias \"Off agin, on aglu, (loue agiu-Fiaulgln\". Bince thon it's boon splendid for GUl] lan- Though no one knows wiiat came ef pi nigin. But Gillilan's dealing ln meters and foi On tha esest corner af Bread Fý Street- And fortuno has chuckiod aud smmlud c him, And fianours snd eomfarts are pile* c hlm, Dear hoe in, nr ho in- Hore ho is-Ghhlilanl THE LEOPARD WOMAN Bx STEWARiT EDWAiw WUTD. T, ronto: The Musson Book op : 'HT8II ia a hi«zhlr imaelûstive an",
         "THE LIBR.ARY TAýBLE limai' has been sent witli an im- t mnessage for delivery to an n chieftaiu. At the saine turne ian is sent on te the saie place inilar messqage. Botli know the y well and the alnst insur- able diffieulties tlieY arc sure to tter. This is the first part of Ôk, and that is about ail there 1 the Leopard Wernan appears or caravan ini the wilderness, a NÀI, oxotic creature wlio speaks hL with a foreigu accent, and i. Englishman skie is travelling sheer lova of adveuture through itry whieli has nover even been ýd. She appears first as merely inexperiened, liauglity to the of silliness. And it is neot very cfore 8e falis inte serious trou- bher wanderings, and the Eng- m, who lias left hier after their usual meeting, turns up provi- fly tii rescule lier and bring or- il of the chaos of hier native lie takes charge of lier ser- -wheni she is utterly unable inage-ai'd is willing te act as tii lier for the rest of lier fool- journoy.. But at this point hie detailed maps of the district- 4 iu Qorman-in lier tent, and ,*tliat iu ne calse, Will lie let lier \u003ehis siglit! v lie trayais on witli lier thnough ilenshow lie is saved froin dnewliat lier mission really 1 liow ho wins out un the end- 1 h. matter of the last lialf of ok. The errand of the Leopard in, and the way she carrnes it gh te the last verge of succais, y \u003ceIaver indeed. She lierself is C)unvincing, not attractive; but ; obvieuÊly intendod net as a Lit of a weman, but as an in- ent in the talling of an adven- 4 tale; and as suchshe~i is en- ,Ueeflfl Culbertson hiraseif re posble as a humai' being. he estehaaett i th. book is fiaSimba, and the most hi'- ý teo hie magie boue. For the reeýt thie novel is a soinewhiat mie- ehanical, thougli unfailingly intereat- ii.g, stor y of mnodemn adventure. Its narrative style is terse and vigorous, and its glimpses o! Afrieani country anud cluRtoln are~ ofteu illuminating. S0NGS 0F UKRAINA BY F. RA~NDAM, I-iv\u0026\u0026y. Torente: J. M. Dent and Sons. sio o th popoalte introduvo jute the sehiools o! Canada a study of the Russian language thiese excel- lent and uinusually poctical transla- tiens frein the Ruthenian shild b. read with great intereet and value. MNrs. Livesay lias devoted a great amentt of limne and study te a sineere consideration of the poetry of the Rutbhiians, and the book, wii is tlie result o! lier labours, sliould givo a distinct imipetus to the exehange o! culture that should take place between the people of tlie B3ritishi Emipire and the people o! the Russian Empire.» We quote flirce of the translations: SONGO0F THE WVO0D* What did she brig us, tho beautiful sprigl F'air trees, maiden 's beauty. A maiden 's beaiuty la as. dew in s;ummer Wasbed in a sprig, dried in an oven. '-,et on a table, wrapp)jed in paper. Springtimnel And now whst is it alie brixigç uist She broiight us strengtb, beauty of boys. Beauty of boys is as dew in summer, WasIed ini a raia-pond, dried on a fece, Set un a table, wrapped lin rags SONIG OF DEPARTUVRE: A BRIDE OF BUKOVINA Dear my mother, weep noti 1 shall not take, ait; qee. thie cws and oxen Leave 1 iu the stall. 1 take ut. blach eyebrows, Ouly eyeR of hue; And upou your table Tears I leave for you. And the. little pathway Where My f ootatepa f eu While I brought you water Daily f roui the well.",
         "TIIE CANADIANMAGZiN A WEDDING SONG In the, greun garden la fresh-fallen snow; Ilorses are galoplng ta and fro. A. motixer follows the hoof-marks deep: 01My MIr*risetuka, whiere dost thoui sleepl }I1ellp me, 0 Lord, lier mtepq ta trace! Homne I waouid taice lier tram this place. -(Corne, Mrumoaka, vaine te me! If now 1ll-treRted thon mayesit be.\" \u003e1w la not in lier stuail white bed.' $Ixe uleepi 1upan the stra1w ilnatead1 -Tu wbhat straw, pray. now lietli shle 1 Sha Ueth lu tihe rough barloy. \u003cEWhOse( barley pillowm now bier bea? A neighboiîrI 'sarley gives hier rost. FIGUTINO MýEN'1 1BY C, Pox-SmiTrI2 London : Bikin Mathews, dealing mostly with the doings of men who go out upon the higli seas. Hlere is one which treats, on the other hanti, with men upon landi: THE ROUTlh MÂKCII Wv '%,t got out foreigu service boots- we 've 'ad 'ern 'ait a day; If it waqn 't for the adjutaut I'd sling fixe brutes awsy; If I1ol 'ave my aid ones baek I 'd give a fortiuiglit' pay Anu' e-htik 'em iu the pair I got thua W. \u003eve marvlhed a 'undred miles to-day- w. 've 'udreda more ta go, Au' if you (]au't believe me, wiiy, lI l tell l0w I kaow, V've meamured out the distance by the blister on my ta., For 1 got my fareigu service boots tuas W,'ve got our forelgu service boots-Il wiiah tiiat I waa ded; 1 wluh 1 Id got the, colonel 's 'orse and 'im My feet insttd; I wish~ 1 was an aerobat, I 'd wauk upon myr 'ead, We're 'opplu' an' we'v. 'obblin' to a coek-eyed ragime tune, Nat a soul as isu t liMpin' ln the bloomii ''ole balloou, But buek you up, my cam-e-radea, we Il off ta Flanders soon, For we got aur foreilgn service, boots thý mornîn' PENROD AND SAM 1BOOT 80TÀRKINGTQN. Toronto: B. Gundy. TII\" Îs a remarkable collection \u003c short staries, formning in ail aý outstanding study in boy psycho1ogý Penrod's mental processes are reprc duceti with an accduraey which a times seems ailrnost uncanny. Ile i constant] 'y doing somnething, and tii. somcething is frequiently, froi th point of view of bis mueiili-trieti par ents, distinctl 'y iniquitous: yet Peil rod] very, very seldI(ominuge in piece of deliberate naugzhtinless. arl\u003c when hie does, ais in thep episode Miargaret and M1r. Claude Blakèly, h is\u003c occasion ally v stonisheti ta findj til hie bas behaved in a manner whil calls forth rejoicing and flot repri manda. TlJsually it ig simply that ar idea enters his mind, fascînatoa hlm anti lures him on îuntil, after lie bau transiated it into action, hc discoyer, to his dismay that hie has matie hlm. selff a aubjeet for swift and vigorouj pujnishinent. Penrod binsef la, of course, tii. central figure in thia series of shor1 atories--for, although divided int ehapters, this book is really a volumE of short atories-but Sai WillianQ anti Roddy Bitts, 11erman and Ver. man, Maurice Levy anti the exeiuplary Gieorgie l3assett appear more or 1\u0026. ofteu iu the course of the different narratives. They ail take part ini the gaine of \"bonded. prisouer\", which hati the rather extraortiinary and to thein quite umknown resuli of eon- vincing Penroti's siater 'Margaret t she xvas a medilum; \"I meami, if she woulti let hersetf,\" as Mrs. eoil explained to bier buaband. Penro-I experieucea as a militariat, howee were shareti oeily by Camn; tli.y wer",
         "THE LIBRAIIY TABLJE expeienesshowving that the real, mn attained. is apt to Vary ' in a -tling inanneir fromi te iepal. Pen- was aoculstorned to seing epîe- es. of real pistols being usqed to. Mnifieently* romnantie effevt*** in almnost ail the biliboards ini n\"; miost of the books lie read hati îlem we(aponsý of somne knwhule «imovie, shwsli frequlentvid Lild not haelived an hour uni- ~oled\". What wonder, theni, that uaw viqins of, hinsef mnoving itugh) vaguelf and thrilling dramas, -zsty v revolavýer\" in his hand? But ,r artual, thougli brief, possession, fervent desire was, \"Wlsh I'd er ween onle!\" :LSON'S HISTORY 0F' THIE WAR Jo~'Bicn\u0026A. Toronto: Thomas [eJaon and Sons. FIE more one reviews this popular histor y of the war the more oine onvinced of the exhaustive study author lias given to the subjeet. t mnonth we called attention to unes 1, 2, 3 and 4. Volume 5 ts of the \"War of Attrition\" ini weat, the eampaigns in the Near t, and the Cilhtinig at sea down to attempted bIovkade of Britain. aine (; takes uip the campaign on Niemen and Narev, the struggle ,he Carpathians, Neuve Chapelle, the firît attempt upon the Darda- . Volume 7 considers the sec- iftrk at Ypres and the beginniiig ,ho Italian eainpaign. Volume 8 !ribfur the midsummer camnpaigna battIes on the Wa',rsaw sad1ient. SONS 0F CANADA ÀUGUBTUs BRIDL. Toronto- J. ~Dent and Sons. FIS book. as the titie xnight indi- et, contains sketches (thirty- in 811) of men who have takenl MR. AUGUSTI BRIPLE Aubo f -~n so..f Cunad, ani activýe and proineiint part in vari- ous branchles of the Canadiani na- tional growthi. \"Not,\" as the jacket on the cover aunounees, \"wlio their fathers were. nor wliat th\u0026iir ,otos inay be, but wliat tliey themnselveý(s did withl ail their mniglit.Y T.'liere are sixteen crayon portraits by.% the weill-kniowN- Canadian artist, Mr. F. S. Clialloner, R.C.A. Alth1ougli Mr. liridie bas beenl eonieeted witli journalisin in Toronto for a good mnany years, a.nd latterly as editor of TheCan aiirn Coutrier, this, is his flr-st loook. fIe lias lad, muiiel experienee in writing sketihes of this charac-ter, and in the book lie lias- adile(red to the liglit, personal, wmsalstyle thiat always lias char- acterized his, work. Most of th, inen of whom lie wvrites are stili living and stili active. and mnany of themi le knows personaily. somne of them loti- xnately. So that the work is original and is done fromn an individual point of view. The sixteen portraits intro- due -Mr. Challoner in a new rôle anud are an attractive addition to the vol- ume.",
         "TWVIGE-mTOLD TALe: '«MÂIR STIR IN PÂAIS A story worth r.p.ating . i going the rounds in Paris. It relates to a certain piper in the Sceots GuWrds who recently visted tihe French capi- tail wlth contingents of Britishi and colonial troopa taking part in the. l4th of July celebrations. Thi. British troops bad a great reception. The sti'eeta tiirough which they passed were thronged wnith enthusiastie spec- tators, wiio cheered. the passing troops and pelted them with flowers. The piper in question did not say much at the. time. but hie thouglit a great desi, and finally reached a definite cnclusion. On tiie first opportunity li. made inquiries of sucli French friends s li. could commniciate with, as W the. openings for a piper to a French gentlemnan after the war. \"Mind, I canna speûk mmiii French,\" hoe said, \"but I can play the pipes, and 1 eau see there's mair stir iu Paris tlian in hIveraray.\"-Christiat Sci- ence Mositor. CAVIAR oins massed, F sauce tartare- bere, 'tis past- irn la bar.! enlsp tiiat crunciied, JTST A Am Mrs. McTavishin et Mrs. Browi a country road near a Scuttisii tc The. former was carrying a q looking parcel and 'Mr. Brown quired as Wo its nature. \"Oh, ay, it's jist somne bain fur Tavish. I always buy my bain Sandy, in the tooxi. MeTaviaii 1 his bain hetter than any other.»l \"Indeed, so? Weel, my mno, verra fond o' bain. I'm thiukin« be gctting soine for hua at Sand, Arriving in the. town she call.i S'andv'q provision establishinent dxnarded! a pound o! bain. «Whit kind o' bain?\" \"Oit 11, the saine lcind o' hain th\u0026~ serve Mrs. MeTavisii wi',» \"Ah reet!1' said the. grocer, ad( in a whisper: \"Whaur's yet bott TiuE SPOTr BÂLL Tiie presence o! Royalty sonieti causes amusing incidents Woha, It la flot generally kuown thatfi George is an excellent billiard plg aud once, when h. was Prinei Wales, hie visited soin. naval d yards and in the. eveniug entoeri billiard-reoi for a quiet gaine. Wiieu the. marker waa to14 Prince George was to be one of",
         "TWICE-TOLI) TALES UNPREPAREDNESS 71aherty: «'Misther 0'Suilivan, r. stop and have a friendly dis )n on the matter of HTome r'* 3ullivan: \u003c'It'8 gorry I amn, but nt convenient just now.», ~iaherty: \"And why not?\" ;iilvan :\"Why, to tell ye flhc .O'F'laherty. 1 haven't got me r hand y.\"-77it -Bits. Soxu USE was i London. A gorgeaiusly Pd foreign officer was walkîng Whitehall when he was met by rWmhmen fresh fromn the country. wed at thxe glittering apparition lng towards them, one exciaini- the other, with a sharp.nudge pgorra, wouildn't I like to pawn fashiorable painter, noted for rolifle output. was discussing at din tea in New York a recent a] in the pieture trade. \"Ijook old man,\" said a noted etý-her, ou paint ail your own pictuires?\"; o,\" the other answered~ hotly, with my own bands, too.\" \"And do you pay your hauds 1\" the r inquired. \"1'm thinking of ngan art factory myseif.\" TiiE ROAD TO FÂME 1amDean Eoweils was talkiug, ctaeat Kittery Point, 'Me., 2g, bad degeuerated into a pro- sups, said Mr. Howells, \"h. j9curaedwith the moderate fbis gond work, and now tropes 1 ___ oo work abundantly.» Ilwel shook bis head and ie rod to lame,» lie said, \"is ye ith men' who, discouraged, burringbaek.»-Philadelpia 0f ail the fuxrny stories I reeail at the prescrnt moment 1 think I vau work up the best laugh over the. tale of the two Irishmen who were argu.- ing about the relative mierits of New York and Chicago. Youi know, there is a type of person who, when lie kuowg nothiug about a thiug and finds you don't know rither, will start in and explain it to you. These twov were both of that kind. Said oue: \"Why, in New York we have gzrass growing right on the roof, just the saine, as dlowuý on the grouind. You eau have your front yard on top of your houise.» «That's niothin',» deelared the other. \"In \u003c'hic'iigo we play golf on thev roof.. \"Golf ? You mean that gaine where you knock a bail baek and forthi acrogs a net?\" «Tes, that's it.» \"You domxued idjut, that's fot golf!I Youi're, taikin' about croquiet.\" \"Weil, I meaut to say croquet.\" \"1Yes.\" r'nid thi. other one, -I know you couldn't mean golf. IIow would they get the horses upon the roof for a geolf game 1'-Senator J. Ham Lewisý in Evcrflwdy'a Mfagezt?Ie. mÂEkVEFI- OlF CIwATIQN- A Scotch preacher had beau abroad sud wheu lie camne baek lie was preaeh- ing to his congregation ou the marvebi lie liad sean. le wouud up with this: \"And the saine Creator who mnade the. vast ocean, made the dewdrop. The saine Creator who made the mounitans made the pebble. Yes, and that saine Crea- tor who made me made a daisy !\" A milkmau was proceading home after bis labours, when lie wus accost- ed by a recruiting sergeat, who asked him: «Wouldii't you like t. serve your Kingl It wouldbe the making of YOD-\" \"Sure,\" deelared the expectant milk-earrier. \"IJow mueli does hie take eaeh dayl\"",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE PooR 0wi Bn\u0026is Lucx. First Coster: \"Weil, poor old Bills gonie.» Second Coster (scornfufly):. \"Poor, indeed I Luckiest bloke in the mnar- ket. Couldti't touech nufflng wifout it tuirned tcv, mroney. Insuired 'la 'oise -burned in a month. Insured 'jElseif again' haccidents-broke 'is harini firat week. Joined the Bxxrial Sereeity last Toosday, and now 'e's \u003eopped it. I eaul it Iuick.\"--Pall Mall Gazette. Captain John Stevenson met a re- cent arriva] fromn the «auld countree\" and seeedily got into a chat witii hlm over conditions there. The new ar- rival toid feelingly of the terrible toll of war upon the faixr land of Seotia, the sad tales of young men killed and maimed, the. sufferings of the famnilies left bhibnd. Tua wus a riglit sad tale in every way. \"Why, mon, we're jist plumn dis- tracit wi' it,\" hie condluded. \"And 1 suppose the war lias eaused the, price of provisions to go up in Seotland as weil as everywhere else,\" comrnented Captain Stevenson with aympathy. y'eret\"are h «Aye, mon, y'erct\"are h visitor. «Proveeuions lias gone up in prie. saxpence the bottle.\"-Argo- MARK-- OF MÂJEST MxSSINGr A good many years ago, when lier Majesty was spending a short time in the neigliboxxrlood. o! the Trossachs, the. Prineess Louise and Beatrice psld sax nnexp.eted visit to an old female cottager on the slopes of Glinhinlas, who, knowing that tliey hsd some con- nection witii tihe royal hoxxsehold, bhxntly ejaculated, \"Ye'l be tih. Qnecen'a servants, l'il thinkin' t» \"No,\" they quletly rejoined; «w. are the Queen's daixglters.' «Y. dinna look 11ke it as y. lise neither a rig on your lingera nor a bit gowd V youx' iga !\"-Form and Home (Bfitish).- \"LET NOT YouR LErr . \"Did you hiear- wliat liappen.d young Dowder Sýimpkins?» \"No. Whait was i? \"11Te huirt his right armi in a uxot accidlent, and nowý he'ýs comnpelled hoist ig,ýhballs with bis left. 1 deued awkward, too.\"-Bimîh Age-Flerald. The kirk in a certain Sots lage iii lu rgent need o!fep and Sandy' MrNab, a very popuil memiber, hadl been invited] to lcofll subseriptions for the purpose. One day the mninister met Ssan walking irresoltely along tiie roi Hie at on1ce guessed the cause. \"Man Sany,\"lie sad earnest \"in sorry to scye in titis stateY' \"Ah, weel. it's, for the good o' t cauise,.\" roplied the delinquent ha puyv. \"Ye see, meenister, it's throughi these subscreeptions. been down the glen collectin' fur, ,an' at every hoose they made nieb a we draippie.\" «Every bouse! Bt-bt-au u ]y, Sandy, there are some o! the hi memibers who lire teetotaller.s » \"cAye, there are; but 1 wrote 1 17NPROJ'IT\u0026B[iE A six-weeks-old cal! waa nibbli at the grass in the yard, and m viewed'iu silence by the city girl. \"Tell me,\" she said, turnlng i pulsively to lier hostess, «doe. it re, ly pay you to keep as simall a cow that ?\"-Harper's Magazine. A DOMESTIC ExqSOiis \"A p.nn'orth each o! liniment liqxxld cernent, please.\" \"Are they botli for the. sarne p son, or shall 1 wrap separatelylf' \"Well, 1 dunno. Muvver's bru 'er teapot, so site wanta thei.me what muvver bruite 'er tespoton, Pl'al Mail Gazette.",
         "WONDERFUL MISSION 0F THE INTERNAL BATH BY C. G. PERCIVAL, M.D. know that over thiree hun- wsand Americans are at the ime seeking freedom fromn weII as serious, ailmients, by ce of Internai liathing? know thiat hosta of enlight- îicians all over the country, i stcpts phlysicail cul- te., etc., are recomminending rnizing this practice as the y way now knowu to secure rve perfect health ? ire the best of logieal rea- bis practiee and these opîni- these resns wiIt be very g to everyefle. first place, every phy-,sician nd agrees that 95 per cent. i iliness is caused directly Uty by accumulated waste iii ; this is bound te accumu- use we of to-day neither eat )f food uer take the amiounit ,e whicb Nature dernands in t she may thoroughly elim- waffte unaided. the reason wlien you are iii iaa always gives you sorne- memove this accumulation of fore commencing to treat specifie trou- ped if there ~waste in the that the farn- ýfH, one o! thc ts, bas boldly that if our i in infancy, the lenigthi of our lives would be ini- cre1(aSed to probably 1,50 y-ears. You sc, this w'aste is exti'emely poison- 0eus, lnd as the bloed fw througli the walls or the çoloin, it absorbs te poisons and carnes themi throughi t1ie eirulaiontha~swhat cýauses Auto- Intoxication, wihal] its priin etiervating and %weakeiing resuits. These pull downi our powvers of rce- sistance and render uis subjeet to al- inost ainy serlous eoinplaint whisSb mnay be prevalent at the titme. A nd the worst featiire of it 18 thiat there are few of us wvho know.% wheii we are Auto-kntoxieated. But yen neyer eau be Auto-Intoxi-. cated if youi periodieaily use the pro- per kind of an Internai. Bath- that is sure. Tt is Nature's own relief and cor- retor-jnst warm. water, wbich, uased in the righit wý%ay, cleanses the colon thoroughly its entire lengtb find niakes and keeps it sweet, clean, and pure, as Nature demanda it shall be for the entire system te work pro- perly. The foilowing enlightening ncws article is quoted frein the New York Timues: What mnay lead te a remnarkable advane in the operative treatmnent of certain ferins of tuberculosis is said to bave been achieved at Gny's Hos- pïtal. Briefly, the operatien of the removal of the lower intestine ha. been applied te cases of tuberculosis, and the resuits are said te be i every wvay satisfaetory.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"\"The prîiciple of the treatment Îe the removal of the cause of the dis- case. Recent researches of 'Metchni- koif andi( others have led doctors to suppose that mlani ' c(Onditions of chronie ill-hevalth, sucli as nervous de- bility, rheumnatismo, and] other dis- ordlers, are due to poisoning set up by unhealthy conditions in the large intestine, aind it has even been sug- gested that the lowecring of the vi- talîty resulting fromi suchi poisoning is favorable to the development of cancer and tuberculosis. '\u003cAt the Guy'e Hospital Sir Williamn Arbuthnot lane deecided on the hierole plan of renmoving the diseaeed organ. A chuld who appearedi in the final stage of what was believed to be an incurable forin of tubercular joint disease, was operated on. The lower intestine, with the exception of nine inches, was remnoved, and the portion1eft wua joined to the sinaller \"The. resuit was astonishing. In a week's time the internai organs re- suxned ail their normal functions, and in a few weeks the patient was ap- parently in perfect health.\" Yeni undoubtedly know, f rom your own personal. experience, how dul and unlit te work or thixnk properly, billousneusansd many other apparent- ly simple troubles inake yen feel. And you probably know, tee, that these irregularitiea, ail directly traceable te accumulated waste, make you reaily siek if permitted te continue. You aise probably know that the old-fashloned metbod of drugging for these complaints, is at best only par- tially effective; the doses must be in- creased if eontinued, and finaily they cease te b. effective at ail. Tt is true, that more drugs are prob- ably used for thie than ail other human ilii eombined, which uimply goe. to prove how universai the trou- ble cmused by aecumulated waste real- ly is--but there is not a douht ii drugs are being dropped as, Intergi ]3athing is becoming hetter kinewni For it is not possible te coneei until you have lad t1w experien yourself, wliat a wondferful braeerg Internal lBath reallY is; taiken nigbt, youl awake inii lie mlornling wli a feeling of lightness ;ind buoyaai that cainnot he desvribed-y' ou are a soîuitely cdean, everything is wvorkil in perfeet accord, your aippetite better, your brin is clearer, and yi feel full of vimi and confidencee f the day's duties. There is nothing new about 1 ternal Bathes excep)t the, way ef adi i4tering thiemr. Somne yeairs ago r Chas. A. Tyrreli, of New York, w so miaclo vl benefited by N faithfi ly using th(, method then ini vg that le mnade fInternal Batha, his s, ciai stuidy and improved 'iateril1 in administerinig thc Baith anud in~ g ting the resuit desired, This perfected Bath Lie eaklled t \"J. B. W.\" Cascade, and it is tiie o which has so quickly p)opularized ai reconmcended itself that hundreds thousands are to-dIay using it, Dr. Tyrreil, i his practiee andi searches discovered m1any uniquea interesting facts in connection wi this subject; these lie has coilc in a littie book, \"The What, the w the Way of Internai Bathing,»1wh wiil be sent free on request if y, addrees Chas. A. Tyrreil, K.x 534, 163 Coilege Street, Toronto, a mention having read this ini The. Ce adian Magazine. This book tell% us facts that Inever knew about ourselves beo and there is no doubt that eey who lias an interest in lis or her o phyeical well-being, or that oft family, will be very greatly istu ed and enlightened by raigt earefuily prepared and scientiia correct littie book.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER \"THIS CAKE IS SURE TO BE GOOD P Good mixing makes good cake and Lantis Sugar, on account of its \"Fine\" granulation, mixes quickly wîth the butter, making a rich À creamy batter. Sugand la the best foi baking, prtervmg aud th« table. It coames to you pure and citait, luit as it was packed at the reffnery, no band touches At but your own. 2 auulS ILcartons. 10, 20ad 1lb. bap lTie Ail-Puirpose Sugar\" Rade frein pure cane Send a red hall trade-mark, cut frein a Laiitic bagr or gwe wilI çeiid you a free copy of the Lantic Sugar Cook Book, witb many new recipe% us sWttL Look for the rai kali trade-mwk a e.i pckage Dmp. ChLATLANTIC SUGAR REPINERtES% LtM., P.wer Builditg, MONTRRAL DeicWus ansd Appetieinq Ingersoil Fimento Cheese Consiste of luger- 9011 Crear CL..,. and .wetSpamiah Pime=to. As. Your Grocer TrrIO ( Cream cheese --i suero to Bey ordinery di....- n 1ayot -i zc creaminea-r-n nutritive Croertes.It preada lik ,. and i. LiglIy .eOnomioei. lu packlage@ 15c. and 25e. MA DEIN CA4NA DA bIgersoil Green Uhilo Cheeme lagersell Cv.sm C..., blI.aJ. with Caliloru,. ChleI. l'iquat ud àeiicoua. In p.dtges Ille, \u003c'Spreada lihe Butter\" The. inesi 0 SPakt Co, d",
         "0 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER oqer~ Known the world over as the mark which identifies the best of cutIery Look for it on vyy bka\u003c*e. JOSEPH RODGERS \u0026 SONS, Limite% SHEFFIELD-- ENGLANI CLARK'S SPAGIIETT WITH TOMATO SAUCE AND CHEE55 A highly nutritious and partii ularly appetizing dish. Bc sure when ordering spaghel to specify CLARK'S and kc vour monev durinLy War- Tir£",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER This Little Girl Has Always Been An Active Out-Door Baby fier Mother Writes: \"Virg-iia, stili love,, OpeNamid always ditE. When she stopped tatking be(r hottie, 1 did mot wNt.11 to betginl feed.(ing ber every%- tblng, so decided on Grape-Nuts w-ith huot niilk. \"She thrived on it perfectly and for xnonths ate nothing else. 8h. stili has il for biri\u003eakfast, but, of cour-se, eats other thingas fow.- Name giveri on requegt by Postum Co.. Battie Creek, Mieh. GRAPE -NLJTS supplies in delieiotis and easily digestible formi anl abuindantce of the simplie, tborough nourishmnent so essential to hevalth iin growilg llii- dren, and to mental and bodily vigor iu adults. Mothers everywhere have found Grape-Nuts a big faetor in keep-. lng emiles and good eheer in the homte, \"7Were's a Reaaon\" CANAI\u003eIAN POTNCEJREAL , .. WINDSO,Q4TRI",
         "22 CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER, Use \" Madle i n Canada\" Telephones We can supply telephoncs for any and cvery service Write us and describe your telephone need and we will mail you one of our Bulletins that will be of particular interest to your wants. -Let us send you particulars of the PRESTO -PHONE, the Canadian Automatic for factory and inside private' systcms. Canadian Independent Telephone Co., Limiteci Adelaide Street West, Toronto L -",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISERZ 23 VICKERceMAN'S of Color It matters very littie how fine the yarn may bc, how evem the weave or how perfect the finish on a plece of cloth, if the dyt i. inferior there is ievitable disappointment in store for the wcarer. When the color fades the suit becomes shabby-the dressy appearauce is goue. \"Ab3olutely guaranlee ai! Blacks and Blues. Our standard vnaintained lhroughout deipilc increêsed cosL\" VJCKERMAN. Thiis statemeut issued recently by B. VICKKRMAN \u0026 SONS, Ltd. indicates tht policy that they have followed for a centur-y and a quarter. The standard they set ia invariably the. bighest, aud that standard la iuaintained. absolutely in spite of difficuities. Th. C»mm rmuè ff mm~ beeam De q»Uay Bs M Bm. 14 .V ICERMAN \u0026SON E 94 NISBMT \u0026 AULDI, LâNKeU. TQOO Cmma *Im Aem S3UIE BAKGE SERGES AND imEvi VIOT q",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Fr oopishm Cogb, SpasodicCroup, - ~AstImU, Sors Thront, Cougli., Bronchitis, Colds, Catarrh. Kbed.uhile y.,l ske le rixd Cresoline @top* the. paroxyums 'I O p' Cof rad rives siidfrdi Croup at onc. DOO.aN40- tosu oýr f-q Asthni.. The. air carryOn the. 5atiâptic vaIJor. inopired with every brratl, uak.u breathing tat8y. s-tlws the. more tmAdiros toym h ogi, *-.ring restfuIt.1 Cresotne i. bronchial comsplication» of Scar. l.t overandM ca4 nd fis a valuable \u0026id in thi. tre.at- Try Cr.ioline Ant*pi Throat Tablets for thii. - ritWlthmt.como»d o nippry U1 ar,1corice, %ugr nd rvAie.They can t ara yoIL Of ) our druggist or from un.1etw in, utamp. Thé YAPO-CRESOLENE CO., L..«mg-NüU.. Buildng Noora Canada A .fe .and palatabl. ox.flve for chid\u003cen Mrs. Winslow's Soothing Syrup A WJui.li N.*n.nrcolic )ntain opium, morphine, of their derivatives. ritd colic and correcin ina- Another Triumnph of O'Keel For more than 60 yea name O'ICEEFZ has f\u003er alIthat', purestan in wholesomo bev. Now,we have scored wlith SPIECIAL PALE The flavour is unique- Other beverages bearing 0. K. BRAND Bedahst Style Winq. Aie D.e, Col*, Suaprlhs Bout' Cream So4,Lu, Orneâe Spw e Order a case f rom your dealer. s «_",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 25 N YouaDoii'tWearYour Enagement Ring on 'f-the wb% fiv se çartb*m pap.r that ija the wrong fillish. wreight au1d nmaoWoltýdilng power? ,.. pmi. C6 Preciet*cr apa, ?Agi just w~i us wha.,t mprcal rcmuiak you wjubh ioI obtin. Alo givé yOur dmaltus linm. M1ake the usuial nunnbrr of cerbon eopl.s. Siond us t he Original togetber with copies and shites ofc rt:npairus.%d, alin place. and we will pricrb th certc deXrce of n isth finish, w.leght and mnaelfoliig po)wer that exacily FITIS\u003e,tiurn.dL Withthe pre- s;criptiion wr wuiJi %end frr. a SAMIL SE ET tif flic carbon pal\"r yOuj ouiglt to UNITED TTFZVflKER Co.. M8 Yg.eda St., Tenait. Ce.. The Ori'ginal and only thngquteac G-e011n resent prices there infl ns sl tore economnical.o th ek fur Gror for ci 's Star Brandsg M\" yMINARDS - =a Co., LLwted w ~m~tosLINIMNri",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADA Put Your Hand To'The Plow! Ever7 foeIh furrow means rater success for you, added pi Canada~, iucressed swnegth to XeErmieand suer victory for The. famer. of Canada are toclay plmyimg an all-important part in tbi cosilict. Hon. W. T. White, Canadian Minister of Finance, says: 1 Diee ow inhteret payanents abroad, sustain or share ofth burdoen and romte t th jreatt poulible degree pwosperity throughout the aiti the duttof \u0026HCnddi.tzst c-prt i rdc poile f t can bc used or sod. For Canada at thsjuncture wod ofthe hour sud be rion . production, and again p For fu Informiation regardiag fa.ming sopotuaiti.. in Canada wits I.iirt, (",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISR2 Gentlemen! \u0026ldness îs a disease that can be cured, then ~why not FAT ATITENTION TO YOUE flAIR Ou tietment is simple, scienfific and elfective. Send fot free bookts. DELAY IS FATAL WdoUt0n Cs.p.ondnooScoo of Mai Culture P. 0. Box 185, Vanouver, Mo _-I A TOILET TREASURE lirfai Imaauo's FLORIDA WATE Test iiif ma* ti he Bath Itla ô.stm afdreIing;O b9 A* ywr Dn.gbtf Rn -m5tm udwek Iroquois Assortment Choice Nuts and delicately-flavored Chocolates in a variety of combinations. Another revelation of the high standard of - 27 'ý11",
         "28 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ONCE THIS BEAUTY # HAD PIMPLES Stuart'\u0026 Cailum Wafers Proved That Beaty Counn fr4om theo IIod and trom Nowhore EUes. Frthe Ila %w lth fr-eýc triali paeknge. Plaster your ekin ail over and you'Il stop breatbing in an hou, TFhere la offly one way to remove pimples, hlackheads, eruptions anc eczema with its rash and itch, and that is by the blood. In Stuart's Calciunf Wafers, the wonderful calcium suiphide at meals serves to supply the blood with one of the most remarkable actions known to science. Thisa is its activity in keeping firm the tiny fibres that compose even such minute muscles as those which control the slightest change of expression, such as the eyelids, lips, and s0 on. It is this substance wbich pervades the entire skin, keeps it healthy and drives away impurities. Get a 50 cent box of Stuart's Calcium Wafers at any drug store and learti the groat secret of facial beauty. A free trial package will be mailed if you wilI send this coupon. FEE TRlIAL COUPON Ir. A. S1TUART CO., 340 Stu*rt BIdE,9, Marsla, 1111111 Saad me at once, by return mail, a free trial package of Stuart's Calcium Wafers. Name ................. ...................................... Street ......... ....................... .... City .~... ... .... rv........ ..............",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISERZ 29 ProsD UNL 0 Pez:o AUTOMOBILE TUBmES DUNLOP No other tire maker lu Canada cao give you tub-es made by the word-lamous D.ugbty Proceas. Yet the Doughty Machines. used excluslvely by us,. rCpresent the greatest stp Ioevard in the tube-making industry. Belote th. adveut of the Dougbty Machines there was a Inore.or.Iess fractlonai difUeremce in tubes of the same rated- size. THE SURE WAY IN TUBE-MAKING, There art mauy operations--all important - i the making of eack and every Dunlop Automsbile Tube. The re3ul in a Trie-Rlgbt.Tbrough lube whbkb qualilles for records like the \"Traction Tread\" Tianscontinental Thiumph of 1912. On that meimorable trip one tube, without bting pumped up a second figue, went ggyem Halifax to Vancouver j two went from Hulifax to Craabrook , BC\u003e, and th. fourt\" veut irom Haifax tq Portage la Prairie \u0026sIl fics. accomplsaicents on the first supply of iT bo acb particular tube. How is that for a test of durability and general etflciency? Tubes mnade by the exclusive Dunlop Dougaty Procest are absolutely alr-tlght. Wbeu the thin layers of fiac Para Rubber, whil compose Dunlop Tubes, are placedl to eter. aad vulcanized, they becomn, a solid, iaseparable. unleakablu unit, Bouides beinfec (rom tvury semblance of a flaw, Dunlop Tubes are aiways ulforn in se and Leara what these Doughty World-Famous Machines bave doae'for motorists-use Dunlop Auto Tubes. DUJNLOP TIRE \u0026 HUBBER GOODS COMPANY, LIMITED tisad Ofice ani Factorise, TORONTO. Branches; Victor\u0026. Ya.oever. dm..at Calgary, Saskatoon, itg.a Wiaipg, Leudes, Haemilton, Toronto, Ottawa. EMItrsa, StJJoka, 8.., Halifax. M*Jà, \u0026/ Hig-eradÉ Tires fo rA u tmob iks, M.b»- Trécks. Vo1orryd1es, ,ndrk a ags asnd IIikh-grade Ruis\u0026r Rdting, Paking.f Hlos, Ilh*Ir, Vais. Hlorse ShtPads, Zigf, nd Geri Rub\u0026rrS.i4~",
         "30 CANADIAN MAGAZINE~ ADVERTISER Enjoy 1917 Touring Canada's llighways and Boulev in Canada's Standard Car En rhanced plea4ure and satisfaction are attailied b\u003e' ownersi of a motorequlpage em- bodylng efficiency. comdort, beauty and 'rcoflomy. Mc-Lsugbliin engincers have perfected a mechanigm of maxnium efficiene\u003e' around the valve-in.head motor. Mcl-atngClii body types for 1917 are ex- quigie. models ofour rnaster coach builders' art. Wben miles are measured by the gallon, MIcLaughlin gasoline economy aq proved be- yond arument. This fuel saving, with the Ntlstglnpower, %peed and fiexibllity, bas teMcl.augiii valve-in-htead motor car as CANADA'S STANDARD CAR 1917 sees McLaughlin iolor cars further in the lead that, before. Our new iticludes models of Four andi Six cylindei from $880.00 up to $1520.00 ini roadnti tourlng car bodies, andi a Sedan at $M3 Model D-4-35-tbe new Mcl-augblln F the challenge in 1917 rnotor car vaiti Passenger touring car. D-6-63-a new MIc 1aughlin Six wil h 4 valve-in-head mnotor, taking the place c, scaaon'a D-60. D-6-45--Caniada's Standard S Pas Touring Car. D-45 Special. a replica of D-45, wlth a refinements andi improveinents. A NEW NlclAUGHLIN 7-Passenger car will b. announced inl January, 1917. desacription andi pricea on the model best suited to your needu.",
         "CA.NADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 8 A NEw SERtES pr.ir# *t the n*ew CA.,rolei with all tormfcar 7p or d str ty$e, $65o.oo f. a. b, Oshawa. , lhe new Chevrolet ' s r-cady. Itpoess ail of the rema,ýrka:bie poinjts of former mnodels and contains mnany ncew oncs. In-the mattcr of detail much has beeon donc. New and improvcd uphoistering is provided. This ]s truc (if the cushions awid backs. The front spring construction is new. The gcar shifting is easy and free. No effort is required. A steel channlel sec- tion framie, reinforced at eNv r ccessary point, insures great strength. Th'e clearance of the car is ample. A patented electric Iighted oil fecd is another new feature. A speedomneter and amnieter, both standard equipment, are mounted on the dash. Non-skid rear tires are furnishied. fitld -xih A.- Ail these are unusual featkires and erc* weath r Tp $7ooo before offered at the Chevrolet price. CIIEVROLET MOTOR COMPANY of Canada, Limited OS HAWAP ONTARI O Send for Descriptive Literature \"MADE IN4 CANADA\" W)ËÉýý 'AT AT JKT y y si",
         "32 CANAPIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The treat that its loyers learn to expeot from a cup of \"SEÂL BRAND\" COFFEE, is always realized to the full- for \"Seal Brand\", holds its aroma and fiavour to the last spoonfù.l ini the air-tight can.. In 1:, 1 and 2 pound tiwm. Wiloie-grotind-puiverized-aao fine grounti for P'ercolator,. Never qoId in bulk. CHIASE \u0026 SANBORN, MONTREAL This £50 Prize Baby was fed on Robinson 's 'Patent' Barle Physically, thi, boy is as nearly perfect as a chil be. In a compe tition organized by the IlDa117 Ski of London, Engiand, this baby, in compet ition wh a nuinher of other ch iidren, won the tirst prize of £58. mother, Mrs. Ethel Modge of Trafailgar Crescent, lington, Yorkcs, writes as follows, \" He is a fine, he and strong boy, as showii by the photo, baving bet tirely fed on Robinison's 'Patent' Barley and rnilk three months old.\" Thousands 0f babies that have been unable to r any other food. have been strengthened anid nourWsh Roisns'Patent' Barley. The tact thatR\u003ei Patent' Barley is prescribed by nurses and phvs*ii its strongeSt endorsation. Our bookiet, IlAdvice to Mothers\"-is indispensa every niother and will be sent frec upon requcet. i9S1 SR. pul Si. W. MÎAGOS, SON~ \u0026 CO-, ILIMte 0 au simtreai Soie Agens for CaulaToe",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEIZ y NWf. j btROURNU AIK LINt KY. 'CAR OLINA RgsORTS Southera in « Pi tlahutCa d\" * ' FOIA RESORTSI 14OT HAVANAt CUBA Atlaita. (;a. a I,ýospIjtl FONR ftMUMATIBM PARK MOTEL MOUNT CLREUN, mie\" Badfi, 1-1,10. Il.0I. liut 14 PAB11ADENACA. T .Uua..Paa4.m.Gl A 5aaltaa R wità Turf DIEVT AND HEALTI- If os ant to keep weiI-u to the Topotch-Strongj*althy. Efcettthen you m ust kno ho taat. Thbd is a machine. It demands cert~ain quantitiesan ul lts5 and only under fvrbecondftin was th body ôi7 DiybaIly fo oe thm.I el ow te Batte gk et*ytm has beem but truhyas fehw0vesinii research. ~ ~ I ilqv o arew idao eand it5 po55ibilities. The ook15 ree Wrte or t now. BATT LE CREEK SANITARUM. BOX 109 BATTLE CR.EK-,M1Cw CE1NIIDIAMISI romN YD(s *£ NIO Mw CAO OR CREIT UY MINlE ETE RIEE Tew 20' down aud $1~ , $V3 Ty o JA00 wt\u0026y gst. Dany hn,tm mcn.in, \u003eI*Or»YY il T \"leAmad TOONTO Ca. eaed u tb plblic\u0026Ddilul by1 \u0026t 25 T1 l\" 61 sbýhed Rep- and 5Matte Il and the1 rand Ope l ItTSde MI LItýnv i LL. IC (ITY",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The Double Track Rout WINTER TOUR -TO- CALIFORNI and ail Pacific Coast Points FLORIDA, TEXAS NEW ORLEANS, Etc. Winter Tours Tickets now on sale Stop over privilege allowed 7 the Companyv for pi W. S. 84",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 8 \"JULIAN SALE» le namne bchind the goods is ycur gua-trnte for the quality 'RTE-lITE W TARDROBE Every appointment in its construction- cvery convenience evcry point in the manufacture of the 1 Rite-Hite' Ward- robe Trunk is one more good reason why it should be _A the trunk of your choice in contem- plating a longer or shorter trip, sutnmer or winter. In a very real way it is the most completc of wardrobes, and apparel travels in it with as littie risk of crushing as it would right on the \"hangers\" or in the \"Ches* of Drawers\" ini the home. (Have it deinonstrated ini the store, orIwrite for special bookiet.) $33\u003c=1 te $9Oý The JuIiaii Sale Leather Goods Co., Ltd. 105 KCing Street W.t Toronzto",
         "86 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER Canéamdian PaciJfic FLORKIDA Via DETROIT and CINCINNAT Why flot Florida for your Winter Tour? The Attractions'are Unsurpassed Beautiful Palm Tre8-Warm Sea Bathing-Orange and Bananna Groves-Goif-Tarpon Fishing- Luxurjous Hotels for ail Pockets. TWO NIGHTS ONLY FROM TORONTO Winter Tourist Tickets Now on Sale Fast, Train 4.00 p.m. Daily fron Toronto, via CANADIAN PACIFIC MAKING DIRECT CONNECTIONS AT DETROIT Particulars frotu Canacliau Pacific Ticket Agents or write W. B. HOWARD, District Pamoeuger Agent, Toronto",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE AD)VERTISEIR MLL THE WAY betw.e Toronto i-dV ancouverv Vi FORT ARTHIUR, FORT WILLIAM, SASKATOON AND EDMONTON Conections at Winnipeg Union Station for Calgary, Prince Albert Regina, Brandon, \u0026\u0026 \u0026H imtat poinaia Wetvuo Cainéca mad the. Pad\u0026fi Ct LEAVE TORONTO 10.45 P.M. Mmmed.,, Wuida..day, FMyda AL MODERN\u003c EQWIPMENT REIABLE EXPRESS SERVICE TbroUghtc kets to ail points, and berth reservations fron LcalAgent or write to General Passenger Dupt., 68 King St. East, Toronto, Ontario ; Union StaLtion, Winnipeg, Man., or Montreal, Que. YOU would fknd it a decidcd convenience t centralize your purchases of office supplies- and perhaps an cconomy as weIll Every requfre- ment is here at your dis- We have a 250 page cata- posai - typewriters, desks log of general office supplies an furrilture, stationery and accessoeies. A copy (blank books, ledgers, etc.), wiII be sent you upon re- printing, lithographing, embas. queat. It is a cyclopedia of office alog. needs. USE MAPLE LEAF RJBBONS ANlD CARBON PAPERS United Type wrter Company, Limited Unewo Building, 135 Victoria Street, T'oronto AND IN ALL OTHER CANADIAN CMTES",
         "88 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADA NATIONAL SERVICE PUBLIC NOTICE is hereby given under the authority of i \"War Measures Act, 1914,\" that during the first week in Janua 1917, an inventory will be made by the Post Office Authorities every male between the ages of sixteen and sixty-five, residiul Canada. National Service Cards and addressed envelopes for tb return to Ottawa have been placed in the hands of all Postmast for distribution amongst the persons required to fill in such car Every male person of the prescribed ages is required to fill in a return a card enclosed in an envelope within ten days of its rece: Any person who fails to receive a card and envelope n obtain the same upon application to the nearest Postmaster. R. B. BENNETT, Ottawa, 15th December, 1916. Directag Gaz THE NATIONAL SERVICE CARD 1. W hat i yourfullname? . ......... . ..... ................2. How oldareYou?..........y 3, Where do yeu Ive? Province ... ........ ... . . l what country were . 4. *ame of c ty . . . . 6. Inwhat cou was Street ........ .................... Number . ... 7. In what country vas your mother barn? ..... 10. How much time have vou lost . . Were you born a British autect? in last 12 Months from sickness? 9. If not, ar naturalised 1. Have you full use of your arms? ..... .... .. . 1. Which are you-mari 12. Of your ler ?. ... .. 13. Ofyour sight? ,ierawidower 16. Hovuaavyperàocsbe.ssI 14. Of your hearing ? . .. ... ... ..... yourself do Yeu support ? 17. What are you working at for a living? . le. Whom doyouworkfor? . 19. Have yo a trade or profession? . .. .... 20. If no, what? 23, Would You llling t change your present work for other necess work at the mame pay dar",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 89",
         "40 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER",
         "A Wet/xAlarn u.rn- TlO Bjeat the'Time Clock BTG B3EN mnen are ail- tkce men wheri the day begins at the works.* They mnake the time clock boosi their gamne-put them in strong with the boss. For, everywhlere, it's factory talk that iîg Ben starts thie day-hec f ves the boys thecir breakfast cill king befo.e thie whistle toots. They used to pounid thie pillowv right up to the last dot-tilt Big Ben soe 'cmr a better way, as the paymnaster soon found out. La Salle, Il, U.\". Just give Big Beni a tri, yo0us- self; ma 1e yo u r ro]il-ove r-t ile pay. To have vitra uie about the hiouse, and beat the last minute bunch. you'Ul like Bik Ben face to face. lie' sevcn iniesic tall i, ipunki- niih!borIy- dowvnriht vd ail 1hou P rkiriz, Iwo sti aIf-lalinutc calia or steadily for Big Ben is ix timnes factory tested. At ynur dcaIkr's-, $z.50 in the Urited' St.ats $ j'-o i ii Caniia da. S vn t po- 1pa id , ri re ,Cuip t uf prike if your dealer docau't tckhir. I7frlfýd k -ild -t e fi btior rmit àhr- ldnI id th, -~.1 Ail - h-Iejk Reýukt-actrac. Iri$s _ýnIuLk;lk Western Clock Co. \u003c\u003e,, Ofkri,v fndx- Paby Ben., Pccdn Ben, Xmre. NakrsofWei ftm, Szp-a. Lookou .id -J sd",
         "It's a Fine Thini To Be Wel The. corifort eIsons aeC Il many 1 by have won back ýig it and uising the. ITUN \u003ewadays it. popular to be Theres trwe it iassu beautiiuI andi brilliant, 1 différence when there are niâny w. (the best\u003e, proven by 50 years' e Eectro Silicon. This great poiu does not injure the finest surfac is universal. Jheware of the. kir off the silver with the ta\u003ernisaý easy but- asv eiapowder. i.eur , g~r11.r cornes inlg, sea 2. aleason\" MOAY\u0026I. SooI.da ELETR IC ýTART THE IEW YEAR WELL by joining thse i'sst and ever-increaulng multitude of tbose who find ln Life Insurance the one sure way of protect. lng dependent ouma - wilie uiaking tlmely provision for tbeir own future at the saine tiine. joi the. ever-increasinç nuwber wlio have foud, in the. Policies of The Great-West Lite Assurance Company, ail that can be desired iii profitable Life Insurance. Thus yon. wiil obtain protection at low cost. and will secure a share in the profits tbat are beiug paid to Policyltolders of . LIFL asalr a r7. Hlead 1 In rwgue Di' Made in C Loose Price and Bookâ Sheets--Speci Coaplete Stock unsurpassed STYLE, or VAL bNaufacturng Saina Aceount o.k inf S M I AD PEARL3!"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian magazine"
      ],
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_287",
      "label" : "Vol. 48, no. 3 (Jan. 1917)",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06251_287",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06251"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_287/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_297/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian magazine"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE OF POLITICS, SCIENCE, ART AND LITERATURE VOL. L. NOVEMBER, 1917, TO APRIL, 1918, INCLUSIVE TORONTO THE ONTARIO PUBLISHING CO., LIMITED 1918",
         "Contents of Volume L NOVEMBER. 191 7-APRIL, 1918 PAGE A(ON.y or FlnAcE, TilE ,..,.......,.,............ Rev. Dr. NewelU 1), HuNle 409 Rarrnu STaEL A Mouov . ......... ......... Arthtir G. Penny 297 I3iowx, \"o. ....,.... .,......,..........., Lciwrn B. Ditrand 4 ý( 21 CÂANA AND TIIE UNITED ýSTrA]'F .......................... ....ý A. Il. U. Colquhoun 204 CANADA'$ RELATION TO THE WAýR..................................John~ S. Rwart 507 CANMNIAN BOAT SOiNG, TUE ..................................Chas. S. Rt«ue 307 E2ANADIAi IIEROYS OF T11F: E 11 B* ., .. . . ........... ....... Frank Yeigh 20 U\"ki»uIN tsou iiv AmvirrT U W Ax ... WV . Swan.qon 415 C,%AfJmAN. Lraàws Wz ~ r............ ........... J 11. Gibbon 83 CÂANArnIAN WKNPIER ......... ........................Nily P. WVeaver 15, 175 P)AHAUAUýi DATs ...... . ... ,..,,. ,....... ,.... Iee M. Edqar 455 AND A MxFýRY ~ ....................... ý J Cuiemg WaUe(raq 89 DONLD ~K~z. .....,,......,.... .,,.............. Mrnext Uawcrof t 342 IN Aua ...................... ......... Larey Aniy 65, 1,51, 252, 32-4, 421 ENULANIç'M TEN OMTO......... ................... Dr. Newell F). JuiNi 159) ESETILCODT oN r PEC,'ix..............John R. Bone 472 FAioloi SCEN.Es mon.% Dccn.................. ...F. M1. BeII1-Smnith 118 FRANCE(r, TuE Aaoniv ov ................... Re.D.No-tcell 1). MH8 409 GODA or Ta'i. NEW En.% TUEl...............ý......... ..............Rev. Lorire Pierce 279 GOVIx, S!I 1,031.......... ...............................John Boyd 466 Hwuua.................................. C(arlon McNnh 0 11.toV.io Till' IAVEJL,.VA\u003eN........................Frank YeMgh 20 Haugu\u003e MAN-, StON FOR TUE.................................. H. J. Sider 55 bru'SF oi xnNu TIE ..........................._.......... Harold Sands 4Z37 IXPZUIAL Srmr i Muuic, TiE . ................. -.........ý. Herbert Antcliffe 525 INDIA AND TUE 'WAR . . .. ............................................\u003chro. W. AmIten 397 .... ÀN'a ............. ........ .......................... W. Mdf). Tait 448 brav -,azQuauc, TITE . .... ..............Il. H Iorken and Hugh A4. Ryan 3 LAUoUEV Al A'tfFECTE» DY TUE WAR, CND.........................W. WV. Swansqon 415 lUWWIIATI!NO TUErWA IN AND........ .......... ....... . ...Latra B. DnranI '216 LITRATu,~RE, WIIîER IS CANADIAN ............. .................... ....J. M1. Gibbon 3833 L'oxaF, Sinur S...................................John Boyd 1466 MAKNZE DOA ........................ ....................rneeýt Cawrroft 342 ANCUN MARiN NE AnOLn........«....... «................J. WV. Norros'8 19,1 Moim or BRiTmsi STEEL.r, A......... ................Arthur G. Penn~y 1-.9 Mwfisc, TaiEl laPEIAau SPlIT IX ~....... ........... ........Herbert ArteaNfe 525 NOW FO TUIIMEDMNr..........................................C. H.1.Snder 55",
         ".. .......... . . . .... CONTENTS I PAG k OUKN UCHNTM\u0026ARINE, Ax.......... ......... .....W Noi-rro8y 193 (\u003eîJ,riTFl PoLiTIcR AN») ELECTIOXS .... ......... ............M. Forxyth \u003c7rafif 47 PLCT ESSENTIAL CONDTION, or........................... n R. leio 47,2 PzI\u003cItN. CANAIIIANi WOMRN..................................... Rmiily il.We r 15, 175 \"PEOLE1ý\" ];ROMWN............ ....... ............ ............. .......b t Be. Jtraod '291 ]POL[ITICS' AND EL.ECTtONS, OLI\u003eTTME ........................Fr t iat 4 QEETHE INEVITAILE ....... ...... -........I.\u003c.loknat ghARys 8 tREJorNi\u003eER, A .......................... ......................Il. CJ. lIo\"-k\u003cn 3411 ,SIR I,0MaI GOU'IN......................... ......... ...... ........... . --johiS lioyd 466 STI E NT FA 11-11Et'S 11ETISPEcT, A . . ... -....... .............I 1ilda l?. lloyd CoUliiiu 29 TiRiIT', \\VAR 1\u003eRICES AN» .... .............. .................Prof. S. A. Cudimore 240O TO03 TIMMSON: PAINTER OP TUF. NORTJi..........................1J. M. MacCtdSm\"11 37.5 TRÂRFEMAIo, EOLND'...........................ey. Dr. NtuteIl 1). IlillUs 159' TwEKITT-FIVE VISAIRS................ ....... .......... ....................TlA Editor 4410 UNIrI'ED SWrrER, CAN-ATA AN»T THE.......................... ...... A. Il. U. C\u003cdlqtgdsoii '201 WAIS IN CANAPA, LPaUVIDÀTIX0 TITE....... ....... ..... ...........atsra Be. Ditr«id 26 1 WÀRIS RICES AN» .- rr ............... ý......................Prof. 8;. 1. (Jstdmoifr, 2U0 Wuiusn 15 CANAT)IANý LXTERATISE? -..... ..... .......-...............J. M11. GibSbons 83 NýVwr 11\u003e TI[FY DFM U4?....... ........ .........Don. Chas. LauyeUelr '208 Wliy ENGLAND Fxasn'.8 TO WIN ç....................... r Dr. N.e'll 1). IfiUiR 37 TII I~TE liI8 F-ý............. ....,.... ...... ...................Harold \u0026Sada VI7 W oME rN Wa)EEH UT. CANA»A............. ..................... foria Hayirard 386 FICTION. ACCEsSORY AFTER TVE 1'C .'cr............................ ........... Jffi BtrAuhiýon 478 AsilEs or UREA1S........................... ...kbtICI~tn Marke(Iy 9j5 BLUIESTOCKiYGý, TUE..................... ...........................,rdith G'. layn, - 71 CANADA, MY 'Omis...............................WWksmi IJieiki 171 CÂurxVrT........................ ... ....................~ epeTuao 5 DAIiM HoisnE, TITEs................................W E. Norrisw 165 DorBLýE INTRIGUE, TUIE..................... .......................Rdilh G7. BdIyfb 129 DuyuA-S, AsiiEs or..................... ................... .Isabel Ercdes.tone Macfskay 95 ................................... .......... arrie Merfon Lyon 2-M GoDEEvY AND ITE JlrN.r................... ................Mýjadge Macbelh 1.11 GRam ADENTURE, THEs.................................. ......... ilili BstUf.f 403 GiTysT, TUTE UNBII\u003e\u003eEN ...ý................................ Blanche, Gerirmsde Robbin.9 232 GukISIUAS, TUE ......................».................... ...........Johm Rwssell 107 JIONOURI Or DisFEAT, TUE................................\u003c7cen4l(ine (h',r\u003cm 496 IwmuisisR TUiE DovxILE.. ..................................EdIih \u003c7. Bayne 129 JETNETv, GO»EEvy AND TUTE ... - -....... ....................... .....Mtdel Mlarbeth 141 LART TICK IN TUE 13AG, TUEF. ................. ...........B\u003cG.irice Redpatih 216 LEANI)ER: VOL01uNTEER -...... -.... .........................arrix Merion Lyon 815 0),0 AîýcIInF. ..................... .................7heodoré, \u003coodridge Roberte9 5)19 ICR OF TUEL V\\Er.!, TUE ......_... .......... ..............1. WV. Wslhiam 428 SAPEGOATS...............................................Victor I,.uri.eton 1'20 SOIMIER NENTi Doon, Tisz........ ý........................Katohleen Btac*b\u003erwi 514 UNITIDDEx GUEST, TITE................................lan-he \u003cJertrudr Robbins 232 UNCvzE NOR3MÀN'S PORTRAIT........................... ............EFsteill M1. Kerr 489 VU-.7)E MESSINES RLInt\u003ea....«........................................Eden Philpotta 350 WAmv.aS AT SANTT, TUE ................................orace Arnnesley V'achs,1 22 5",
         "PAGL )U31. Tm ...... ~Louise 3if ey )owmaru 512 it .W... Muie AlbertaPherric 156 \u003e,oEM u Cisthblert a1. MaDnl 504 uuAW THE ... .h\u003eog Herbert Clarke 93 eau ~ ~ ~ ~ lAnif ehu MJoe 485 ~~ u...... ......... ......... . . MO g S TY 1:38 mss~. ..o~ .... ... M4ddIs(Os 330 'UE ..... . 4lf red Gordon 4816 A LOuiaf C. \u003cGasfgot 281 ... .. '» '' . .. ... ... .. A rthurS L. Phelpx 290 ........ ........ Cas. WV. Barltrop 400 Ile....... .... ... Cuthbert G. 31cDonald 50-1 ....... ....... ýMfrgarPi- Yrinade8 Bryan 215 ThJodrs 0odf/Ie Roberis 94 TAtII., TutV ,*.Ioo ý 3, 184, 271, 3,59, 1V, 5:3ý5 auLu\u003cn ~propi, anfd 4ffairx 78, 179, 269, 8.55, 442, 5:31 F.N T..... Carrenut HuMoUr 450, 51-0 4\u003c~aMouua.or ILLISTRATIONS. . ... .......... ...Draw1igby Lini R cnal5s M C'11RMT31 1 f\u003eîuaaa - .. .. ...~.... Panting l\u003ey F. M. BeIl-Sinitb 88 waBA-EF ...... .. Painting by C. W. Siipson 366\u003e PKmu r ...... .....t..at Painting by A, Suzor-Colé 105 .... ......... Box hotogrtphi by Edilh S. Watson)1 192 Ix 's ~painting by% pascal Dagnan-BouvectC 228 IN Bo zlTaa 'intlng by Maron Long 278 $i Bor l S T i .... ... . . .. ilt ' - a intng by G. . hore 2usi uit or ST. IvrEs .. ..........t .g........ Paintinton 24 FOREST ~ ~ ~ ~ Pin ................ 1b\u003e, Pascl gnawl-iouveret 223 ....... .... D)riwnig by Louis iiete(.s 157 s I' I3M ... ni .à u H i ...... D)rawinlg by l u,;R e nkr 7 ou ,AISEETA ..... .. . ....p itn y) C. W. Simipson 45 1 'sui E P1ilntlng 1\u003e' vc. W%. JeEferys 50( 5 rauTuai 1alntlng b\u003e' Andrea de] Sar-to 835 BsorLGIrUMwTu r1 D)rsigi by Louis Raemaricers31 ras H ETI rtFIat, C.aDA ...... .... Painting by A, $ zr-Coté 10(M EuwanlsLui LAnsAst.....\".... Potognapb b)y W. S. Lou1son 118 ~uiX Ais uv.xarlo ~Drawlng b\u003e' Louis ltalmaekeaS 401 ts 4a r a , T A I ( ' V L Z T O . . . . . . P a n t n g b y J . J a u n i e T i s s o t 1 8 ý t or .ux.\u0026at TuaF ) rawlng by Lo(uis 11ences 5\u0026 ~~~~~ .h.oio Paitig bv IHara\u003e' Britton 4 Ixo PL\u0026AYES ... .......... ... Painting b\u003e' VincenzO Irolli 2 9! mBaaau A~ ~ ,,...Painting b\u003e' Ivan Neilson 411",
         "THE CANADIÂ MAGAZIN E NOVEMBER. 1917 PRICE 25, Cents",
         "No Erce A(kali Examine a piece, of fine lace that has been washed with Ivory Soap. Notice how clear it is, how much it feels' like a new piece, how fresh and unworn it looks. It is tests such as this that show you the ail-round quality of Ivory Soap-its mildness, purity and freedom from uncombined alkal. 1VOY SAP9944 % PURE IVOIRY WAOA S 0 Mo«de în th* Proct.y \u0026, Gamblejfactories at Hamion, Caynadu",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEL t of its success, The Oliver Typewriter Company again upbets the ast as it did àin 1896, when it introduced visible writing and forced Zow this powerful Company-world wide in influence-cails a halt s of selling typewriters. IL frees buyers of a wasteful burden. iy strong eflough, large enough and % to do a big, startling tbiuig like this, ýaring. 'acts are set forth iii our amazinL- ex- Th ere WI be no idie stocks. This 1 \u003cteat direct now with the ard $12 No mniddlezen-no useles.- ini Cani te and give you the savings. cheaper And we gain econornes for oursi isn't philanthropy. ,luêt the. new, et ing buiniess to tne prea.nt-day e\u003c Note this fact earefnuly. We c Oliver Nine-the lateat model- $62.65, duty paid ini Canada, the was $125 util March lat, flot oI!ér a rehauit, le copy. FREE TRIAL a stanc Oliver y et our book1 and irprised. A TYPEWRITER REVOLUTION New Machines for Haif the Former Price ý HOW WE",
         "ie Canadian Magazine L Contents, November, 1917 No. 1 'r1 AT ST. AINDEEWS Painting by G. Horne Ruqseil - Frontispiece .1EVITABLI3 QUE13FC H . C. Hoeken and Hugh A. Ryan- --------3 R CANADLIA WQMEN - - - EmilyP. 'Weaver -- -- - 15 mz\u003eFl RJMrA 'Am HuuOES OF THE ]3ATTL.E- --- - -- -- - ---Frank Yeigh - -- - -- 20 .4rtRATED DENT FAR1\u0026UR's RETROSPECT - Hiîlda R. Boyd Collins 2 -29 qTrn rr AGDALEN. A P.AINTINO - - - Anidreai del Sarto- -----35 ýNOrAND FjuIITS TO WIN - - NeweII J)wight Hillia - - - - 37 1)À f FýZ -- -- -------W Mon.\"\u002b Iu\u002b---------- ----- -- -Louis Raemaekers E HIRuD MAi - - - - C, H. J. Snider - --- -",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Imperi*al Royal Flying Corps Group of Officers and Men of the Royal Flying Corps Applications are'now being accepted for the Cadet (Pilot) Wing of the Royal Flying Corps. Ail candidates must fulfil the following conditions: (a) Be between the ages of 18 and 25. (b) Be of gond education and show evidence of good upbringing. (c) Be pbysically fit in accordance with the standard of fitness laid down for the Royal Flying Corps (Cadet Wing). Cadets are put to no expense and are paid from date of attestation. Technical knowledge is not an essential, but a good College educa- tion is required. Canadian Cadets are trained in CANADA. APPLY ROYAL FLYING CORPS 56 CHLTRCH STREET, TORONTO",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The 25th istmas Number will be the tweniy-fifth Chrigtmas ber of The Canadian Magazine. It \u003ee the most attradive number, both Art and Literature. Short §tories, is and essays will be contributed by ge Macbeth, author of \"Kleats\"; 1 Ecclestone Mackay, author of the Hill and Over\"; L. M. Mont- try, author of \"Anne of Green les\"; Archibald MacMechan, :he Gertrude Robbins and others. ill be alto a list of special drawing, and illustrations by the wn Canadian arists John Russell, F. M. Bell-Smith, othy Stevens, as well as reproductions of notable paintings. Locluding Great Bdtain, Ireland and most of the Colonies. SINGLE COPIES, 25C.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ô Mifitary Service Act. 1917 Za. Should Tou Be Exempt? Every facilty is afforded those who have reasonable ground for applying for exemption unaer the Militai-y Service Act. Each mnt's case wti lie considered b\u003ey a local, civil board, siting ini the locality wvhere lie lives, and will b. decided as is desirable in the national interest. The idea behind the Militai-y Service Act is to cail up fii-st only those whose absence fromn civilian occupations svill cause least disturbance to the country's economic and social ,le. One hundred thousand reinforcemets-no more- are te lie raised under the Act. Cases of Exemption Over 1,250 civil tribunals have bren organized throtighout Canada, known as Exemption Tribunals. These boards are comprised of 2 mnibers, one appointed by the county judge and o'ne bya joint committee of Parliament. It will lie seen that these tribunals ar-e non-military and independent. The. members are men closely acquainted with conditions ini the places where they sit and ivili be alte to give each case synipathetie attention. National lnterest WiUl Govern Exemptions Consideration w.ill lie given to applications for exemption received frorn men engaged in the. pro- duiction or manufacture of cotamodities necessary te the conduct of the war and the support of those at l\u003eowe and cases in whi real hardship would lie caused by the withdrawal. Not ail mnen wbo register thee claims will lie exempted, but such claim will receive careful consideration. National interest ruat gover.. Promptness is Essential Prompt application for exemption is strongly urged upon ail who, being included in the. lrst cla.ss believe they deserve exemption. But first visit a Medical Board and find ont if any fui-ther action i. required. tinles! the. Medical examination places you in Category A., you will have no iminediate",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER rndon Gjloir oma OHEAPSIDE, LORDON, SUGLAND. The Great S/,ecialists in GLOVES9 HOSIERY, -amiUNDERWEAR An unrlvalled varlety In stock -Air - EXTIRGMILY lIBIRATrE PIlOUE 2bwreHueO5te Pnoe Lias of FuIiy detailed Price Lista of lenta Mnay be ail Departmnents May 1,. REE, on ap- obtained FREE, on ap- aect front the. plication, direct front the. 1llahlng Co. Ontario Pubillshng Do. »d Llifted le Street, West, 200-206 Adelalde Street, West \u003euto Toronto",
         "CANADLAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER If You have a vWar Bond.- you can double your estate by using the interest you receive to pay the premniumn on an Whether you live or dze, you ,wortk twice as much as before. \"Your Suite Give the, Best Wear and Satisfaction of Any 1 Ever HaÔ.\" Thi, p.ttr,.n vlntr testimny la ecquent prcofoffthe dir;ability of our F.bricu -mi of the saifcto hich auir made-taqneaaure Suaits afford. Ask usn ta mail yotu paat aid our cal- ILeci-onf Wlinter sasp7cs far your re~ran an excellent iade Tweeds, Suitings and O\"eoeatig . fahianable ira coer evand satyle. refi.,d in appearance, and dependable in weaar, Von may purchaaelengtbsofan\u003e Fac. co-e, ar order Gar- ate.taa to b. made to Y-,r mensuare by aur expert T.ilor- irag Staff. Many het %-nLi~eftn Nasy UTf ýLtvs4 t, aves.vt'ltoyl tii trial ! The?- -er voil, 1-mk vsl.tndâ daists tW es.agst nmr SU1TSý - ilutattn aetmai an4ve-al1ee- lnm-hle itritIs l'eol., ajujag.s\u0026nti\"*1R.7l\" Navy 8arges at rein r 14.0 lu, \". Peati. Tsoe Pri.. Liai. ,.d Stgie, S. If-,.. --n.t ai'\", . , -.t t. -1, .,d4. ia th. Demii.. -srqst EGERT ON BURNETTI Ltd. a. W. Waréaouoo W*aiIst». Somerut, Eaalamd I When You Catch a Chili-[ (V'andenbraeck's Proce,.a\u003e This lght, dry. fleeeg, medicatud wmol -3 dilferent Irons poultice or plaster-gmnhrates a grateful, soothilag beat. the. Instant 1* Ys applied, that goes straigbt t. the aourceof@ rot tutrly. 5 C. ai your Druggiis L U MUBA G0, SOftE THROATS, CH EST COLOS-amil hu ndred cather similar aches and pains yield to THERMO.. GENE. Let it help yeu today! ls.a...4 bg ,t fo. -dgi. eh.Th. Tler.sg-n C.., Lhefb.d,. Hb.ee' haath, Eeag. S./es agen3 fer C-ede HAROLO F. RITCH il \u0026CO.,, Lî: orth 10 McCattl Street -Toronto o\u0026g-ooe o",
         "~MARGARBT'S COLLIEGE 13100 ELOO. TK., T.Oa.OJTO, ONTARJIO A Reid.ntiaJ and Day School for Girls orge Dickson, M. A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, and Mrs. Dick from Preparaor to University Matriculation and First Vear Wo %.tic Science, Physical Education- Criek et, Tennis, Basket B, ning Bath. Writ. for Prospectus ~i. MISS J. E. MACDONALD., B.A.., Preà;4ent. Principal. P.- Por .M.Cu. Si 8or uio. lcicli. Tm1igZ Mu,,,k",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISERIC A CANADIAN SCHOQL FOR BOYS Varetul OwVp.lgtit Thor~nih lný.trwtin TAriuPItLyna VIfl Wint.r 7*.,m commanoe. No.. 9,191 11EV. 1). liRIUCE MACDONALD. M',.Â.. LL.D. Oalendâr sent un applIcatIon licadnu*gt Cbe MIaroaret Eaton %cbooi of ILterature anb jEXpresgion X utub9 S t. Ir jvio umt. - r4wm. O..rge Masmtt P ri i c % W\u0026 Engli.%h, Froench, Physical Culture, Voice Cultuire, Interpretation, public Speaking. and Dramatic Art. Sorc for Caloier UPPER F~ou nded 1829 by SIR JOH-N COLIBORNEI, Gove.of of Uppoe Canada A E BC)\u003eA R D1N C7s C_-H(D\u003e\u003c\u003e1- FOR C)Fk1 YS\u003eV AUTUMN TERM DEGIIhS THUASOAY, SEPTEMUEN 13tAi. ai 10 a- Boards Mtur- n mithe 12th Coursges for UiestRoyal Militar Cdeeg and Business. Senior aind Irparatory SchýXdS insprt buldnça wih ful equipriint. Large grounds in subunban district. ».tacmd infirmary, with resident nurse. bumimer camp at La 'ke Tlima1gani conducted by lii. Phvical Instructor of e. CouIego. Schol Cale,,dar crntannf Il 'tlcular ail b. fimniiuhrd on application. A àN 0YM \"BZ1 1'. COLLIEGE Rockcliffe Park, Ottawa LESIDENT SCHOOL FOR BOYS tion. Modern Fireproof Buaildings. Ten acres playing-fields. itrance 1916, six candidates paased. ,edar :-Rv- C. P Woellcoembe. M.A.. Headmmante",
         "'o CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER DEPARTME?4 r OF TIIE NAVAL SERVICE. ,VAL COLLEGE OF CANADA. eani-itiona for entry of Naval ito thi. Colaeg. are field at the. exam. entres of th. Civil Service Commois- iu year, auccesaful candidates 4ohuing ýr about the. 1nt Auguat following the. for entry are releved up tothe 15th ecretary, Civil Service comission, wbam blaali mtry forme cati bc r examluation muet have adtb day. . nd flot reaclued tl.r it-nsth let j uly fcllowing the. examination. a caon b. obtained on application ta C.M.G..,Drputy minuitr of the. eparmen oftheNaval Service. G. J. DESIARATS. sputy Minister of the Naval Serv;oe. b. Naval Service. arch , 2. 1917. ,prublication of thia advertiamierent HOME STUDY Arts Courses only s' SUMMER July aned Amgmus QUEEN'S UNI VERSITY KINGSTON, ONTARIO ARTS EDUCÂTION MEDICINE SCHOOL 0F MINING XINING CHEMICAL MECHANICAL CIVIL ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING OKO. Y. CHOWN, R.gistrar. 10",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER il Keep Your Poliey in Force o ot -~ wuittm wj. ~HILE you have the. abiRow 1a oul my ie and beathy vîgorous exetdy\"Beaîîty of youth you ~ Thi hantig axioy i iboudconstantlv preserv ofi . Muualu L nit ' surac ecne romplletely removed by meani and protect it for 1 yera polkcy. causeâ many wmnt A policy ia the Mutuel Lif. lookc far eider than they should. A Uitile of Canada has aiso a cash val1ueî ,1 .exý that -\"c\"ontnal creases yea attention paid to, the skin and complexion by yea unti i atures or W. now by the use of Thu a utul plic leval Gourauds A W.f policy is a great hip in k s.curing credit and bais ma\u0026de re ta r will be anmrly repaid by your Youthfu Wriieor bei miîW.IdmlBeauty in later years. It net onl pro. pui4ts.\"tecta and preservea the. complexion for the future but greatly improves your i~MuuaI jj ~appearance now. C onceala facial immuuai ifebierniahes, in use 70 vears. of Cainad-a Send l Oc. f'or Trial Slze Waterloo-Ontario F\"ed T. Hopkins \u0026 Son, Lanai You Look for SECURITY Whether with the intention of taking out insurance or associating yourself with some Company, you look for security. The latest figures emphasize the un- excelled -financial position of this Company. * uslles la Force over SS59,0o0 Assets 4 1640,0o0 Net Sburplus ég 2«0100 Icnown~ as L",
         "12 CANADIAN, MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Thrift For Children G IVE your son and daughter, a lesson in thrift by opening for themn a Savings Account in The Bank of Toronto. le/p themn add to, it at regular intervals, The Thrift Habit acquired by the chil- dren will be worth more than the dollars it costs you. Savinga Accounts for small or large sums invited at ail branches of this Bank. 119 Branches in Caunada ASSETS . - $73,000,000 DIRECTORS W. G GOODERHAM, P'RESIDENT JOSEPHI HENDERSON, VICE-PREIlENT Wliamw Stone, John MIacdonald, Lt.-Col. A. E.G Drig.-Gen. F. S. Meigbea, J. L. Hàiglhart, William 1.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 1 .. .. . ..",
         "14 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER THRE ROY AL A 0F CANADA inoorporat.d 1880 Capital Authertzgg - S25,000,000 Irv*nsFunda - 14,124,00o Capital Pald Up * 12p911,700 Total Aosts - 29590009000 HEÀ\u0026D OFFICE *MONTREAL DIRICCTORS- SI R 11ER BE R T S. H OLT, Prosid.m 8. L. PRAS 9, VixoePM, E. Y.-B. J OH NSTON, K.C., »art VUe-Pruit4 James Redmonîd G. R. Caws D. K. EUiott He.. W. H. Thorne Hugh Paton Wm. Robfttmon A. J. Brown, L.C. W. J. Sheppard C. S. Wiloz A. E. Dymuent C. E. Neil Sir Mortimer B3. Davi- G. IL Duggan C. C. »tackadar John T. Ro-, R.. MacO. Paterson G, G. Stuart, KC.C. Executlve OfIcIere. E. L. Peaie, Msnaging Ofrecter C. K. Neill. Qeneral Manager W. B. Torrance, Superitendent of Branches F. J. Sbrn Asitn Geneml Manaer 365-BRANCHES TMROUGHOUT CANADA A1NO NEWFOU NDLAND-365 M~.ao Branchs in Cuba, Pouto Rico, Domialca R.pubik, Costa Rica, Venezuela, Antigua, Bafbados, Dominilca, GrecadaJ\u0026m\u0026ka, St. Kta, Trimiad and Bahama Iuands, British dulant and Br\"tW Honuas. L5UDSM, 1100. Bank bldts., Pdmou St., LC. 11 WCor Willm andcdar Stâ. SAVINOS DEPARTMENT BANUHS \"I Should Have Taken More\" T HA isabout the. only coiuplait aid Policyholders make agaiat this Comepany. They cim that tbey could have been urged to talc. a larger Policy at the outset",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER Pald-up Capital - - 8 oooso Issorv FUnU 7,421,292 Total Deposits e 92,102,072 Total Assots - 121,130,558 233 Branohes ln Canada. Extendiag frou the. AtIanti to the. Paaific, S.vimgs D.prt.est at ail Draubles. noeiv.r\"vd of $1.00 aad uipward, mod i.otSm.. allowed at best current rates Goneral Bankingsie. BOND OFFERI NGS Lits oj bonds whkch we o0er sent oni oppicGlUoIL E-pery \u0026cur*l pou. es3es the qualities essunil ln ai sound lnveitmen4 combinig SAFETY 0F PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST weEh 7 HE MOST FA VORABLE IN7ERESF RETURN. Government - Municipal corporation and Proven industrilI Bonda. yIeld Sje to 61% W. shall be pleased t. aldywu ln e. svlsdaon of a desimabi. bw este. c CORPOINT1ON -LIp1ITD National Service It is a duty to Canada and the Empire, flot to spend money unnecessarily, and to save as much as possible. The citizen is thus performing a national service. He is also performing a direct service to himself. The sums saved whi*ch might be spent ta no advantage, be they small or large, will rapidly ac- cumulate, and iniacomparative- ly short time will amount to a sum, which may prove very advantageous and profitable. The surest way to save these small sums is ýto regularly de- posit them, with a safe and strong institution like the Canada Permanent Mortgage Corpor- ation, where they wiIl bear interest at Three and One- Haif per Cent. per annum, \u003ecorppounded twice a year. We welcome deposits of a dollar and upwards. Canada Permanent Mortgage Sorporation Faid-up Capital and Reserve Fund Eleven Million Dollars Toronto Street - Toronto ESTABLISIIES 1855",
         "MAGAZINE ADVERTISER FrWoopIng Couqh. !Fsml Croup, Aithma, Sore Throat, Coughe, Brouchitia, CoIds, Catarrh. Esterbrook's STEEL PENS THE M4OST POPULAR PEN\u003c IN CANADA opuint PC nespoI. for De-iptive Bsket. Druggiste. moat Taib]ctu for the ir- peyembark, Iiconoce, nthri3ou. Of )ýour 9tampý. OLENE CO. moitreta, canada 'No. 135. Double Elastkc.-Medium fiue el No. 182- Ladies Falcon.-Fie and easy ac",
         "the Padting by f. lHne t i, GOLFING AT ST. ANDREWS",
         "lec rcfG CANADIAN NAOAZIN Vol-. L TORONTO, NOVEMBER, 1917 No. 1 Cbc 3iinévîta]bIe Ocb c BY H. C. HOCKEN AND HUGH A. RYAN EDITOB'S NOTE:-No oue wi11 dcny that thLe racial aniznnsitiesa lways la evi. dence in Canada have been aggravated seriously by the prissent political erisis. Theme a-nimosities appear most portentously among the people of Ontario and the people of Quebec; and although at times they may rest without expression, it requires only an impending general election tu give voice te ail the complainte that have been bandied about by one political party or another ever mince Confedleratien. As te the inerits of these complaints we offer no opinion, but in order that the situation mlght bc revealed we have invited t vo gentlemen of differing views to met down ia writing just Iiew, as eacb secs ît, Quehcc stands nt the present time in relation to the rest of Canada, par- ticularly te the Province of Ontarlo. Mr. H. C. Ilocken la a Protestant, editor of the Orange Sentinel, formerly -Mayor of Toronto, and ia general the spokeamnan of the anti- Quebec element in the Province of Ontario. Mr. Hugli A. Ryan la a gentlemnan, of Toronto, a Roman Catholic, a veteran of the South Âfrican and Matabele Wars, and, aithougli he lias lived ln Ontario nearly ail hMe lit e-tlme, lie bas a synipa.thetie feeling for Quebec and in this instance stands as itm champion. !5trftng ini the MRattonal £r*-tremtt\u0026Ê A CRITICISM B3Y H. C. HOCKEN ROM the day that Gen- inhabitants becaxue subjects of the eral Wolfe de! eated Britishi (rown, they have neyer ac- Montcalmn on the Plains cepted citizenahip in the Empire as of Abrahamu, down to their nitimate deatiny. They cherish the preseut time, the the ho pe that tinte will make it pos- French people ini Can- sible for them to escape froxu what ada, led by their priests, have taken they are pleased to call \"the yoke of advsxtage o! every erisis ini the a!- Great Gritain\". The talk o! eeso faimt of this country to wrest special from Con! ederation, li which Le privileges front the Imperial Goveru- CrQix and other elerical papers have ment andi the Canadian Parliament. indulged reeently, la xuerely a revival ÀAlthoexgh the eountry was eeded to o! the agitation whieh led to the re- Britain by the. French ing, and ita bellion of 1887.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Trac te this policy of strikÎng lu the national extremiÎty, they have seized upon tlie preseut war as an occasion fron' wbich they nuight reap a racil liarvest of concessions for their language. They know how necessary it la for Canada te present a unltcd front te the enemy and how easentiàl it ia that the eligible man- hood ef every Province should be available te maintain an army in the ficld that will do credit te the Domin- ion. Faced with the alternative if making the sacrifices required te gain a victory over the Hluns or the 1c\"s ofour liberty through German dom- ination, thec Canadian citizenis of BrÎ- ti8h birth and enigin have responded te theceaUl for meni with a measure of entliusiasmu that lias chailenged thc admiration of tlic wholc world. Only the Freuch Canadian bas held baek. And net only has lic refused te en- 1Ws, but has representatives lu Par'- lament bave resisted to the bitter end thc atteupts o etfi Geverninent te enact measures that are imperative, if Canada la net te show the white feather at the n'est critical stage of this mlghty confliet. Extend thelagug privileges we nowcenjoy lu the Poice of Quec througli ail flhc rest of the Dominion and thon we shall do our national duty, la substantiaily thic demand ef thc French clerical leaders. That la the price they ask flic British Pro- vinces to pay ini order te get tbcm to\u003e assume their f air share ot responsi- bility fer the defence et the country. I. it auy wonder that there should be bitter resentment smong Engliali- spcaking Canadians? Whlc their sens are laylng down their lives te detcnd the itegrlty of flic Britishi Empire, and for the preservation ef huinan liberty, the Freunch Canadians stand 'with outstrctehed hands, say- ing, «Give us our priee before wc move\". To force us te mccl their demands, they organize riota and threaten rebeilien. Tliey even parade the school dliildren of Ottawa before the flouse of Cemmons, thinking to enforce with a bhidgeon. the claims that cannot be supported by an ap- peal to the constitution. Let us ruile the Dominion or we will not figlit for it, îs ini substance the declaration of their policy and intention. And for this the Frenchi elerical leaders are responsible. These ecelesi- astical rulers of Quebec liold the for- tunes of every publie man in that Province in the hollows of their bands. There is flot a single Frenech Canadiain politiçal leader who can defy the bishope or refuse te, accept bis policy from the lHierarcliy and beld -his place li ?arliainent. It makes them automatons li the per- formance of their duty. The repre- sentative French Canadian laymen are as mucli under the thumb of the ecelesiasties as the comnion people, and they have not tte same excuse. Senator David has given pathetie evi- dence te this cifect. He was threat- ened wlth excommunication for writ- ing a book in whici lic claimed that the priests bad ne riglit to interfere lu polities. Ue was cenipelled te re- eant and destroy the book. 'When the edueated classes among the French Canadiaus exhibit this childlike obedience te the pricats, li the per- formance of their public duty, how cau we wonder at the dedility of the. habitant? The habitant knows no better. is education la se sadly ncglected that lie la eutirely ignorant of affairs, and bis mental processes revolve around the subjeets of the barnyard. fie la scarcely te be blam- cd for his docility te bad leadership. fie is given no opportunity to de- velop bis own powcrs of initiative. \"Witli an equal chance the Frenich Cnadian would be as goed a citizen as hii. English-speaking neiglibour. As a race, flic Frechl are briglit, ln- dustrious, frugal and moral. Their intellectual powers are latent, be- cause tliey arc not perxuitted te de- velop tlicm. Enougli education te read his eatechism aud bis Sunday paper and keep bis f arn' accounts, ac- cording te Canon Huard, of Chicou-",
         "THE INEVITABLE QUEBEC timi, Îe the lirait of his educational training. le it any wonder that under these circumstances the Frenchi Canadians are easily led and easily inflamed by the perfervid oratore the prieste let leose upon themt Give themi a real educeation, se that they mighit study the currents of human thoughit and endeavour in their own day, and they will becomne a etrength te this democ- racy. To-day their ignorance makes them a menace to the peace and good Rovernment of the Dominion. Sitting at luncheon in a Toronto club a few daye ago, one who had spent his holiday in the Laurentian Mountains told this story. He said: \"I asked a middle-aged Frenchmau living a littie beyond St. Agathe who was hie representative in the Provin- cial Parliament, and hoe replied, 'Sir Wilfrid Laurier?' 'Oh, ne,' 1 said, 'I mean who je your inember in the Legislature at Quebcc?' The reply came promptly, 'Sir 'Wilfrid Laurier, just the sanie» Here was a man who had taken part in electione fer years, and hie did net know the difference between the Provincial Legislature and the House ef Comnione, nor did hie know the naine of hie own local representa- tive in either house. The reepen.si- bility for this dees net reet upon that mnan, but upon the clerical leaders, who have kept him in ignorance by dcnying himi an education. The purpese behind ail this je te create a voting population that wil be easily controlled, se that the ecclesi- astical politicians can pledge its sup- port. te thie or that party ini return for legislative concessions. It je a matter of indifference which party t.he priests work with se long as their demands are eenceded. They have pursued this policy for more than one hundred years. They have feund it suceessful in advancing their ambi- tions, and by patiently pursuing this policy they have ereated a great poli- tical machine in the Province of Que- bec which is net concerned with any ether feature of national developmnent than that of extcnding the influence of the French Canadiane in Confed- eration. This îe what je behind their demand for the equality of the French and English language in cvery Province. Although they censented in 1867 te making the French language official only in the Province of Quebec, the Domtinion Parliainent, and Federal courts, they now refuse te abide by this arrangement, and demand that front eue end of the Dominion te the other there ehail be an equal statue for French and English. These elerical leaders know that their dlaims for the use of Freneh in the public schoola of Ontario have no sanction or support in the Briti\u003eeh North America Act. Senator Bel- court, in a reasoned opinion, told them that in a public addrese which he gave in the city of Quebec in June, 1J912. The hiehops have made hum recant hie opinion, netwithstanding that it %vas absolutely in accord with the let- ter and spirit of the British North America Act. They eomplain loudly that the Ontario regulatione deny te the little French children the right te etudy in their own language. They entirely ignore the fact that regula- tion seveniteen prevides that for the firet two yeare of a child's seheol life it may be taught in French. The F'rench agitatore say nothing about that part of Dr. Marchant'e report ont bilingual sehools which shewed that in 260 sehool sections in Ontario theý little English-speaking child was un- able te get an education in ite ewn language. Surely the firat duty of the Ontario Legislature in the enaet- ment of its sehool laws is te provide, with absolute certainty, that every ehild ehaîl get an education in Eng- lish. The parente of these ehildren ini the 260 school sections were faced with three alternatives: (1) To send their children te a French cenfes- sional school; (2) te let their children go witheut edueation; and (3) te sel their fanai at a sacrifice and move te",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE seme part cf Canada where the Bri- tish people are in the uiajonity. This was the etate of affairâ in sev- oral counties in Eastern Ontario, and in a number of places in Northern Ontario. is it net an intolerable etate of aff aire that men whe have inherited their farina front ancestore who badl the deeds fremi the Crown when this Province was a dense wildemese, who eut down the foreete and brought their lande under cultivation, should be driven off their hemesteads by the pressure of an alien race forcing sucli conditions upon themt For let it be remembered that the Frenchi Cana,- diane, led by Sir George Cartier, and with the appreval cf the French bishops, were parties to the Act of Cenfederation, which they 110W at,- tenipt to interpret in a way that will facilitate the carrying eut o! their designs. No graver injustice could be inflicted npon the children affect- ed by these Frenchx echools than Wo leave them at the mercy, so f ar as their education je concerued, cf the French majority ini these school sec- tiens. The justice of régulation seventeen le attested by the fact that it was adepted with the consent cf both parties in the Législature. It ie not toe much Wo eay aise that ne Goveru- ment could exist in the Province of Ontario that would sabmit to the de- mande made upon them by the French lauguage agitators. The superficial etudeuts of tis cuestion assert that this is not a re- ligions issue. That assertion will not stand examination. It ie truc that Bishep Fallon and hie fellew Eng- lieqh-speahing biehops in Ontarie have opposed the extension of the French sehoole. But that dees net alter the tact that the ebject with which the French bishepe are workig la Wo fur- ther the luterests of their ehnrch as much es the interests cf thoir race. This differeuce between the bieheps of Ontario and Québec enly proves the divergence o! their vlews as Wo the beet niethed of exteudlng the power and influence of their eystema in this country. It indicates aiso a difference i their policies which, no0 doubt, is due Wo convictions wihich they have fornied, indlividually, as te how they eau hest promote the interests of the Papacy in Canada. The French bishops are able te point te the exclusion of the Englîsh-apeak- ing Protestant farmer fromn the east- ern townships of Quebec by the opéra- tion of French Luchools. They eau show that the county of Prescott and several other counties have been made predominantly Roman Catholie by this meaine. And they argue that it in the most effective instrument that can bo used to achieve the end for whieh they are werking. The English-speak- ing bishops, on the other hand, are able Wo show that English îe the lau- guage of this conitinent, and that any man who je unable Wo speak that ian- guage must continue Wo be under a serions handicap as compared with those who have facility in English. They are net satisfled to see their people kept ini a state of ignorance which inakes thein hewers cf wood sud drawers cf water for their Pro- testant neiglibours. With a more modern eutleok than that whieh ie pessessed by the French, they do net believe that the intereste of their church eau be advanced unless their people have a secular éducation that will enable thoin W compete with Pro- testants i every walk cf life. This dieparity of view le indieated by the statemeuts of Bishep Fallon and Canon Huard. The Bishop of London places no linit upon the éducation of hie people. Canon Huard says that it ie dangerous Wo give thein more edu- cation thau enoughi Wo read their catechism and keep their farm ac- cunts. It je net strange that tl4s difference of opinion should exist be- tween the bishops, but it is undoubt- edly the case that the Hierarchy of Quebec is animated in its agitation for French 8ehoeIs in Ontario by the belief that the institution whieh they serve will benefit by the extension cf",
         "THE INEVITABLE QUEI3EC the French language and French iii- fluence over the whoie Dominion. As stated at the beginning of this article, the Frenchi have improvedl every opportunity that aroue mince the conquest to extort additional conces- sions for their language and their religion. Their leaders are fond of saying that they defended Canada when it was threatened by invasion from the United States. These as- sertions are ail of a piece, but we may quote one made by Honourable L. P. Brodeur in a debate in the Houge of Cominons, April 3Oth, 1908. On that occasion hie said: \"When at different times in ouir history Britiglh connection was ini danger, it was the French Canadians wbo were there to flefend the British Crownt Who In 1775 mtood up in defence of the British Crown if flot the. French Canadians I Who in 1812 fonght the, battie of Chateauguoay, and repulsed the American troops, if net the French Canadlianst\" Sir Guy Carleton is on record as reporting that instead of the Frenchi Canadians fighting for Bnitain in 1775, they supplied the enemy with guides and provisions, and showed themselves to be in aympathy with the Amnericans. The evidence im be- yond controversy that the French Canadians in 1775 ros in revoit whien it was attempted to enroîl thema to fight the Amenicans. Then in 1776, when the Americans came they fraternized with them, gave them, heip, and supplies without which they could not have corne te the gates of Quebec and MontreaL And, finally, several thousand took the oath of allegiance to the new '¶epubic\", and were enrolied as soidiers under its flag. A year after his more experi- ence in repulsing the American in- vasion, when hie had time to, review the past, Governor Carleton wrote te the Colonial Secretary in London: \"As to my opinion of the F'rench Canadians, I think there is nothing to fear from them whie we (the Bri- tish) are in a atate of prospenity, and nothing to hope for when in distress.\" With regard te Chateauguay, that cannùt be calied a battie-nothing more than a inere skirmish. There were Icas than fifty among the kil.led and wounded on both sides. The War of 1812 was won at Queenston Ileights by General Brock and the loyal British pioneers of Ontario. It. was at this time that the Quebec Act was *passed, which extended to, the Roman Catholie clergy the right te colleet tithes from, the meinhers of their own church, and this was oee of the principal concessions wvhieh they wrested from, the Imperial au- thorities when the fate of Canada was in the balance between Great, Britain and the American Republie. In 1837, when Papineau organized his rebellion with the avowed object of setting up a French Canadian re- public, he was encouraged by the bi'shops to believe that they were wiîth himn heart and soul, as no doubt they were. But seeing an oppertunity to turn this crisis te the advantage, of the churcb, Bishop Poenet approach- ed the Governor te make a bargain that wouid be of greater value to thue ehurch than a rebeilion. He succeed- ed. BY the terms of this arrange- ment, the Goverument agreed te leave the seigniory of Montre2al in the bauds of the Sexninary of St, Sulpice; to, Consent te the appointînent of a bishop for Montreal; te give civil powers to, new canonical parishes; te drop the clauses in the drafted U'nio)n Act about the Crowu nexninating bishopa and presenting curés; snd te ereet the dioceses into corporations. In returu for these concessions, which have been used te make Roman Catholicismn the established religion in Quebec, the eiergy aban- doned Papineau. They had encour- aged him in the agitation se long as it suited tbem, and then tbey made a bargain at his expense and that of bis associates. He resented this lie- trayal witb ail the ardeur of bis an- thu siastie tenuper, and declared that \"when the English were got rid of, there were black gowns te bc clipped,",
         "THE CANýýADIAN 'MAGAZINE and then. were tithes te, b. redueed.\"ý Ther. have been rnany othen occa- siens when similar efforts to extend the special pnivileges of the French clergy have heen made, but space doe. net permit a full catalegue of aIl these incidents. It should suf- fice te take these two perÎods-the R.volutiouary -War and the Papineau Rebellion-a.- corrobonative evidence, aleng with the present attitude of the French clergy in what is perhaps the greatest criais in Canadian his- tory, te convince the impartial read- er that the ambition of the. clenical leaders of Quebec has been, froni the day of the conquet, te gain absolute contre] ef the destinies of tuis great country. As a funther proof of the tiltimiate object of the French clergy te estahlish a French \u003cJanadian ne- publie, 1 tae. the liberty of quoting MNr. Sellar, whe has written the \"Tragedy of Quebec\u003e': That distinguished Jesnit, Father Hlamon, in hie bock descriptive of French Canadian miesions, spoke of Esetern On- tario being ineluded in that CatheUse Re- publie for whMci bc and hie fellowes were labouriiig. Hlere ie lits reference to Eaet- ern Ontario: \"'None cf the obstRcles met bave cec.k- ed the. settiement of the. ve.lley of the, Ottawa and of the Province cf Ontario. And yet, fer the French Canadiane, is net Ontario a country different froni theirs, both in religion and language, aud even inpltige, in that. et leaet, e4iicii relates to~~~~~ eoa neetti pite of tiiese 81f- ftenlties, in epite of a toussious English element, hostile to thie invasion and seek- ing by all possible means to prevent it, thie Frenchi Crinadian pusiies toward the end for whleh lie eet out. Thie Frenchi CRnadians ladlItrate therneelves everY- wiiere iD these countie of Ontario 'wiicii divide it froni the Province of Qiiebee, and cntine bravely te niareii toward the West, The. polily of the. Chuirci ie te guide the, movemnt, plan and forward settiement, establisii thie parluh systein, the, parochial sehool, and the. religions and national Rccieties; tiien te wateh a.nd wat for providential developxaents, that siie. may mass and lee4 the. people for the. effec- tive overthrow of Protestant errer and pagarism. . . .Tiie French Canadien race is God 's ciiosen people to ss.ve North Ainerica and te testere its Population te the. bosom of tiie Oiurei of BRme. 18 this a dream 1 No, it is more; it is an everyday issue.\" This was written in 1891, and what has been aecomplished in the years sinee is preof that the priests have been persistent in carrying, out their design te conquer Ontario. Their cain- paign to do se started fifty years ago, when habitants began te cross the Ottawa in noticeable numbers to take up land. [t was net a case of ever- population on the Quebec side puali- ing acress the river for existence. The neweemers were largely frein a distance, many frein lower St. Lawr- ence parishes, and had bsen recruît- ed by the priests and led by theni to their new locations. The Ontario Gevernment granted lots on easy ternis, and helped. by giving employ- ment in making roads. There was ne need of the habitants mevîng inte On- tarie. There was good land te be had free in the St. John valley and other districts in Quebec which had been set aside fer colonization, coupled with liberal inducement frein the Geverninent. The fact of their being diverted frein their ewn Province and passing in a steady stream imte On- tarie confirms the statement that the priests had settled on a plan of can- paign te bring that Province under their control. ln taking up the. study of that ne- inarkable migration, whoever fails te keep in mind what Father Hamon tells, will b. unable te aceount fer people, deeply attaceid te their own Province, 'wrenching themselves f rom liereditany sunnenudings, igwning the. off er, of their own Government, and journeying inte a country where they knew a majorlty of the. inhabitants spoke neither thein language nor pro- fessed thein creed. The~ people of On- tarie were slow te realize the. piurpese of the invasion. For years they look- ing they",
         "THE INEVITABLE QUEBEC dist circuit ridera sounded the alarn,, that on the upper Ottawa and the lakes to which, it gives acees thxe foundations of a second Quebec were being laid. No attention was paid to themn; it was easy to clas them as bigots. llad the habitants corne into that region voluntarily, no objection could be made. They were doing a good work in extending the settie- ment of the country and rnaking what had been a waste productive. There were no finer cavalry in the world than those ini the arrny of Louis XIV.; as soldiers thiey deserved admiration, but whcn headiig the Dragonades to circunivent flic Huguenots, littie can be said for themn, and rnuch less for Liachaise and hai fellow Jesuita who used thim as their toola. To tell us thege habitants who floeked into Northiern Ontario are industrious, simple au(d kindly does not affect the fact that they were broughit where they are with the design to subjugate Ontario to the will of the priests. Re- gard for thie habitant does not blind us to the planis oft thie8e of whorn they are the inwitting agent. The present quarrel that the F'rench leaders have provoked with Ontario is a detail of this vast design. They have resorted to xnethoda on this occa- sion which have aroused the people of Ontario as neyer before. This la not to be wondered at. The Legis- lature of Qucbec, domninated by th e clergy, and led by Sir Lomer Gouin, lias been guilty of making an attac upon this Province for whîch filcr- la no precedent or parallel in Oanadiiî history. By an almost unanimous vote, at the session of 1916, that body passed an Act perxnitting every sehool board in Quebee to appropriate five per cent. of its gross revenues to carr on a war against the authority of the Legîslature of Ontario. In the face of this atrocious policy, they have the assurance to, pleo.d for ute establishment of a bonne entente. Sir [orner Gouin cornes to Ontario red-handed, aaking for peace and amity between the Provinces. They refuse to respect the constitutioni, even aftor it is interpreted by the Privy Council. Thcy insiat upon their interpretation, which is contrary to the plain terma of that Act. In other words. they have declared war upon Ontario. They are raising the neces- sary funds by statute. They refuse tn be hound by the constitution of the Dominion, and they use this maost critical hour in the whole history of the Empire and of Canada to make this attack uipon the auto-norny of the aister Province. Can there be any wonder that the people of Ontario are resentful'of such conduett .fair IMap for Quebec A DEFENCE BY HUGH A. RYAN S0 mucli has been said and rte about the failure of the French Canadiana in the Province of Quebec to respond to their country's call, that one, desiring to arrive at a, just con- elusion, musut seek the reason. It is well to note that we refer only to French Canadians in the Province of Quebee; for the people of that race residing in other Provinces, it is gen- erally coxxceded, have enlisted in as large numbers proportionately as the other residents. Therefore, it would appear as if environent entered to a-great extent into the situation. The following article is an attempt to show what there is, not only in en- vÎronment, but also i paat and pres- ent history, character and thought, that lias led the Frenchi Canadians i Quebec to take the. stand they have. Lt ia net ini any way intended to be a political article, but i as much as it deals with recent events the actions of both parties have to b. eonuidered. Ln the first place, there is no close",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE relationship in Great Britain i family ties with Quebec, as obtainS lu the ocher Provinces. Most o! us apart from the Frenchi Canadians have family connections in Britain uow, or we had thema before the war. Neither have the Frenchi Canadians !anuily tics in France. The mnost one eau say la that aniong the bighly educated Freuchi Canadians there does exist a feeling of pride in the past history o! France, in lier art and literature. But among the majority of the people the only feeling they have is that France left them totheir own resoui!ces, Wo be eonquered eveut- ually by the British. And o! late years the deportiug o! the religions orders from France, and the elosing o! the churches, lias added no love frein the plous Frenchi Canadian, Again, lu regard Wo Great Britain, they believe that wbatever special riglits tbey have received, they were ontitled to as a conquered people, and they do not sec that they should be more than ordiarily grateful. Fur- thermore, the military spirit of the people bas neyer been encouraged. That sucli a spirit could be f anned int\u003e flanie is recognized by ail ac- quainted with the Frenchi Canadian character; bis love of adventure, o! romance, of appearing in uniforni on any possible occasion. His ability te withstand hardship and fatigue lias made the Frenchi Canadian the great ploneer. But the militia o! Quebet lias been a neglected quantity by every Governmnut lu power lu the Dominion. And the few militia regi- ments wblch do ezist and are located, as a matter o! course, i the cities meet with little sympathy. It le a eustoni in vogue in Toronto to have a xnlitary Sunday service parade at lest once a year, wben ail the units o! the garrison, irrespeetive of ereed, march tbrough the 'streets and attend the one service. As the majority o! the members are o! the Protestant belle!, thie offtciatiug chaplain is al- ways a Protestant. To their credit be it aid that theasermoiflislv ahly given on broad Christian lines and does flot in the least offend any creed. But we have a recent case in Montreal, where a purely Catholie Frenchi Canadian regiment, desiriug to have a Sunday churcli parade, chose the Feast of Corpus Christi for the occasion. On that day it is the custom in Catholie centres to carry the Blessed Hlost through the streets. the 65th Battalion, the regiment in question, formed a part of that pro- cession and caused by that a great uproar in some of our Ontario papers. Was it treason for themn to honour their God 7 And loyalt.y for the To- ronto soldiers to honour the saine Godi QuOe would think so, to peruse the comments publishied. Was that a good way Wo encourage recruiting, even in time of peace? These are not the sentiments that prevail in the trenches, where Catho- tie, Protestant, and Jew are shedding their blood alike, where the Young Men's Christian Association are lend- ing their huts to tlte Catholic chap- laina ini which Wo say mass, where the Catholie chaplain gives c.u.olation to the dying Protestant slier, where the Jew assists the Gentile. Ail these conditions have certainly had something to do with the slack- nes of recruiting in Quebec. But what lias had the most effect in caus- ing that slackness is the lack of educa- tion and enlightenment to the proper way o! lookig at the present situa- tion, a situation that bas gone beyoiid provincialisni, beyond nationalism, te a world isslue. It la weil known that Quebee la mostly composed of a rural popula- tion. And s their speech and litera- ture ia Frenchi Canadian, se their thouglits aud ideas are French Cana- dian. They knew and care very lit- tle of the world outside their ow-n Province. They have been instruet- ed on outslde mnatters but once, and it weuld be better if we could blet that instruction fromn their memory. It les amatter o! history that previ- oua to the -last geucral election lu",
         "TUE INEVITABLE QUEBEC Canada the Conser-vatives joined forces wlth the Nationalies. Whîle the Conservatives in the other Pro-. vinces were \"wavîng the flag\", the Nationallets in Quebee were dragging it through the mire, each with the saine objeet in view-to gain votes. Remnember that up to that turne the French Canadiaus in rural districts of Quebec had neyer been instructed in their duty te the Emrpire,, as mcmn- bers of that great body, and niow what instruction did they reeeive? The best speakers obtainable were sent broadst throughout the country, to warn them thant if Liaurier and Lib- endls wverc returnied to power their sons would be drafted iuto the navy, to becoine f ood for powder lu figlit- ýiug Britaln's batties, in wars which shoulld have no conceru for thein at ail. \"The flag sheuld lie shot full of boles\u003e' was a commen phrase. These and similar sentiments were dinned iute thefr cars, with convinclng ora- tory, until they were believed. And if preef is needed as te their beiug believed, we have only to look at the resuit of the votiug. What toek place ini the other Provinces does net enter into this issue, only in as much as the Liberal party was defeated and the Conservative-Nationals were plac- cd in power. 1Now, when the war breke out snd it was decided, and qulte preperly se, that Canada snd ail (Janadians should take part ini it, what was the situa- tion iu Quebeet? The turne was so close te the last election that the Geveru- ment would flot go about the couutry sud tell the people that what they had preached te thein a few menths before, what they had been te such pains te instil into their minds, what they had made thein believe, their first instruction in their duty, remem- ber, lu regard te the Empire, was all untrue sud wrong sud ouly told thein frein a base sud ulterior motive. No, they had te abide by what they had doue sud sad. Can yen blamne the F'rench Canadisu fariner, far froin the centre et world thouglit, if he did flot know of his own volition that lu 1912 it was right that lie should net take part in a Europeau war iu de- fence ef the Empire, but in 1914 he shouldt As one rising young barris- ter in Quebee very tersely put it to me, -'T am a 'Win-the,-War' because 1 know. Somne et my people are net bauethey do flot kneow.,\" Lt has been said that Sir Wilfrid Laurier should have toured Quelic, and b)*y bis niasterful oratory, 13.18 knowledg(if bis people, lie could haebroughit bis oompatriots to a prop)er understandling of their dluty. But that very suiggestion lsans ad- missien that they had been previons- Iy wrengly instructed by the preseut Governmnent. If net, why net send one of their own? There are mnany able Frenchi Canadians lu the Con- gervative(, ranks wvhorn the Geveru- ment could have sent. But they woffld have te retract their own words; therefore the force of their arguments would be nil. A wreug idea, once flrmly plauted, is hard te uproot. Another important f acter te be taken lute cousideration is the very sinall proportion of British-born liv- ing lu Qucbec when war wus dcclared. We in Ontario miust admit that at the begîinning, aud until recruitîug very pereptably began te fail off, a great percentage et the reeruits were British-boru. That lu itself weuld cause a greater number te enliat frein Ontario than frein Quebec,, even ameng the (Jsuadian-born ef each Province. We must admit the force ef example. And that force played su important part lu reeruiting in Ontario. If John Joues and Tom Brewn, beth British-bern, were work- ing at the saine bench as Tomn White, a Canadiau-boru, and they continual- ly talked ou the duty et every Bri- tish subjeet servlug under the coleurs agaiuat the common encmy, aud prev- cd their sincerity by actually enliat- ing, would net their example have a great influence ou the \u003cJanadisu sud stimulate hlm te follow in thefr foot-",
         "THE CANADIAN 'MAGAZINE steps, eepecially as lie bad neyer been told that iV was flot his dnty te figlit i European ware li defence of the Empire? But Qnabec did not have this etimu- lating element, and, furtbarmore, let us not forget that every Frenchi Canadian battahion was composed al- moat entirely of Canadians, boMn and bred. On top of that remember that it was nnmarried mcmx of miflitary age to wbom the strengest appeal was made. And rightfully so, for many reasons, chief among wbicb la the economie reason that every married man killed, leaving a dependent famnily, entails greater obligations on the country than if heic ere single. And we must admit that not only are there fewer unmarriad Frenchi Cana- dians of military aga, but the marriad ones bave larger familles than la nsually found among cther nationali- tics in Canada. 0f course, all Frenchi Canadians are net rnral. Tiare are centres wbere the people are as muai anliglit- ened i the affaire of the world as any to ba found inx auy part of tbe Doý- minion. Many of these immadîately volunteered. How were tiay treatedi In tbe flrst place, obstacles were pise- ed i the way of yonng Franch Cana- dians recelving higliar commissions; they wera mostly reservad for the Engliah-spaaking. One of the first regimente formed, instaad of being sent to the Front, so that their deeds ef valour could be chronicled and made knowmx and read about the fire- uides of their countrymen in Canada, thereby generating a feeling of prile of race, of stimulating otiers Vo fol- low in their footateps, was sent in- st ead to police a loyal part of the Em- pire, Bermuda, ani islaxxd far fram the zone of war. -Was that Frenchi Canadian Colonel Lesra tried and proved soldier, even placed at the bead of a French Canadian regi- ment tolead them toglory? No, be was relegated to routine dnty inx Can- ada, whici. conld bave been donc by a muci Icas efficient mani. And if this was not enongli to, queli any de- sire on the part of the Frenchi Cana- dian to enlist, the Government sent a Methodist minister as chief reeruit- lng officer amongat a Catholie popu- lation. There la notbing to be said against the \u003efflcer as sncb, and eer- tainly nothing against bis religions beliefs, but nnder the circnmstanees the cboice dom noV seemn to have been the most appropriate. There la also the position taken by the clergy i Qucbec. It appears as, if the Ilierarcby were in favour of the people participating in the war, but not so all the parisb priests or curés, as they are called. Amyone fainiliar with the Provine of Quebec la familiar with the sigbt of the benevolent, kind and courteons cunré. Hie apparently lias only one care li life, and that la the welf are of bis beloved people. Their welfare, both physieaily and splritnally, le hie oe tbonght. H1e must have strong motives to ailow him to, disregard the opinions of bis superiors. Tt was Vhs: lie was afraid bis people would be injnred physically and spiritnil,-ly, flot by the bullet oïf the enemy, for tbat wonld bc a clean injury and one to ba prond of. But anotber injury that tbey wov.ld possibly receive be- fore ever meeting the enemy, that loathsooma injury of which. so much lbas been written lataly. Add to al this the continnally insnlting para- graphs appearing in Ontario papers, together witb the f set tbat few war contracta were let to Frenchi Cana- di\u0026ws, and the only rifle factory inx Quebec closed, and you can bardly blame the Frenchi Canadians for thair lethargy and apparent indifferene was not bec, soins ig anougli to make",
         "THE INEVITABLE QUEBO reputation of the Frenchi Canadian. Those false ideas which had been sown in the mninds of the people soute few years before were nourished by them And still there was no one sent by the Govevrnient te refute them. The Governinent ,was in a bad pok- tion, bearing in mind what had been exploited in 1912. They did make a belated effort, but through just this reason they met with littie succeeas. This was forcibly brought out crn the occasion of the Honourable Mr. Mlon- di» xnaking a speech, in faveur of re- cruiting. Orle of his hearers remark- ed te his neiglibour- that it %vas a fine spceh, bult the mnan addressed( said it vasý flot as good als the elle hie had amade against it, before the election. Now we appear te be ont the verge of a general election. The Conserva- tives haveý taken the stand on con- scription. Soine Liberals also faveur conscription, and Sir Wilfrid Lauitrier la opposed te, it without a referenduiim te the People. But bear in mmdn( we are ill united in our desîre Io win the waïtr. We may have different ideas as ta the ineans, but if Germany wins they will malie no distinction in their treatinent cf us. There seems to be one point in favour of the volunteer systern in Quebcc as against conscription. By conscription only certain classes are taken at a time, the uumarried men first; and it is a facet that the per- centage of unimarried mnen of military age ]i Quehec is small. Therefore i the Frenchi Canadian could be miade te se that his duty is te serve, there ia posfibiity cf getting a larger number of reeruits than by the draft systein. But first thcy would have to be rc-instru-cted in their duty, and it doca net seeni as if the present Gev- ernmnt are in a position te do that. But that is a question for the future te decide. Abeve all things let us try to bc fair. This war is for justice, net only in Europe but throughout the world. Then let ns have justice and fair play at home. 'We have seen the. dîsadvantagcs that Qucbec bas been under. Now let us consider what in thc face of these disadvantages she has accomplished. Comparisons are odious, but one must use cemparisons sometimes to, illustrate, truths. And just here let me observe that mainy who are in symnpathy with Quebee mnale allusion te ther Papineau Rebel. lion. Was that a greater crime than the Macekcnzie Rebellion?7 And is net Papineau the naine of a w'ar-scarrcd veterani of the faînous Pincl(eas Pats? 'Will nlot thc descendants' sacrifice atonle for, the nestors' frailtyl Accordinig te La Presse, of Mont- real, eut of the flrst 150,000 recruits fromn Ontario about 42,000 only were Canadian-born, and 1,000 of these, wcre Frenchf Canadians living ini On- tarie, wbile at the saine tirue Qulebec had inustcred 20,000. La Presse ailec proves by mathematical calculatien, taking into account rural and urban population (the latter being invari- ably the chief source of supply) the percentages of married and nmar- ried men and the percentages of foreign-born inhabitanta that the pro- portion on the bansis of rccruiting in Ontario should have beýen 42,000 Can- adian-bormi, as against 25,000 froni Quebec. Therefore we see that Que- bec was net very far behind, aftcr ail. Again, according te thc saine paper, we flnd, at a stated timne, five Ontario battalions actually at the Front aud seven in reserve, while at the sanie tinie there were eigbt 4Quebec bat- taions at the Front and ene in re- serve, which fact doca not dctract frein Qucbee. But cneugh e! comparîsens. It la net the objeet of tuis article te be- littie the efforts of either Ontario or Quebec, nor te laud eue at the ex- pense o! the other. Let us look at the. situation xxnpartiaily; let us re- member the conditions whicb obtain- ed inQuebec when war was declared and hew those conditions arose; in short, let us in Ontario mentaily place ourselves lu the saine position as Que- bec found herself, and can we hon-",
         "THE CANADL estly say we would have don. better? Let us not forget that the Frenchi Canadians have the sanie average qualities and sentiments as the. reat of humanity. Do w. Englisli-speak- ing Canadians endeavour te Iind eut their better qualitiest Do we read their responsible newspapers, or are ive satisfied with elippings ç!hich are ins.rted in some of our owum papers, inserted te mislead nas lu on far as the real eliaracter and thouglit of the. Frenchi people are cencerned? And net satisfled with that, but their bit- terest enemies (and lu niy opinion these are aise real eneniies te the unity of the. Empire) continually slan- der their religion, aud their loyalty. The. very idea of saying that the conduct and tlioughts ef the peo- ple 'would be conducive te godc citlzenship if it were not for their mentors, the. priests. But tiiese slan- ders have been se often cont rontedl and exposed that they are losing their stinig lu Quebec. And lu Ontario tiiey only appeal te the. ultra-bigeted and the. illiterate classes, and se do net even neit being brought te the. no- tice of fsir-niinded, intelligent read- ers. Are we te take the. speech and actions of a few liot-htads, yonng bloods and rowdies, yen, and nome- times ticket-eNclave men, te repre- sent the. feelings sud thouglits ot the. cultured, reflned French Canadian? On. miglit as well say tliat beeause our city scavengers refuse te dlean ou streets sud renve our garbage we are a dirty people. Do we think that being ooutluually antagouistie will ever get us te live more peaceably with oue another? No, the. iajority of us, both native- hemn sud otherwise lu Ontario, know tar tee littie about our tellow Frenchi Canadisu. W. hardly take the. trou- hle te form an opinion of him by eur own efforts, until we get s wroug im- pression iu seme racial, pôlitical or religious controversy, sud very eftcn that impression is never altered, bc- cause we do net take the. trouble te ~MAGAZINE liud out the truth. In this I may be wrong, but I flrmly believe that if Quebec had been instructed Pro- perly in lier duties, if more encour- agement liadbeen given by the Mi- litia Department, the old ehivairous, adventurous spirit of the Freneliman would have been aroused and they would have floeked te the eo1ouirs in as great nuxnbers and doue as great deeds as are the Frenchmen in Old France. The. Frencli Canadian in in tiie min- ority in Canada, and 11ke ail minori- ties, lie feels lie lias to bce onstantly on lis guard te preserve bis rivhts. It does not add to bis feeling of safety te id ont that lie in lauded and praised one day and slandered and eritieized the next, as the exig-' encies of polities arise. By solexnn treaty lie in to, have cer- tain riglits as regards franchise, re- ligion and language; yes,' and even laws. But only the other day it was advocated ln some papers that this sliould b. revoked and even their franchise taken away. And then we expeet them te figlit f or un, for lihb- erty and justice. And tliey wiil figlit if given a fair chance. They are na- turally loyal. Tliey have proved it. Did tliey lu thie past join witli the revolting American colonies? No, they remained faithfuj te their inew mas- ters, tiiey steod by their plighted word. In that time-presn expedition lu Egypt commonly es]led the. Relief of Gordon, we ibid that F'renchi Cana- dians were there strlving witli al their streingtli and skill te carry that much-needed relief force over thie rapidu of the. Nil.. Tiie Frenchi Cana- dian river songa sounded strange on tiiose waters. They were loyal pion- eers of our great Empire long before that phrase was inisused and abused. Later, in the. Riel Rebellion, did not the. 65tii Battalion froin Mont- real asslst in quelhing the. uprialng, althouizh many of their owu race and",
         "PIONEER CANADLAN WOMEN rica, when the military transport was in a mass of confusion, we find Colonel Girouard placed at its head. At Courcelette the old French Cana- dian cry of En Avant was heard. In the Magtabele War in Rhodesia, when we buried that brave soldier, Captain Finucane, on the battlefleld it was a Frenchi Canadian Jesuit wi said thec prayer for the dead hero. Braving the cold and ice of the fro. zen no0rth, we find the intrepid Cap. tain Bernier each year adding au- other strip of red to the world's map. Follow along the Ene of the new Transcýontinental IThilway, through the wllds of Northern Ontario and Qllebec, and yoit see the hardy French Canadian tanmîng the wilder- ness and graduail1y turuing that ,hitherto inmproductive territory into another granary for the Empire. la not ail this true loyalty. But even loyalty must have encouragement. And to gradually treat them as if they were alien enemies, to endeavour to assign to themt every evil, treason- able motive will not help mucli to- wards keeping that loyalty alive. Conscription does not seem to be meeting wîth great succees, even in Ontario. On the front page of The Globe (Toronto), of October l6th, un- der a eonsprieuous headline one finds that in Windsor out of one hundred and seventy-flve unînarried men of military age, one hundred and seven- ty-four applied for exemption in one day. And the lonie one willing to serve was a French Canadfiaul If this article assists in any way to briug about better feelings, if it helps in any way to clear any mis- understanding and so create a great- er unity between the two races, it will have served its purpose. CAAM \\XOMEN D1y \u0026med1i y 9'.N eJKvr X.-MOTHER HANNAH. FOUNDRESS OF THE SISTER1400D OF ST. JOHN THE DIVINE T bas been said that the profession of nursing is \"the outeomne of relig- ions enthusiasm!', or, as Floreuce Nightingale more strikingly put it, \"Christ was the author of the nursing profession\". In Canada, as elsewhere, the way of the modern trained nurse lias been pioneered by sisters nursing in the hospitals of religions orders. Almost threc centuries ago, Frenchi nuns laid the foandations of hospitals in Que- bec aud Montreal. That was but the beginning. The ministrationa of the religetue were extended with the mardi of settlement, and in peace or war-time generations of «sistera\", trained by their predecessors to serve deftly and patiently, kept their vigils beside the sick or wounded, long be..",
         "16 THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE fore thie woinan, outside sueli coin- The Sisterhood was of very recent munities, iiad any opportunity for organizatioti, havig been founded in professional education in the. care of 1889, \"at the urgent request of churcli the. sick. people-notably the Reverend O. P. Canada's llrst secular training Ford, Mrs. Broughll, Miss Grier and sohool for nurses was established in Mrs. MeLean Howard-for 11f e and connection with St. Catharie's Gen- work iu the Canadian church-\". erai and Marine Hospital about 1873. The foundress and first superior of Ten years later the Toronto General the community is a woman of remark- Hiospital sent out its first graduating able personality, impressing those clans. Since that date thousauds of who best kuow lier both with the Canadian womeu have trained for strength aud the graces of ber char- the profession in the scliools of their acter. A daugliter of the Revereiid ewn country aud of the. United States; John Grier, Reetor of Belleville, she aud many ef the hospitals of the. sis- was boru iu 1837. In 1859 she mai- terhoods new offer regular courses of ried Mr. Horace Corne, a civil engi- training leading up te a prefessional neer, aud till tic death of lier bus- diploma. baud, in 1878, she lived in England. It la, however, 'with a special aspect Returniug te America, she passed of nursing that we are coucerned lu througli the noviciat. of the Sister- this article-an aspect of intense lu- hood of Saint Mary at Peekskill, lu terest iu thes. grim days of war. The New York State, but iiistead of e-nteýr. magnifleent werk of Florence Nighit- iug that eominunity, -,he founded the ingale in the Crimean War nlot ouly uew one in Toronto. At tirst the \u0026s did mach te stimulate public interest ters of Saint John had ne thought of in the. whole subjeet of nursing, but taking up hospital work, but thej' it preved beyeud a doubt that, if were led gradually inta it, and it ls flgitig is a task for men, the, work now an important part )? their activ*i- ef caring for the. wounded demanda ties. the. special gifts of womeu. A decade The beginning of fheir hospital was allowed te, pans atter the war, work was made in the tiien tiny sui- iiowever, before the. War Offce began tlement of Meoosejaw, smre sixteen te employ nursing sisters in the miii- hundred miles swsy froin their quiet tary hospitals at home. community lieuse iu Toronto. «After In Canada aise tie military au- quick preparation, tiie Motiier Super- thorities flrst availed tiiemselves of ior, with three members ef the Sister- the, services et womeli nurses ln an hood and three other ladies (who emergeuey. In the spring of 1885, were graduates of the. Training Scho\u003cil afier the. eitbresak cf the Riel Rebel- for Nurses at Béllevue Hospital, New lieu iu the Northwest, tiiere were York), set out nhirlonlg and roagii mauy wouuded soldiers in that wild jouruey. Tiie railway wau very new country wiio sorely needed care. aud very \"jolty\". Dr. Caniff cou- The Anglican Synod cf Toronuto dacted the party by steamer froxu Diocese resolved te effer iielp, anxd a Oweni Sound te Fort «William, theuce telegrani was sent by Uic Bisbop, aàk- by railway te Moosejaw, where a ing if volunteer nurses were desired large, nnfurished, wooden building, for the. base hospital jast beginning. inteuded for a botel, iiad been taken The. reply was: \"No volunteer nurses. for the. hospit1l, wlth a cottage, alse If you eau seud au organized body un! urnisiied, close ai hand, for the. under a recognized ii.ad they wll uisters. b. weleome.\" Tiie Reeed Doctor \"On arrivai ai the. station the party Langtry was deputed te cail upon the. was met by GnrlLaurle sud Sur- Sisters of Saint John the. Divine, urg- geon-Geea Rod ukad condueted ing thein te undertake tiie work te the. door of the. iteuded hospital,,",
         "PIONEER CANADIAN WOMEN where the keys were forxnally handed to the Mother Superior. \"'The aspect of the interior was flot cheerful. The walls were lined with black paper held in place with rows of laths, the only decorations being conspicuous white labels with big blackr letters, stati-ng \"Smoking Strict- ly Prohibited 1\" It was flot long, however, before a more comfortabla appearance was mnade, and by the evening of the following day ail was in order, and the forty beds were fî11- ed with sick axid wounded mnen. \"The poor fellows were brought in by 'ambulances', which were merely rough farm, wagons, very ditTerent fromi the beautifully-fittedl amnbulances of to-day. The men must have suf- fered mneuh during their transport acrosa the prairies i these rougli con- veyanees, but no complaint was heard -only sueh an expression af relief and comfort came ta their fa(c'\u003es, as ~they were laid down i the littie white eamp-beds. The arrangements nt flrst were crude, and the only room, un- occupied by beds served the double purpose of dining-room and kitchen, where coaking with an oil stove did nat diffuse an appetizing odour. \"'The first ineed, however, was a re- creation room, for wounded men are not always si\u003cck men, aud when their wounds had been dressed the patients would usually have been able ta maie or to be moved had there been any place for themi ta go, away from the wards, At the request of the Mother Superior, a large marquee was piteli- ed close ta the hospital parcli. CJots, mattresses, pillows were sent in and quickly eonverted into couches, neat- ly covered with the striped bUne and White aw\"ning material which had been used for packing. The carpenter made a large table ini the centre af the room and several dozen chairs were sent in. Then came the opening of paeking-cases which the good ladies of Toronto had sent. Magazines, newspapers, chess-boards, eribbage, backgammon and packs of carda were brouglit ont. Above all, to deliglit the soliers, were pipes and tobaceo in plenty. No prohibition of smnok- ing appeared?\" No one was allowed to enter the new recreation-room till all was in readiness, but great wasi the deliglit of the men when they were invited to take possession of the bright pleas- ant place. From that hour the wards were deserted save by those who could uot leave their beds, and a very cheer- ful spirit pervaded the hospital. Nothing in this uuassuming record of a fine piece of patriotic work la more intieres.ting than the evidence of the symipathctic endeavaur of MNother Hannahi and her assistants to provide congenial diversions for their pa- tients, miany of whom wcre mere boys in age. The sisters were fortunate in hair- iug the ungrudging co-operatop af the offieers lu charge. Every man- ing General Laurie visited the ha- pital, and everything asked for by the Mother Sýuperior was promptly sup- plied, if possible. Soon a round tent was put up for a kitchen, and a suib- stitute was found for the objection- able ail stave in a Wood stove, pur- chased in anc of the thrce email stores au the prairie that then represented the business part ai Moosejaw. Some things that the Government stores could not pravide were sent iii as gifta ta the hospital. The ladies, ai the Presbyterian Chnrch at Port- age la Prairie, offering help, were in- vited ta seud fruit, new-laid eggs aud fresh, light cake, and the hampers which came from, these generaus help- ers provided another pleasant sur- prise, wheu the wounded men were set dowu ta fest on piles of deliciaus cake and pyraxuids of boiled eggs. Plenty of difficulties, great and 8mail, tried the patience of the sis- ters; but the Mother Superior, at lest look-, back ta her three manths in the hospital at Moasejaw as one of the. happiest times iu her life. Saine 'very serious cases eaused her great anxiety,. but there was not one deat)' amongst her patients. As for ininor anmoy-",
         "A ~T A1~T A 'T 1f A M1 À rITXTD. 18 'iinjrj ances such as gophers invadiug the cottage, and the. inconveulence o! iiav- ing te direct b\u003e' signa the. squaws who used to scrub the. huge wards, in their owu peculiar fashiou-they are re- called oui\u003e' te be laughed at. The. Indians used to come for treat- ment to a dispensar\u003e' i conuection with the. hospital. Oue morning there came in a mani named \"Black Bull\", brother of the. famous \"Sitting Bull\", and the. docor, who had heard that thie maxi was a dlever drauglitsman, but could net indu.. hum te display his skill, sent for the. Mother Buperier. Ferhapa lier dreua reminded him of some sluten of the, Churcli of Rome who had showu him Iindness. At an\u003e' rate lie bowed te her and said, \"Good squaw, good squawl Black Bull knew,» and tiiex at 1hI' reques lie drew an excellent picture of a buffalo, but mtade it clear it waa for herseif, and not for the. doctor. 'When the. rebellion was ehecked the. number of patients was gradually re- duced, and all liad se far rccovered as te b. able te travel to their distant homes, witii the. exception of one very sick mani, whem, it was decided, the, sisteru siiould take down, when they went, te the liospital at Winnipeg. There lie soon afterwards died. Its work acconxplished, tlie base hos- pital was elosed and the. sisters pre- pared to returu to Toronto. Just be- fore leavig, tii.y dined with Gen- eral Laurie, though tii.\u003e de not as a rul. accept invitations te meals ont- side their own house, and tliey found the xoad te the. station llned ail the. w.\u003e' with soldiers, wiio elieer.d them tremendously. And still man\u003e' a mani cherishes a grateful remembrance of the. gentle, kindl\u003e' women, 'wio made the. base liospital at Moosejaw a very liaven of rest and briglitnesa te those brougiit tiiere te b. nursed back te lf. and strengtii after the. hardshipe and wounds of the. campaigu. Oui\u003e' a year ago, wlieu the. Mother Feundresi was in a street car on her way tooneof themions esalsed by the Sistenhood, a mani with griz- zled hair seized her hand and exelaima- ed, \"Don't you remember nmet I was the. fellow in the bed next to the kit- elien door at Moosejaw.\" When the sergeants of the Royal Grenadiers celebratýd the thirtieth anniversary of the battie at Fish \u003cJreek, they sent the reverend mother a copy of their programme as a memento.. 8he eau dlaim the distinction of being the only lady in 'Toronto en- titled to wear a military niedal, for she was presented by the Governnient with the, iedal given to tiios who eerved i the. Northwest Rebellion of 1885. After their returu te Toronto, the. sisters were asked more than once to allow sick ladies te stay with tliem. iPreseutly they took a pretty cottage, at the. corner of Euclid Avenue and Robinson Street, to enable theni to accede to this request. Before they were settled i it they had to shelter three patients uudergoing operatiens. At first the. aitera did ail the nurs- ing themselves, but after removing to 'Major Street, wiiere the present Saint John's Hospital for Womn was built in 1888, they\u003e began the training of youug woxueu a nurses. The cur- riculumn now extends over three years. In addition te the liospital, the. Sis-. tenliood lias organized and takes charge of the. Chiurcii Home for the Aged, and of Bishop Bethuiie Col- lege at Oshawa, and lias founded the, missions of Seaton Village and of AUl Hàllows, Est Toronto. A speciaty lias been made of diurcii needlework, in wiiich the MotherFiPundresa herseif is an adept In the. year 1916 Mother Hannaii",
         "PIONEER CANADJAN WOMEN MOTHER IIANNAH Fo..dcss of thi serh of st. john the Di ;ne mani who havre risen to positions of great responsibility li hospitals in the United States and other countries. Canadian youmg women set,, to have a peculiar fltneîs for niursing, and it îa a fact that li this.partieu1ar calling at least their natioxiality la always a stroxig reeommendation when they apply for positions either at home or abroad. The, subject of the next and concludîng sketch of this series will be 'Mins Boberta Catherine MacAdams\", elected soldiers' representatîve iii the Alberta .kssembly.",
         "Canabtani lbcrocs of the Bv FRANKý YEIGH 111$ is a brief tale of hieroismn and bravery as found in the (Canpadi3Ln, in the mari fromn (.an- ada, specimiens of thce sons of Empire Who have added lustre to its history Pud rer.own to its Anglo-saxon f amilY, iot on the plains or prairies or among flic mounitains of this Britain of the West, but on the war-churned fields of Flanders anid France. it ia a story that thrills flot alone for its revetation of individual cour- age, flot alone for its national and empire significanice, but for the aide these men took and for the part they played and the sacrifices they made for civilization, freedom, honour, ave, Christianity iu its essence. A treaty la not a scrap of paper, but a solemn pact; a woman was not; made to be crushed to earth after beîng dishori- oured, nor a child, spit upon a bayo- net-point. Ocean-bede wvere not mn- tended as graveyards, outside of \"ýacts o! Providence\", and nurses were meant to be sustained and hon- oured and not shot down like dogs. So these lion-wýhelps sprang to the leash 'when thxe great call came, as others sprang from every red spot on the Empire map; hence these tales of truth, the subjeets of which de- serve more immortality than the printed page or the mnarbie monu- ment ean give. 20 O.ne would like to preface these pages with a r'ecountal of somne acta of essenial, bravery long before the test of blood came on a battlefleld or in a muddy trench-the -test of the home decision,' of the severance of home tics, o! eutting the tiller from. ail one's previous life; the test o! leav- ing a certainty s0 f ar as lif e holds it, for an uncertainty, the facing o! a future that mikht as easily hold death as life in its programme, with highi-lifted brow and -undaunted spirit. 0, the look iu the eye, the springy step, the forward facinig o! these boys of our Canadian land as they march- ed away to war! No wonder they showed the stuif of which they are made in the great day of testing ; no wonder none are wounded in the back! \"These terrible Canadiaus\" la the reported name given them, by enemy troops, who had only too good reason to know their mettie. \"These men who neyer run and neyer sur- reuider,\" according to another Ger- mani tribute. For sheer pluck, combined with in- stanitaneous resouxrcefulness, eom- mend me to the two exploits o! Cap- tain Frederick William Campbell, of Mount Forest, Ontario, o! the First Canadiàu Battalion. The first inci- dent occurred during the battie o! Langemarck, where he was in charge of a machine gun section. He had",
         "CANADIAN LIEROES 0F TIIE B.\\TTLEFIELJ) taqken twvo machine guniis over a para- pet, reaching the tirst Germian uine withi one of themi whiere. aid( a futri- ouaq vombined hclavy rifle, iiiachine gn «and( 1b1mb tire, lie ma\u003ciitiýd'lis position. Ilis dletacliment was nieariy ail killed4 or wounided, Ilis boinb sup- ply liv111d also becomne exhiausteii, a.nd 0only onie mlacinie gunl -'as loft, veni th(c tripod having disappeared. whem Lieutenant Camipbeil (as lie was t ien)ý grabbedI the guni part froin a failing Manl. WVith hili was the oniy vur vwving mlati of the partY-umg'r tu-lohadI tll( ieimmunîmmiion. 'allpl- bllint Ili,, orpor-al fommd licm sevsin the rvar of the rotreating line ani dirccgtly' iii front of ic Gecr- mai advance. The situiation waS pre- carions ini the extrenie, witli scig ]y mli tlie Chances aigainst the two men. Then it was that Camipblli, fail- ing on ail fours, muade Ihiiselft into, a human tripod,. had thic rorporal strap the guni on Ilis (('amlpbell1'8) back, andl thien, facing the foc, liad a thouisandl rounds fired, and iu sel doing lieldl back the attac(keýrs. The brave feilow thins earricdl the gun un- tii th(c heatedl barrel burnedl tlirouigl his uniformn ami shirt to tile naked flesli. \"But Camipbeil turned tIe tidle,\" runs the re(ordi. Ilis giin, sprit- tig huillets at tlic rate of 650 a min- tct, mioved down the Germians like sheep, and though they sent rank after rank ini a wild effort to, break tlirougli, tliey failed; thie brave lieul- tenant liad savcd the battalion of Canadlians. WVheni it was ail over, Campbell fell uncionscions, not; from a wound, but fromn the pain of thc burn aiong bis baek. [le recovered, however, only to performn the samne feat a few days later, when some of the Canadian force was in a tiglit fix at Givendliy. TIe diffürence was thant this time the trench hiad been blown rip by' a mine and was in sued a mess thint there was 11o place to set tlie tripod. Again hie carricd tlie gun on his back, again hie hciped to save a diangerous situa- tion, but not before he had reeeived I». CAPT. FREI)ERICK WILLIAM CAMPBELL, V.C. Who performed seve ai fea tý of exceptiona 1 gallantry. a wound1g froxu whicli lie died fouir dIay' s Inter in a hioNpital. An(I wlien the widow showeIlle the Victoria (Cross that was a redlier Iliabalud after his dleath, one feit that nomme 'le- serve1 it better thian its brv vià- ner, aind none deevdto retain it as a previous meminento for, Ier trio of childni thain the wvife and( itiotiiu'r who gave hlmii up to hlis counitry. Campbeil's galiant ncts were, by the way, oni ail fours with the brul- liant manner in which he savedl a cannon fromn capture by the, Boersý in theý South African War. The spokes of one of the wheels hiad heeni siashi- ed and the gun could mlot be nioved. Caimpbell thereupon got somef table- legs f rom a llear-by Boer house. fit- ted them into the wrecked ahe n md thuis got the gun out. The, wliel is now in a museum at Quebec, where it l; deservedly labelled \"The Camprl- bell Wheel'. Another Victoria Cross Canadlian is John H. Trynor, thec \"Michael 0'Lieary, of New Bruniswvick\". After serving in the Boxer Rebellion and the Boer and the Iapanese-Ruissian Wars, he enlisted with the Black Wateh for the present %var in the cngîneer corps, taking part in the",
         "THE CANADL CAPTAIN F. A. C. SCRIMGER, V.C. 01 the Royal Army Medical Corpç. who risked his life le, savm a wounded comrade. battie of the Marne. One day lie was sen ding a sap li toward the. Germait limles wiien halfway acroas No Man's LLnd a big sheil exploded over the. end o! the. sap, iincovering the twlve meitto the rifle fire. Let Trynor tell hiq own story: «II was the only mn in the buneh who rould rnavlgate at ail. The rest were knoeked out. I had my ef t arn badly injured, but I managed to get a man on n'y bacit, and Iug him iuto our own tronches. I waan 't the weak-looking man yen se. me now. 1 weighed 180 pounds then, snd was as strong as a horse. Weil, when I gotýto our own tronches thero Isy ton poor devils behind me, helpless under the lire of the German rifles. 1 started baek -and got a second one on iuy baek. 'The Germans bronght a heavy fire te la llpon us. 'We got in, but on getting into n'y own trench 1 found that the n'an on my baeh had been shot while 1 was carry- ing hlm. Weil, to xuake. a long story short, I made ten trips and brought in ait the feilows who wero out there,' but i that ten trips the Qern'sns got me eight Sergeant Trynor's, left arm le a mass of scars where a sheil spinter got hin. He wears asilver plate in hie head where hie skuil had been fractred; twice was lie shot in the abdomen and once through the ehest, \u0026N MAGAZINE' whiIst the. third finger of the riglit iiand waa also shot o. A second man was killed on hie back whilst he was rescuing his comrades, and a third one shot through the foot. Some of the most thrilling episodes have occurred li connection with boxnb-throwing. Private W. Sher- lane, of the Second Battalion, Cana- dian Mounted, Rifles, of British Col- umbia, was awarded the Miitary .Medal for picking up a Germait grenade that had landed li his trench, anid to proteet hie comrades, aithougli at the riek of his own J if c, picked it up and threw it over the parapet. Private Frank H. Vaughian, of the saute battalion, performed a similar deed, but li doing s0 made the great sacrifice. When lie tossed a bomb it struck the parapet and fell back into the trench. Without la second's hesi- tation' Vaughian threw hîmef on the bomb, wiiich exploded anid kllled hlm, but his sacrifice saved xnany iîves. When shall the glory of sucli a deed ade?,n a bombardment of the lunes held by Canadians at St. Elol, li the. first week of May, 1916, a Western Canada cavalry battalion was sub- ject to specially heavy fire, two thoxi- sand siiefs being dropped li a smal area li a f\u003cur-hiour siielling. A large ýGermait sheil f eh close to a machine guit, crashing through the. fire stoop. Instantly Lance-Corporal John Pea- cey, of Vancouver, dashed forward, picked up the. he\u003eavy missile and tossed it out of the trench. As it elefired the parapet it exploded it the air. But for Peacey's bravery, the. ma- chiine gwx and its crew would have becit annihllated. ])wing the. saine engagement a breaci li the, parapet made danger- 0115 and diffleixit the, task of carrying awgy the wounded, it the. face of a constant fusilade of bullets from enemny senipers. Scores of brave li- cidents xnarked the, scexie. No less 41. \u002bi.,.aa 1,h'aa Tiii-.itsuxannt E. H.",
         "CANADIAN HEROES 0F THE BATTLEFIELD entered the danger zone and earried a wounded man out on lis back. Pri- vate Clivers Wilson aise crawled three times into a demolishedl trench under shei lfire and reseued the wonnded. \"'Conspicuonus gallantry\", in the phrase of the official \"Eye Witiýess\", marked Stretcher-Bearer J. C. F. Cassidy, of 'Montres], who, during a heavy G1ermnan bombardment, went ont voluntarily to expesed points and waited on injured mnen, aîthough1 se(- Verely weuinded imiself, It waa. at the satrne timep that a relief party of the Canadlian Medical Corps hurried te an advanced dressing-station, when three were killed and five wounded. '\u003cTheirs not to reason why, theirs but to (](\u003e-and die\". This willirigness to risk life for one's comrades has had literally hun- dreds of illustrations. Take these as examples: Two privates, F. Watson, of Chathamn, Ontario, and W. Payne, of the Canad(ian Seoc(ttish, saved the lives of several while risking their own, winning the Militarv 'Medal. Poth belonged to a trench mortar battery. The fee hadî eoncentrated an intense tire on a line of dug-outs and support trenehes. In the ab- sence of stretcher-bearerq, resene work was uindertakçen by Watson and Payne, who went under the heavy fire neoea than nine times, applicd flrst aid te several injnred and car- ried them back to cover. It was in the second battie of Ypres -the battie Canada wiI neyer for- get-when a bombing party rau out of bomnhs. 'l want four men to vol- unteer,\" cricd Lieutenant James. Four stepped forward and, elimbing the parapet, soon met their fate. \"Pour more,\" again shouted the of- ficer, and again another quartette entered, the gateway ef death. Three were done for by one shell, soon the other curled up as thougli he had failen ssleep. Stiil a third party rushed forward, and they, too, joî- ed their eomrades in the death heap. \"One more man, and V'il go with hirn,\" James ealled, and Private Large (oddly eno\u003eugh the amallest man in bis battalion, and the butt of his company, \"a meek Ilt hike who neyer hollored\", was bis reputation) respendcd. The two mnen escaped the first curtain. of lire and got as far as the bomb storage trench, when a shl «did for\" Joues. \"Liarge made that terrible journey three times more to get bombs- for us,\" a survivor of the battie wýrote,. \"Ile seemned tic-kledj to ea,ýtli- just like a k-id whien he's made good at his sumns-that hc'd beeni able toecorne across with the goods. The last time he camne lie brouglit word thiat Lieuten ant- Colonel Berker had bled to death. When it was ail over lie wipe-d his sweaty .foreheaýd and smiled lis pasty srnile ais lie said: \"Hot work, boys! And aint it tee bad about the lieutenant and the col- onel!1\" Captain CoStigan, of Calgary, the che(f bombing officer of the lOth Bat- talion, was; thec hero of another Cana- di,\"\" ex-ploit. Re asked lbhrty-five men te volunteer for an attack en a German trench, but the whole bat- talion offered. Choosing the required numrber, the men stole eut of the trench in a torrent of rain, crept with- in fifteen feet of the enemy trench, where they had to cut throulgh a barbed w,ýire entanglement. Seeing a large white Plat formu in front of them whieh looked solid, Captain Costigan and his brother officer sprang upon it, when te their horror it gave way and they were precipitated head fore- most into the German trenchi on the heads of three German sentries. The latter wore more surpriscd than the Canadian officers, and before they ceuld recover themscîves, Captain C'ostiîgan and his pal had shot ýtwo of thc sentries dead, and the third, who wus wounded in fixe fiesh of the Ieg, ran down the trench sereaming for lelp. The GermanS started te pour out of their dug-outa into the trenches, but by this. time the rest of the squad had sprnng into the trench, loaded",
         "TUE1 CIANAT)TAN 'MAGAZINE SERGEAN.T MICHAIEL 0'LLARY, VC- Fomerly of the Northwest Mounted PO11oe. with 4mrbs. Bach of the two ends of th is sector of the trench was block- ed by a Canadfian arined with wire ent anglemtent bombs. The artillery kept a circle of lire back of the trenceh, se that the Germians ini this section cold get nîo assistance fromn .91y other section. As fast as the Germans camne out of the dutg-ouits they w-ere met by b)ayonets. Enach of these had a strong eleetrio iight attached, so that wvhile the- Germnans werc expose([ under a bright light, the Canadianis were in comaplete dJarkness and invisible to therni. The resuit was inevitable. Th irty-five Germans were killed, twelve taken prisoniers, and bombs wcrc throwni in ail the dug-outs where the Germnans rcfused to corne ont. In twventy' minutes the whole operation Was over. The Canadians were back iii thieir trenches, and while the Ger- man' artillery* and machine gunis open- ed up a terrifie fire on emnpty gronnd, the Canadians were able to ait safelý ini their own tronches and amoke a quiet pipe. Not a man of them was kiiled or even slight1y weunded! The oflicers and non-commnissiened officers of the party were sent for by the King, w-ho conferred upon the officers D.S.O 's, and upon the sergeants D. C.M\\.'s. Each mari was given twelve dlays' furlough for his participation iu the storming of the trench. Most of the heomes thus far refer- red to wcre English-speakîng Cana- ýdians, but what of the French Cana-, dians? Whiat 'of the i 4th Battalion I It was a mionth before the second bat- tic of Ypres. An advance Germanl listenirg-post had beew giving trou- ble. Volunteers were asked for the ticklish job of wiping it out, when a wvhole French .Cainhdian eompany volunteered, of whom five were chosen. It was their first experience. After an hiour's wait the five tumbled back into their trench just as the Geriuan miachine guns opcned lire. They 'had reached the einemy's ad- vance Ipost, finding it deserted; de- stroyed the parapet and then hustled to, safety, having donc their work weil, though most of themn have since But a more flery trial awaited these Quebec boys. They shared the undy- ing glory of the Third Canadian. Bri- gade at Ypres. They who died there fell, in the literal sense, in defence of France as weil as of Canada. Major Hlercle Barrie was one who was se- verely wouindedI in the leg, but had strength enough left to crawl îute a ditch, where twý,o French Canadian stretcher-bearers fo\u003euud him and car- ried him, under a terrifie lire, to a dressing-station. Barrie was later on board the Ilesperian, in charge of flfty invalided soldiers, when it was torpedoed and sunk He handied his men with charaeteristic coolness. Another French Canadiani who shoul not bie forgotten la Captain George Vanier, a MAontreai iawyer, who voluniteered te iead a small force againgt a Grerma n outlook. They crawled out at dead of uight, eut the German wire withouit discovery, and blew the work up wvith a blasting charge. Captain Vanier had the a- sistance of Lauce-Corporal fi, Rau- court and Private Watt, both of whexu had on several other occasions doue splendid work i No Man's Land,",
         "LA4;CE-COIRIORAI. FRED FISHER The. Srst Caiadian to win thi. Vkctoria Croui. and who displayed, on the niglit of the 22nd and 2rgreat courage and ones MNore sl)eetai-ular pe'rlal)ps thef deed of Private E. Leeon tfie 2Oth of Januaryv, in replaciîg a b)ro- ken telephione uine liftYyad in the t-car of, the teh.Pri\\atfe Leger wcnt out twive into the open grouind behind the trenchi, untder constant fine fromn snipens, and 4-imbed a pole and repaired the \\vire. Many' other decds of couirage b)y individuais can be rccedçii. There\u003c is the gallant dash of Privates Le- blois anoi Lfilrun into -No Man's Ladto pick uip one of their svouits who had been wounided lW the lat-k 1)y% a Germaitnîuir, and lay out in igony-for hours without beiîîg minss- ed by l)' is eomnrades, until dayligbt rcvealed both hlmi and bis rescuers to friend and foc alike. Not without a certain dash of hu- mnour are two, other incidents. Private Brunelle, a ty' pical Quebec baek- woodsntan. disregardcdl the orders against a Christmnas bruce, and oar- ried ont a daring reconnaissance, in the course of whieh he made fricuds with a party of the eneniy, talking bu themi in F'rench, and as ant ex- 25 SERGEANT-MAJOR F. WV, HALL, V.C. Who tost iii fe try ing to cau a wontdccmrade. vliange for imaple sigar and Cana- dian posteardls, returned ladenl wîth cigarelts mnd Gerînan sueis Brucll's ollniuading offleer wals by no 1na pleased with is performi- ance0, ani hle \\\\as bold that as hie ap- peared to have a talent for reoon- nioite-riing, le hadi better' apply« i t to 1)lu ein1le s\"s. Ile was then, as a puinish- ment. sent outl ajgajnst a \\,ery trou- blesome gang of s1uipers, locatedl them, and with expert assistance soon mnade their hiigpaetoo hot tob hold tlivmn A ýt one time there were two smal cottagesý about 1,500 yard-, behind the fir-ingz lne of the 22nd Battalion, one hein g occupied by a littie old womnan. When the shelling of the building becanie so severe that it was decided to make a inove, the old lady absolutely refused to go. At last, under heavyý sheil tire, two Frencb Canadian oftlccrs, Brown and LaVio- lette, voluniteered to take lier away. Theyv found ber ink bcd, shalcing w'ithi terror, but stili reluctaut to leave. The reason was soon apparent. Ail ber valuiables were in the iattress. Thte two officers, however, notbing daunted, picked u~p both the old wvoman and the mnattress and carried",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE themn te safety, just i the nick of time. One need not look baek to the Ypres days for the existing evidenees of Canadian gallantry. There is the de- fenc~e of the St. Eloi positions in May of 1916. At no time or place lias the contest been keener or the test greater. Every coiiceivable forai of flghting was used. At one time twenty-five shela a minute came from the German guns. A party of Germans succeeded i gettig intc\u003e one of the disused trenehes on the front of a New Bruns- wick battalion. A patrol consisting. of Lieutenant Mowatt and Privates Bamsey, Kennedy and Chatterton stumbled on the enemyv. Private Barn- sey, who was leading as guide, was suddenly bit on the head and fell. Almost at the saine instant the ex- plosion of a 1,0mb wounded Lieuten- ant Mowatt in bothi feet, while an- other bomb bit Private Kennedy in the ceet, but fortunately failed to explode. Private Chatterton, who ýalone of the patrol was unwounded, started to the liues for help. Ser- geant Henderson started but at once with reinforcements, when the enemy retired and the wouuded were brought in. When the Germans launched their overwheluiing attack against the crat- ers, Sergeant H. S. Naylor, of Toron- to, was in command of a machine gun crew in a detached post, when the enemy advanced. The trench had been practicaily obliterated by the enemy's bombarduient and the gun jammed with mud. Heavy lire froin three aides was soon directed on the small party, but the sergeant suc- ceeded in withdrawing the gun to a point where it could be cleaued aud again put into action. Froni the new position ire was once more dîrected on the enemy, checking his advanee, but llnally thie gun became se badly clogged that it could not be righted. ,A new gun was then secured and manned by the remnants of thue de- tachments unider Sergeant Nayler. On the foilowing day this gun wa also put ont of action, being repeal edly struck by shell fragments an choked with mud splashed, on to it b- cxplodiug shelîs. While\"it was bein cleaned and repaircd, the emplac( ment was converted into a temporar drcssing-station for the woundec Later the gun wýas lired with goo, effeet froin an improvised shelter,. bui this position was also struck by sheli and the gun buried. Once agai: Sergeant Naylor -succeedcd in repair ing the weapon. Through four day and nigbts of strenuous exertioiu Serg-eant Naylor remained in the fron lines, working or repairing bis gur. When eventualy he left to rejoji bis unit hie had witb him only tw- of his original deaciment, Privat Arundeil and Lance-Corporal RosE and botb these men were so exhaust ed that they required medical treat ment. Lieutenant B. J. Brooks, of a Nový Scotia battalion, a -clergyman bef or the war, held a crater witb a smal party for forty-eight bours and i'e pulmed two German attacks. At th, end of his tnrn of duty he went bac] over the zone swept by the enemny', tire and assisted in the rescue o. wounded men. In the confusion of the figbting fo: the craters at St. Eloi, many deedi of high courage and devotion weri perforxned by Canadian troops. Lieu tenant J. P. Arbuckie, with Corpora Woods and Private Batson, of thi 3lst Battalion, Calgary, undertook i reconnaissance, penetrating severa hundred yards into German territory Separated froiu bis men by the dark nees and wounded iu the face b3 the explosion of a sheil, Lieutenani Arbuekie nianaged to regain thg trenches, bringing in valuable info~r mation as to'the German defences Private Batson was bit in the ankle Corporal 'Woods stayed with hlm an( bandaged the wound, but a little latei was killed by a sheli. All througl the following day Private Ba.tsou laý -in concealuent wvithin the Germai . . ....... .",
         "CANADIAN HERQES 0F THE BATTLEFIELD) area and after dark crawled back b\u003c the lunes. Privates A. B. Davis and L. R Seymnour, of the 31et Battalion, mov. ed to, and fro between the craters ocý etipied by the mien and the trenche held by their comipany. They car- ried in severad wounded muen. In ont dug-out two brothers were buried by the explosion of a sheli. Davis and Seymiour tried to dig them out, but another shell struck the saine place, killing both brothers andl wounding Seymnour, Davis lifted( Seymour on bis back and workin g 1Ûis wayv thirmgh mudf] which reaehed over thet hips. cariled hlm to shelter onie huniidred anid twc-(nty yards away. Lance-Corporal Eve'rett, 29th Bat- talion, Vancouver, was ont on patrol on the morning of April 26th wher, an attack stairted. fle was badly wounded, but after lying out ail day regained the trenches on the night of April 27th, usilig two shovels as erutches. Sergeanit James Harvey, 29th Battalion, made fifteen trips un- der heavy fire from the support lines to the craters; each time he took fresh men with him and each time brought in a number of wounded. Aýn incidenit ont of the ordinary ' i worth includ(ing in this record. Lieu- tenant A. TI. Campbell. of Toronto, being wounded, wvas carried on a stretchier to the cain-tio.On arrivai an attendant asked if he were deaid, and the stretcher-bearer re- plied, \"ITe,'s dy' ing\". But an unlook- ed-for interruption came from the Cnear-corpse\" in the shape of an em- phatie, \"You're a liar\". And Camp- bell stîli lives to tell the truth of hie words. This six-footer's injuries were cana- ed by a bursting shrapnel. His head bad to be trepanned, that is, a silver plate put in, for it appears when lie was picked up bis skall was smasbed open and brains actually protruding, as well as hie bod3y wounded in many places, but fortunately bis face was intact. The surgeons stated that al- most any huinan being woiild have MAJOR w A., BISIcPV. M.C., ».S.O. L'a -da h-0o 'd the ait. died, but Campbell is progressing splendifl.y. There should be included, in any record of xilitary achievemefnts on, the part of our soldîers, a reference to the other Canadian winners of the coveted Victoria Cross, only a bit of bronze. but bearîing an inscription, \"'For Valour\", thiat gives it distinc- tion and immnortality' . Lance-Cor- poral1 Fred Fisher was the'flrst Cana- dian to receive the medal, a nineteen- year-old lad at the time of bis ex- ploit, whio faced the enemy with a mach11 ie ogun, and with intrepid cour- age held a mass of (lermans off long enougli to, enable the guns to be with. drawn. This took place in April of 1915 in the heavy fighting around St. Julien, The next day the second Victoria Cross was won by Colour-Sergeant Prederick William Hall,' of Winni- peg, who, made a moat heroie attempt to rescue a wounded soldier who feil a few yards in front of the B3ritish trenches. During a second attempt to reacli the fallen flghter, under a heavy enfilade lire, poor Hall fell mortally wounded. The third re- cipient of the bonour was Dr. Scrimi- ger, of the l4th Battalion, in the St.",
         "THET nlMrT, ~ MAJOR FANE WENDELL bMcDOWEL V.C WbngIehnded, aPtue iîxty Geni\",, Juie ngagemly aptin cri ger wva8 working in CaPn advan\u003c- as1 g.aana when Gerxan sel began to fafi on it. Ai sheptenta were remnovedi exeept CpatMc donaldl, whom Cap tain Manuerc- ried ont and dapawn to irge a ar-ft feet mn front, weete a subiruergedj, the herethe la ba sone aa lCOr Pr0tecting the thlg tininemit riak ofwh Other winn ers of the victoia Cros JL 7; are Lieutenant ýJ. G. Campbell, the 5th Battalion; Prvate Lio Clark, oIf the 2nd l3attalîon; Private J. ( Kerr, of the 49th Bttalion, and Lie, tenant A.ý W. Northover, Of the 2)8t fatta ion. Sergeant Bui!s Sifton, wi oe Of the brave lads who did 111 live to wear the oveted honour. Tki son' of an Elgin county farmer in,4 hs death, at Vimy Ridge. MIai\u003c Fane Wndell MeDowell, a gradulal of the University of Toronto, WO hi, Vitoria Cross in a remiarkabl manrby, single..landed, captui\" is -xty Ger.Mnans. ieutenant . M. W. Harvey, Alberta, brouglt honour to hi$ 1 tive Provi~nce in winning the Cros as dici Private, William J. Mil11E-, ki ed in action. 0Q1e of the ýmost recent wÎnners of the Victoria Cross is Major 'W- BSishOP, of Owen Sound, Canada gas to airmnan, who at an earlY aý asv Cro the Victoria Cross, the M-Nil tano ros and the D.S.O., anid now chief inst'i.ctor in aerial 9111 nery. Sncb are a fewv, and only, a feý of the brave Canadians whose deel deserve to be long remexnbered. The, are' nerely illulstrationEs Of thoUisa:Lc Of examplýe8 of hieroism, moslY al Pertaining to the earlieryyears f tI wAa, and who shail do justce to tI host nWho are equalîy deservi1IU lasting recognition?",
         "ê~ %3tubent lar 'mer 'p 1Iktrospect B3v HILImA, R. BOVD COLLINS OV\u003c iliat th* iuiwr's ilok as loi a thling or tlle paist amid tlIv stil- dent sprsa MOmenIlt a grate fire or înaylw during tie solitude of a quiet walk, to reeall ail the pesralf the ini- terest, ail thev profit gaiined durîiiig the inioniths setwit the farîners in the frit.fgrowing is,ýtric-ts of On- tarîo, it is round that the experience has been ai liberal educa(ýktion. It was knlown by Ils in a Vague, in- deiiemanner, that the temptinig. pleasant-lookino hail-te in- djows of thie greeni grocers i our On- tArio vities drew their supp)ilies of peaches, grapes, bernevs, chierries, largely* fromn that fertile beit knoNv as the Niagara P)einsuý,la, buit the howc And thje ch «y of their growth, de- Vveopmlent, distribution, were things remnote, things ioutsidet thmecircle of mir interests. Buit niow ail that is ehaniged. In a very definite way «w e know where the best peaches grow, under what cir- culinstancees they thflrive, under what conditions theyv b)eomel prolifle or otherwise;, we kniow the, histories of the sweet, lugcious, iciy, fancy cherries which so suceaa-fully satisfy the craving of our parehied patates, iii the hot. dusty% sumner weather; we know the necessityv to the grape of the intense, almnost unhearable, l'est of July;z we know, the differenees of value in effort hetween one fruit aud Aitothèr, viwenetraknt and cherr N, btenstrawberry v ad raspherry(ýýý,, evenI)III bAwnpun ad phlni., Wa'ilkilg along aiy of mir comumeII(r- cmal Streetsý, not ther Ieast ilateresting of' Siglits; to ou01 euredfrmr esses\" is a] we'sokd neatl-rrang- ,d gree gr'e' vidw The (sc flot on]l'y plumas or, peaches, buit s Bur- hanlk and al Gema prune1AI P111 u d a 'Wahîinton and a Lombard. or A Yellow ýSt. Johin or Crawford, as the case nay he, eachi rvualling thev days when picking ww'as rapid or slowv, whbef i-lîitlbing was higli or Iow, when laddcrl.l-lifinlg was frequenit or* l'rre. The question of cl11iate And weal- fluer is nio longer one of geogricalel science onily-to uis. Wages; and pro- fit, rutral depopulation, the fariner snd the miiddlemtan, sud the much- discussed and pitied consumer are questions removed fromn the pflae of inditTieenc to thait of vital initerest, because, during the timne of this greait war socialI and ecnmeconditions thruist upon a certain class i the comnmnityiiN the privilege of doing wliat they had neyer donc before, and what they hope they will bc pri- vileged to do again until the indas- trial reconstruction and reorganiza- tion takes place. But there were contrary *c ircumi- stances to be, foughit and antagonismas to hie overcome hefore this change was wrought. Looking back, it is liard to deciphier, even within oursolves, whien anid where the city green-horn",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE GIRL STUDENTS ON TIÎE WAY TO WORK IN THE COUNTRY ceased to be and the experienced. farm-helper came înto being. We know only there wus a deliglitful sense of satisfaction experienced during the latter days of the season whcn the farmers werc licard clamouring for their own experienced lielpers. And this feeling of satisfaction miglit bc pardoned if outsiders but knew of the opposition encountered at the begin- ning, of thc scoifs and unconcealed disregard, of the antagoni' sm, openly expressed, of thc lowcr order (or the few obscure would-be profiteers axix- ious to raise unnecessarily the price of labour);- of thc skcptieisms re- garding the stamina of the college- bred girl, and all the tliousand and one petty prejudices infesting the minds of those wlio, unke the Athen- ians of old, do not like to hear of or venture on any new thing. Of this we are sure, however, that if a change lias taken place in the mind of the studenit, a change aie lias corne over the fariner in his attitude toward those, who are being granted the privileges of higlier education. And the farmer wotîld be an ungrate- fui and unjust mani did lie not; render lionour and justieWliere lionour and justice are due. HTe would, be un- worthy of sympathy did lie not justly eommend those who unflinchingly and tlioroughly and cheerfullyj stood, by hlm tlirough heat and cold, raîm and shine, willingly hoeing or weeding, cultivating or picking, pacldng or do- ing any lielpful thing at his request during the period of his greatest ac- tivity. But tlie fariner bas expressed his satisfaction and conceded praise. 'We do likewise! For according to the memory of sixty or more girls wlio worked the eumner througli at 'Win- ona, Ontario, that place is a veritable garden wherein appears nothing rank or gross in nature. If ever there is a spot of beauty anywhere, that spot",
         "A VINEYARD AT WJNON4A, \u003cTuIý A POPLAR-LINED ROADWAY AT W»IONA 31",
         "THE CANADIAN MAQAZINE LUNCHING IN THE SHADE AT WINONA mnay bc found at Winonia-\"The War- den o~f the Shadow\", the place where mountain and lake vie with each. other to delight both eye and ear;, the place of singing birds, of fragrance from flofNscent meadows and bypaths, of cool refreshing breezes, of~ silver mnaples and birches and poplar-lined walks, the place of beautiful ever- green hedgerows; and, inost import- ant of all, the place of wcll-cultivated, neatly-planiied, carefully-ordered or- ebards and vineyards delightful to work iii throughout the bright days of golden suinmiertime. '\\ýhen it was llrst intimated to us that we would ble sent to Winona, speculation was rife. We wondered and wondered whether we would be in town or country; and when on ar- rival we found it to be a place for- tunately located, with just the neces- phone services) we- were greatly pleased. There was just enough of iruodernity' intermingled with rural conditions, to enhiance the cheerful outlook and the optimismn which would not dowu in spite of the uncertainty of the untried experience. The old Club Iluse, a large, spaci- 0118 suimmer hotel, housed us and provided us with roomt in which to live and move and have our joyful beiug in work or play for the season. From the gates wefnded, mnorning after morning, girls in groups of fifteen, a dozen, hialf a dozen, or maybe in couples, aIl clad in comfortable, pic- turesque khaki uniforms, aIl vigorous and ready* for the (Jay's work. To the reposefiixhiess of this summiier home, with its wide verandalis and broad cool corridors and tree-seltered lawrns, they retuirned at night, often . ....... . . . .....",
         "GIRL STUDENTS PICKING BLACK CuR\u0026NTS,(\"»p\u003e A GROU1I 0F GIRL FARMERS AT WINONA 33",
         "THE CANAJYIAN MAGAZINE residence 1f., 'with ail the. intimacies and comradeship, a most enjoyable feature of the. sumxner's experience. And no wonder there was gayety and gladness thronghout our days, for was not our work pleasaut sud li- teresting? There was a peculiar joy in seeig at the end of a ten4iour day a fruit-house stacked with well-fiiled baskets of ridhly-coloured fruit al ready for shipinent. Tiiere was satisfaction in the strip- ping of every fruit tree heavily laden with its yearly oflering to the 11f. of the world. There was enougb of charin and variety and itercat lu the work at Winona to subtract from the ten hours of labour ail the dis- confort of the sweat aud dust of toil and ail boredom which might have been overwhelming lad we net the kintdest, most considerate ' most like- abie mnen with whom to work. It may b. liere mentioned that the most pleasurable thoughts of 'Winoua are not only those connected with the. physical beauties of the place or the good social qualities of the. farmers and employers, but one~ mos0t grati- fying thouglit rests iu this, that we worked for sud helped a people of loneur. 'Winona is a place wliere eue gets men who guarsutee the genuine article. One maxi there known in the market froin Montreal to Winni- peg guarantees for every imperfeet tomato found among any sold by him an entre basket in repayment. The E. D. Smnith Company guarantees the jam bearing tlieir naine to be strictly pure andthegirls who, worked for pe, can rt. an statement re- garding its truth. The Windna Fruit growers' Association guarantees well- graded and perfect. fruit carefully packed; the Niagara Fruit Growers' Association, likewise, also the private firin of Messrs. J. W. Smithi and Sono. So, ail in ail, the suniuer's toil at 'Winona is crowned with happiness by tiie assurance that not only did we expend our efforts and best en- deavours to put on the market a Most healthful and necessary article of food, but that in that expenditure we helped the. best and among the xnost honourable of inen li their turne of need. And what is our only desire now that our work is done for 1917? Only that in the. iearts of our fighters and others engaged i performiug the great, overshadewiug, spectacula~r deeds We may be accredited the hon~- our of doiug a nodest duty thorough. ly, whole-heartedly and sicercly i order to help vvin the war.'-",
         "THE MAGDALEN From the Painting by Andrea del Sarto in the NationallArt Gallery of Canada",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "twýeIbîj £n9tani tçht to lJxatu 13Y THE, REV. DR. NEWELL DWIGHT HILLIS Eý the reasons what they maýy, to-day England îs j gh,ýting for ber life as onc(e the Greeks fought at Thermopylae. The taotliîcrland lias staked lie l gineia. lir last slip, lier last ionaid tlie lI:ýt drop of blood in lier Veiupon tI e issues of this war. If F' isî stîr%,,d ont by Gerinan sh rIles, it will be because she bas i-t e navy, with ail lier mine swecp- erw nes atnd destroyers. 'Wlen Eng- la1nd ]oses lier navy, slie will lose the wall and the noat tliat for tliree hun- dred ycars have safcguarded lier trea- sures against invading armies. Wlien lier walls of defence are broken down, and foreign armies mardi and coun- ter-mardli across lier fields, she wilI have to, retreat to Canada, the United States and Australia. flistory tells us that Carthage fell with tie defeat of ber ships. From thehour that ber admirai surrendered the navy, and the home capital was unable to send fresh supplies and men to flan- nibal, the great soldier knew that hîs army had already been lost. Now that two and a haif years of the great war have peissed, thc outines of the battle royal between England and Germany begin to take on forai, like uines of îfnk, hitherto invisible, and brouglit ont by the heat of war. In former years many Americans have 3--37 watelied German offleers and mer- chants rising to their feet, lifting their glasses, and drinking to \"Tlie Day\". The books of Beruliardi and the speeches of the Kaiser xmow tell us that \"The Day\" meaînt thc utter destruetii~n of the English Empire and the disruption of the French Re- publie. Not until one-hlf of the Pan-German plan liad been actually aclicve( diii England wake tup, or thç. seales faIl from the eyes of France. Ail Europe wvas to, be Cermanized and ruled from Berlin as a central city. The niethod proposedl was thie twenty- year preparation of armies, navies, battleships, cannon and guns. By war Prussia cut lier way through to the Baltie; by war Prussia eaptured Ans- tria's coal mines in Silesia; by war she took a part of Poland on the ea4t, of Alsace and Lorraine on thc west. By mîlitary force she captured Bel- gium, loaded on ber trains the furni- turc, pictures, books, clothing, trea- sures of lier merchants' bouses; by war sic stripped the factories of Namur and Liege of ticir maehinery and carried them east of the hne. The officers of the invading army seern to have had thc same motto written in their notebooks- \"l3elgium in one week, Paris in three weeks, London in six weeks.\" Tbree hundrcd years ago Shakespeare celebratcd England's safety through isolation.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE The Northi Sea took tlie place of wall and moat. He sang of England's noble brced of men, of the royal iskl, of the \"precious stone set in a silver sea, this earth, this world, this land of suwli dear souls-this dear, dear land\". But at last the hour lias struek wben Englishmen are flgliting for heartli and home, for ivife and child, and ai that makes life dear. For the first time in modern history men know what tlic battlc of Armna- geddon really menus. Men who think in terrms of the human race and of the world often speak of \"the four spheres of influ- ene\". By this they mean the North Sca, controlling thc English har- heurs; the Meditermanean route, via the Suez Canal, controlling the trade with India and Asia; tIc Dardanelles, safcguarding the trade at the point where two continents meet, and the Panama Canal, which is to-day thc least important sphcre; but when the centre of trade is tra.nsfcrrcd te thc Pacifie if will le its most important, the key to the richest treasure of thec earth. At present, by reason of flie fact that the most powcrful and rich- est group of states front upon its shores, the North Sea is theceoveted sphere of influence. With flic con- trol of that sea began England's greatness, commerce and weaith, and the loss of that sea wviil bie followed by lier dechine iii power. It could net le othcrwise. France rendhestfli Atlantic, via Bordeaux and the Mcdi- terranean, and reacles Gernxany and ItLyv by ber railway. Germany sends lier railhvays ont into ail the capif ais of Europe. England cannot build a railway across the North Sea. lier sole means of communication is through lier ships. The time was wlien GIreat Britain was united witli the Continent, but tlie nortbwest wind and flic ocecns wavcs eut awAY the isthmus, and left lier thirfy miles out in tlic ocean. But the norfbwest wind and fIe ocean storms leff no larbours on the Continent's side, Save in the low Netlierlands. Ahl tlie bar- bours are under the lea of the elialk .cliffs of England, where the ships find shelter from the north winds and the winter storms. Napoleon looked long- ingly toward England; for six weeks he waited impatiently at Boulogne and said that if lie could only have seven hours of darkness and a fair wind he could invade England and change the face of the world. The hero of the Temeraire, Nelson, understood for he used te say that winter and the northwest wind would, proteet England for five months in the win- ter, leaving lis fleet fret to dcstroy England's enemies. In 1914, in Au-. gust, Von Kluck laughed at Napoleon, batlled as he looked longingly across the English Channel, and also at Nel- son, serene through lis sense of se- curity, 'Von Kluck expected to set up his forty-two-centimeter guns at Calais, and drop bis shelîs within the English fields and villages for five miles beyond Dover, and unader cover of those sheils, to proteet his trains- ports, landing lis bosts on England's shores. The wave of Germai invas- ion is steadily retreating eastward, and every month is farther and far- ther frora the English Channel. De- fcated in the first plan, Gcrmany says she lias staked aIl upon lier sub- marine war, and if she sueeeeds wbere Napoleon failed, then indeed wili the whole course of history be ehanged. Fighting for the safcty of lier home treasures, England is aise fighting for lier colonies and lier foreigu trade, througli whicli shc lias lier life. Great Britain owns one-sixth of ail the good farming land of the world. These colonies beit the globe. Webster said that England's signal guns greeted the rising Sun and advancing keep step with the procession of the hours, marcbiîng round the globe. The euter and visible exhibition of this fact is seen in England's AIL Red Line. Leaving London behind, the traveller upon the dcck of an English ship finds the lUnion Jack flying at Gib- raltar, even as it flics at Malta, and the eliffs Of ýCyprus, 'Off Italy and",
         "WIJY ENGLAND FIGHTS TO WIN Gce.Tlie first objeet,, that greefs bis ycas hoe approarl1ies Egy,ýpt, îs tflic is fiaz, andiIaiî the Ried (i\u003ctingIlt, utîder the \u003e:lîadow of the Ilimlava, h finds that flic thqyn- blI o)f sfypeaee and justice. Lin- gorii!t_ midst flic rutlnplms oif (ce lon, or crossiing theu seaý to Bur- !mah, wvit1 her ruby mieeverv- wher, hIraveller finds that flaig. TuriÎgý -iothward, ho enîabr the great Eý'nglishi colonies on the east- cru haif of Afrîea, ani thinks of flic men who are grading the traek ani Iaying theý railway ties froîn Alexan- drin ami( Kbartoumi straight through the bondr of Afica to thec Southema Cape. Ont in the mniddle of the ocean lies England's eolony of Autstralia, buîking as large as the United States, rimmed with land flint bas forty inehes of rainfail a year. The flrst cirele is one o? iwhoiatfields, a second circle of grazing pasturo, while the interior is filled with gold sapphircs, opals and mineral treasures. Soon bis steamer touches at New Zealaud, stops at the Gilbert Islands, the FUi Islands, and stoams front port to port, toward Vancouver, in Canada-at once, England's wheat bin, lumber yard, coal mine, iron reserve and fur depot. And flot until thic traveller bas lefi efunln behind, with tbe meiinory of England's great pulp mille, wvit1bher ships laden witb wvhite paper, fod for the London presses, doce th- traveller roalize Enizland's weaith tbirough ber colonies that boit tho globe. But just in proportion as a country sonde the linos of its trade and finance out into the ends o? the eartb îs th-nt country truly cosmiopolitan. l3ecause thec tradei o? the Unitod States is ho- twcen Staew are in a sense provin- cial. England, incidentally, exehanges goods betwoen Glasgow and Liver- pooî, but essentially sbe trades witb foreign stafes. Some yeare ago in a London baink 1 witncsscdl a traitsae- tion l)icnthe repreetative of an A cltie oîupaýi î and a manu facturer in Eiin.If so happened tliat the cabe utritthe sun. At no'on the En'Aishjade baisli payvmeîd, in the link, ;md the xnoncy, bY chc'an wvas p;1(id te omlpany o? the, Asiatie ont in lagaitwo hours hefore the contraet. was mande. onrfithe central telcl)lonc office îin Nc,ýv York, with wiremuning out fo the fownei of flhc n1orth and flic Southt andi to San Franoiseo on flic wvcst. But far more wonderful London as, the world's financial centre, with its lîinos, frnan- eiml and commercial, throbbing and pulsafing witb tbe thrnigbts of the mca wbo sit at that English contre from which ail business radiates. By this trade and finance England lives, and for tbe sources of her lifo Eng- land îs flghting. When, thorofore, submarines eut off England's ships flhc mothorland will starve f0 deafli. Englaîid produces fwo-tbirds of lier own food, buying the supply for four months front Canada and the United States, bringing lier meat froîn Buenos Avres, and lier wb(,at froin Melbourne. But itot only lier food, but tbe raw mate-rial for lier, fat orîes, comes from foreigu lands. Millions of her people live upon flic raw cot- ton brought from our Southerii States, other millions handle the wool bronght from Australia and New Zea- land. E-ngland bnys ber bides and leather fromn the Argentine Republie. She brings bepr oïl from M.ýexico, ber eugar from tbe 'West Indice, bier cof- fee from. Brazil, bier rubher froîn ey- Ion, ber tea from China, ber coppe'r from the United States. In India the banyan tree bas roots in the soil, but as soon as the honghs and branches begin fo grow thoy drop flic end of the branci int o fthc soul and it f akes root, so fbat the life is a ciroular life, as the cap moves from the soul to tbe top of fie f ree ami back fbrough bougbs and branches, wit h the same soul to be again replenished. Eng- land's trade is a banyan tree that me-",
         "'4A.T'orN A XT %Ar A i A '7T'P touches the earth for its own rejuve- nation. In the latest indictment of Great Britain, by one of the bitterest Ger- mnan opponents, England is called the \"lanid pirate\" of history. This assauît ie savage, for no weapon is overlook- ed, and no epithet is spared. Defend- ing Germany's attempt te, seize Bel- gium, Northi France, Poland, the author cails tlie roll of the new col- onies, seized recently by Eugland. Englisb troops, lie says, have recently taken possession of a little province iu tlie centre o! Africa, exteuded their mile in Thibet, pushed into the li country of Burmali, not to mention ber movements in Afghanistani. But a certain consideration sliould be re- membered. It le one thing for the United States, alarmed by the wars betweeu the Sioux Indians of Dakota and tlie Indians o! Montana, with endies masslacres and scalpings, to force the(se Sioux Indians back upon a reservation, and compel tliem to iead decent lives, and ît would bo quite another thing for the United States to make war uipon Canada. a law-abiding people, sirnply to satisfy the lust for territory. Again and again tlie United, States lia by force of arms taken possession of the lands of savage Indian tribes, but witli wbat result? 'Witness the Choetaw Indians. By arme tbey bave been held upon their reservation. Wlien smallpox broke out, our Goverument sent physicians and stayed the ravages of the plague. «When they developed tuberculosis, bospitals were built, physîciaus and nurses maintained. Wben a part o! their lands was sold, the Government invested their money and tbey are to-day the rieliest peo- ple in the world, averaging $30,O00 per îndividual. Can any foreigu critie honestly say that our progressie set- tiement of lands once beld by saivage Indians is a paralîel to Germany's seizure, o! Bel gl-uim and North France? But Enlad' nes have been push- ed toward the centre of Africa te stop savagery tlirougli poison arrows, lin- mnan sacrifices, organized slavery con- ducted by the Arab traders. England ,built over eleven hundred miles of railway into the Uganda, and in open- ing up the trade safeguarded the lives of the people, and gave them their first door of hope. And look at the attitude of England's colonies! iRe- eently a great public meeting was lield in a city of India, and that meet- ing later was repeated in Calcutta, Bombay, Lahore and Benares. In- dian gentlemen, for the most part, made the speeches. And this was the ue of their argument: \"Suppose England withdraws ail ber troops, officers, and legal representatives, to strengthen ber war forces in Europe. India is broken up into fragments, through scores of languages and many and diverse religions. The Moham- medans and Parsees and Bralimins are always clashing in the streets. When England goes, what if Japan, needing territory, cornes with lier armies? If England goes, what if a littie later, Germany cornes with her forces to carve ont a colony? If England should deqert us, what if the Arabs join the Mohammedan forces of India for civil war 1\" Iu that hour, native audiences voted their taxes, enlisted their soldiers to win and kcep Eng- land'a frieudsbip and protection. But eau you imagine a Belgian audience in an outburst of enthusiasm raising money to keep the executioners of Editli Cayell iu power? Think of the university faeulty of Louvain voting gifts to the meu wbo burned their libraries, looted and then flred their university buildings. It stirs the note of humour, te, think of men soberly trying to argue that Eug- land's benefleent work in uncivilized forests of Africa, and the lawless savage regions of India, the jungles of Asia, and the islande of the sea. is to be uised as a parallel to Germany's destruction of states like Belgîim, highly eivilized, liberty-loving, demo- eratie and fre,(e. Buit mauy of England's hest frienide condemri her policy in Eigypt, aind",
         "WIIY ENGLAND FIGHTS TO WIN some lier poliey iu South Africa. Financial considerations dictatcd lier Egyptian policy. France and Eng- land lent large sius of money to the Engylish Khedive. Unscrupulous, Wil(l, reckless, a political advecuturer, the Egyptian ruler spoiled his people and was imperilling the value of the Egyptian bonds. Alarmed, lest they lose their interest and perhaps the prîicipa-l, the French and English bondholders pooled their interests and brough1t about the înilitary occu- pationl oîf Egypt to save their invcst- ments. Ahl this, too, wvas doue in the faceý( of an niprising of the people of -Pg» pt for the overtbrow of the Ihivthe organization of a par- liaînientary form of goveriiment. But because it was casier for thie 1Engliqh financiers controliing the E'ng1ish, Governor to use a Khïedive thian to handie an Egyptian parliamient, the inovemient toword self oennn wasi putf down by force of arirns and the if ytn despot was kepi in bis place Thenconcessions, enorinous trcsofrad were given out to lBýng- lis copanes. Dams werc built, cottn ii's v-ere buit. Dividends of from tJiuî'ty-five to fifty per cent. a ycar wcrc, paid to the English and Frech bondfholdlers. But in order to pay thee ivi(1euids the Egyptians were wokdtwel(ve to fifteen hours a day, paiid oftentimes from nine pence to a silling. Cbildren from ten to twelvc werc workcd fifteen hours for sixpence. (Sec \"Steel and Gold\", by Brailsford, London). In a country whcre the land produces three crops a ycar the farmers still live in rand huts, with barcly enough wage to kcep body and soul together. Finally, in the dispute over Morocco, England tradcd France the colonial rights over the vast iron and minerai treasures of MLorocco, and in retnrn France withdrew from Egypt, leav- ing England ini sole possession. Lord Cromer was a giant and wrongbt; im- measurable benefit to Egypt. Lord Milner aiso, in Mis study of Egypt, pays England a striking tribute. Few men know tîte country hetter than Mr. Leigli Hunt, with bis long-- pericec in Corea, China, Soiutl Af- riea and FEgypt. But this greaý:t Ani- erican lias iae ttention to thv mis- takes of Enln.Witness. fuis ncxv book by l rilsford, the Engt-lish seholar, \"Steel and Gold\", in wvhich hie sets forth, as a representative Eng- lishman, the wrongs of the iEPvyptiian peuple that caîl for the refoinîns of some Shaftesbury, some Culideon and Brighit, and Booker Washington. No one mnan like Cramner and Mimecr and no onc generation ean righit ail wrongs in a day. But having dcfendcd,( Euig- land as to one-haîf of the Germian in- dictaient, it rernains for us to eonfess that hier enemies' indietment of Eng- land for ber poliey in Egypt lias heen in part supportedl and establishced- English authors like I3railsford them- selves being the judges of Ger- many's indfi etment of Greaýýt Brîtain. It rmisto enpa i ixe fact that Egndis nut flglm1ting to kili ail Germans More than ii t vol- umiies lave icen p1,ihe Y Eng- lishimen, setting forthi their ams nd the spirit of their deene aiiin nu volume and upon nlo pagei caT find evidence showing7 that anyv 1l-ish- man of any position has- ver pr- posed the destruction of Gray Beginning withi the defence of the horne land, and of lier trade nd lier colonies, and the support of lier sol- emn covenant to stand with ehiu in the event of invasion, Englaýnd is now fighting to destroy Priisian militarism. Great Britain feels thiat bier peuple cannot carry longe,,r the tax burden involvcd in mihit;ari-m on land, or the Dreadnought programme for the sea. Thme ploughman ini the furrow staggers with the soldier np- on bis baek. The strengtb of the workman is consumed by the loom, witbout the load of war taxes. If Gcrmany is allowed to maintain a standing army, every other nation in Europe must undertake like mihitary burdens. England's movement, there- fore, is against Berlin's war cabinet,",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE I\u003erussian rnifitarismn. England pro- poses, therefore, disarmament, and Germnany has steadily refused. And niow England and France and their colonies have determined to flglit this wýar thirough, and settie the question once for, ail. They have dcided not to, acee-ýpt overtures, not to equivocate, not to retreat, and whether it takes one mionthl, or one year, or two years, to go steadily on, until the Krupp works are dlestroyed, Gcrmany's forts blon p, bier armny dlisbanded, and a cmatSigned withi ftinairal and tradeo guaranteeos that neither Ger- iany ' uor Fraince, nom England nor Itussia wilever again attempt to orgaiize the state on the basis of iii- tarism11. The mnethod proposed aftcr the war is over ia noni-military icoercion. The genius of thie plan is a modification of Mr. Taft's 1eague, of Peace, enforced by a litie international navy policing the seas, and an international army policing the land. Because there are police in New York no one is to thlnk that New York is not contmolled by the decrees of its courts. Engzland proposes a league of all the nations, wilh an international supreme court to adjudicate disputes betwcen G1er- many and England or Germany and France. Shouild Germany or Russia or any other country become mecalci- trant, then firat, ail the other nations in the league are te close their portas to, ber ships, toi close their mails, cables and telegrapha to ber business, and close ail exchanges to lier finance, sud make lier an outst fromn trade. If ail the banka and clearuLng houses and wliolesale stores of a great city de- clined any commercial relation with any great factory or store, how long could that establishiment stay out of tlie court of bankruptcy 1 An inter- national police there will doubtlesa be for the new international leaguie of the nations, international police on the sea and international police on the land, but ultimately there must be a coalescense of England's plan of non-military coereion with Mr. Taft's League for the Enforcement; of Peaee. This will realize for the ivorld when this war is over the parliainent of mankind, the federation of the world and the beginning of a better day and perhaps a golden age. Meanwhîle the United States is drifting. Like Micaber, wcv are stili waiting for something to tttrn up-or go down. Soine of our Congressmen are like the man who said hie \"wished his wife would die, or soniething\", and they also wish that au -American ship would reaeh Liverpool- or some- thing. But the day bas grone by for national isolation. Nations either waT in groups or trade in groups. Forty years ago, Germany alone could inake war. Now, she cannot fight without Austria, Bulgaria and Turkey. Even the wolf hunts iii a pack, while the cattie -go in herds. The nations also buy and sellin group relations, and organize wars i groupa. At a time when every moment îs big with des- tiny for Our future commerce we are overlooking the group principle in modern commerce, and interna- tional movements. Meanwhile Eng- land is strengthenîng herseif. She le knitting -more and more closely lier colonies to the motherland. She îs organizing for the eapturing of the world's trade after this war, and her commercial travellers, manufactur- ers and bankers wiil keep atep with the commercial leaders of France, Italy and Russia, and niany neutrai, IIer colonists love old England. For lier they will live and for her they are ready to, die. Uer judges have given just judgmient, in foreign capi- tala; lier people feel that ln England's cause is hung armour of invincible knights. No one doubts ber final vic- tory for peace. Militarisai must be anihlated. And autocraicy muat be alain. ThS i the firet of a series of articles to be. pubiished ini \"The Cauadian Magazine\" by apecial arrangemnent wîth the author. The 'next to appear is B gsn sTas formnation\"",
         "3ii1btan Vances BY W. McD. TAIT TIEN Columbus landed in the New 'World in 1492 he wvas greeted with a dance. It was a war-dane exccutcd by ILic rcd mcen, The Indian lias neyer brokent away from this early custom, and to-day we flîîd great occasions celebrated in a manner similar to that first demonstration to the white manl. In the mînds of many people al the dances of the North American Indians are war-dances. As a mat- ter of fact there arc numerous In- dian dances, ail extremely interest- ing and niost of themn very old. Wo- men as well as men participate in them, and they have nothing te do with war. Strange to say, in none of these Indian danees is there any contact with the sexes. The bueks dance in one circle and the squaws in another. Few danees are wholly social, although some of them have that element. Practically ail of them, have a religions origin, and to-day they retain their religious signifi- cance. Indians are very musical and have many songs i their own language. The druni seems to be the principal instrument among them; but when they have opportunity they learn the white man's music and the use of his instruments, rendering the most dif- fleuit mnusic with great sweetness. On the Blood Reserve of the l3lackfoot tribe, in Alberta, there is a brass band of twenty-one pieces, lead by the is- suer of rations. This band gives con- certs Îu the towns surrounding the reserve. Another baud of fifes and 43 drums on thec saine reserve lias given whole entertainnients that were very plcasing. The red mcon have \\\\var-songs which1 tlîey used to sinig bef'ore ai baittieý others, Îitensely sad, whlichi they sangr after thic batfle. ThIý,r loesoigýsarc not consideroed of a very hiigli order. Facli family bîas its own soi gs; caeh individual lias his, usnally ýoiaposed by hiniseif. Some of their songs arc sarred. Some teacliers, in their mistaken zeal, have eroffseâ or sînothered every- thing distinctly aboriguinal in the young Indians. Franklin K. banc, the Canadian-br hem Seeretary of the United States Department of the Ini- terior, in a letter directing the ap- pountment of Geoffroy O'flara as in- structor of native Indian music, said: III think that it is the part of wisdom to develop in the young Thdian an in- creaed respect for ail those things of beauty which their forefather, rroduiced. Our efforts should be to make thi, gen- eration prend of their aneestors, and kep alive in them the memory of their whole- soins legends a.nd their aboriginal artts.\" Music for dances is suppied hy a trained band of .singers' The only acompaniment is a drum mnade by puttung a skun over a cirele of Wood and allowung it to dry tightly. The Sun-dance is, perhaps, the most harbarous cf ail the orgies cf the Ini- dians and lias been observedl in every known tribe cf red mon on the Ameni- can continent. The time was when ail sorts of cruclîes were the main feature cf this gathernag, which was held i the spring-time as soon as the",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE snow cieared and the eartli began to warma from the sun's rays. The dance wvas the ceremony througli which the Indlian lad stepped from boyliood to the status of a warrior. It is too hior- rible for words. Ugly gashes are eut in the chest, skcwers are tlirnst through theée, aud rawhide lariats attaeh.Ied to the ends and fasteued to the sun lodge pole. The youtli must tear himself loose by dancing around the pole and tugging ntil the strips of fleali to whidh the tliongs are fast- ened give way. If the aspirant passes througýli the ordeal witliont exhibit- ing signis of pain or fear, lie is de- clared a full-fledged brave and elig- ible to sit in the councils of his nation. .Anothe(r method was te cnt tlie flesli on the bapc and tie leather thongs through thiese fiesh-loops, and then fasten buffalo, akulis to the thougs s0 that thiey wvould daýngie cicar of the ground. The caddaeias to dance about tili lie had sueeeded in tear- îng- ffue loops and allowinig thie skulls te fali to the groiind. This metliod was not as popular as the other be- catise the brave conld not afterward sc the markýs of the ordeal. It was always a great pleasure te the brave to býare lisq breast ond exhibit the scars inadle by thc tearing proeess. Iianiýt miothe(rs- were as anxious that thecir sons sliould go tlîrougli the ordeail as they wcre tleieselves. An incidlent is told by a western writer %vhieh shows how the Indian mother looked up)on it. An ludian lad was being- put througli the bufThlo, skull method but lis strength was net enougli to tear out ail the flesh-loops. le was about to faint away wlien his mother rode into the circle on a pony, aud seizing the skuli that still clnng to tIe back of lier son, she dashed away on the horse, dragging the boy -itli lier. Soon the flesh broke and the young Indian boy was saved froin the hnmilfity of failure Before the ordeal comes manY baek ont. Sometimes after the thougs or skewers are put in, the victim. loses courage. The 'Wood Or buffale hide must then be removed by cutting the flesh-loop, silice it is against ail law to draw it out endwise after it lias been inserted in the flesh. The Ujnited States Government lias long since forbidden the Sun-dance, but7it was continued on Canadian re- serves tili the coming of the iRoyal Northwest Mounted Police about 1890. As a consequence the annual gathering of the Indians in the spring-tinie resuits in nothing more than dancing the oid-time dances, elianting the brave acta of by-gone days, and propitiating tlie sun by the bestowal of gifts, whieli are f ast- ened to the top of the central pole of the Sun-dance lodge. The Give-away dance is ranked by the Governinent authorities with the Sun-dance as very demoralizing, and has been stopped on most reserves. The Round-dance of the Crees in 'Western Canada is a pleasure dance. Women are aflowed to take part in it, but hefore their first dance they muist Rive a substantial present to the lead- er of the dance. This present seeins te make the person a sort of liE e inem- ber of the Round-dance. Squaws and bucks dance separately without any contact. In nearly ail the tribes of the Northi Anierican continent there are iany dances representing animais. The buffalo dance is a most interesting aif air. In it the hunters illustrate what tbey have gone tlirough in the chase. Instead of bragging with their tongues, as does the white man, tliey use pantomime. Stealthily tliey describe the sneaking process of stalk- ing- gaine and dragging it home. In another dance a man represents a dog. Hie is made to look as mucli like one as possible, and is led forth by an Indian inaiden, who lias tied lier sash about lis body and leads him as a lady does lier poodle, except that they are botli keeping time to the steps of tlie dance. lie constantly struggles to break away, and she makes rhytlimic efforts to hohi him. Sometimes lie sueceeds and rushes in.",
         "INDIAN DANCES to bouses for meat, bites persons on flhc leg and otherwise carri s ont the idea of a dog on flic rampage. The Eagle-danee is espeeially dra- matie. The Indian who f akes flic part of flhe ciile is wondcrifnlly made up. Over bis head îs drawni a sort of black cloth that covers the liair and is pulled forward to form a benk. A rcd line makes'fhe mouth of the eagle. On tlic body there is noe clothing ex- cept a short apron and patehes of eagle or hawk down attaehed by gum f0 the flesh. The arus are made into wings by means of a cord strung with lonte hanging feathers sfrctched from hand to bond aeross the bock, and a bunch of feathers at the back make a tail. lus hands are paintcd yellow to look like claws. Hie is lured forth by the dropping of grain, and as he follows the trail he uses his arms as an cagle docs his wings, and with bis entire body he swoops and moves like the bird lie is picturing, but always in fime to the music. There is a dance to fthc bear and moose and miuy othecrs, always with the combined dIromatie idea and dancing move- mnts. A mong fthc Indians of the far north, during the winter months of eaeh ycar, a big ceremonial dance is given in the \"HIoo-go\". or public meet- ing hall. This is to picase and pro- pitiate the animal spirits. It is a real donce with feasting from early winfer tili almost spring. There are the most peculiar customs attached te this dance period. During the flrst day visitors have the privilege of ask- ing for whatever tbey xnay desire in the line of food. The particular deli- cacy is \"ice-cream\", which is simply a mixture of frozen blueberries and tallow. Affer fthe first day visitors must cat the food their hosts set be- fore them. iEaeh fribe tries to outdo fthc other in contortions, endurance and dancing costumes. Eacli animal is impersonatcd by a daneer, who is traincd months ahead for bis work. These men are dressed ini skins and fully represent thxe seal, bear and walrus. They daneslowly in a cirele ronde by the spPectators and itnitate the inovemnts aiid ccsof tl'e beasts each inîpersonates. Thcy sing a sort of chant in which thce onlookers loin. The Snake-dance given cvcry sec- ond year in the Hopi Puecblos of thle far south is a drairatizod prayer for rain at an appointcd caon It is a grima and startling ccrexniony, real live rattlesnakes benig used as messengers to carry to the gods of the under- world, who are supposed toi have power over the rain cloud, the peti- tions of the Hlopis. To thic onlooker it seems impossible that venomous snakcs can be handlcd soi ndaciously without inflicting- deadl)y wond(s, yet it is positively knowni thiat thy re in no wise dcprivedl of their powYer to do so. There are those whio dlaim that they have seen the dancers bit- ten by their rattiesua.ke atc s but fliat the priests posscs,ýs ai secret aniti- dote to whicýh thyrcsort in case, of snakebite. To tceu e flic ne h priests go out ini pairs NIthi di-giing sticks anid cavsbas ollowing their trious in flic duist and( dig them out of thieir liolesý. The Indians of thie -Missisippi val- ley hold a Con-ane, ih is a fea- turc of tlic grow\\ing caon whiere blnktindians resle. ,;t whc[In these dances ib held the wh'ite moan neyer kniovws. Just how t'he fcs- tivities are conductcd bis eye is neyer supposcd fo sec. Secretly the wvord is sent out and as secret ly au possible the redskins gather. But the mono- tonous thrumming. of foin-toms, the intermittent yell of squaws, the shrîll squcals of juveniles and the more dig- nified chantings of the braves carry the tidings unmistakably when once the dance is on. These ceremonies are peculiar to the Mississippi Valley. Members of the tattered remnants of what were once powerful tribes, who, are famîl- iar figures on the streets of nearly ,every Mississipi River city period- ieally become imbued with the desire to hold a tribal dance. Dirty, dusty",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE and travel-stained, aiid often as not ravenously hungry, descendants and associates of the famies of Winnis- biek, Rain Cloud, Hawke Eye, Big Moon, Winnebigoshi8h, Waheta, Little Crow, Raîn Maker, and inany other greater or less chieftains respond to the eall and are promptly on hand to take part in the big feed, which is usually an important adjunet of dance festivals. The Corn-dance is some- thing akin te the Snake-dance in that it is to propitiate the rain god. While flot in the strict scuse of the terni a real dance, the potlatchi of thie eoast lindianis lias danicing con- nleeted with it. Recenit efforts te sup- press a -elebriation of the curions cereinoniy on Vancouver Island were hitterly reseteod by the Indian8 through their chîefs. They contend that the eustoir is one that coneeriis the Indianis alone and that Ît should not be interfered with. The potlatchi is a sort of carnival of unselfishness in which the chief who gives away the greatest ameount of gooda and trinkets receives the xnost honour. Naturally the tribesmen delight in be- ing showered with gifts by the chiefs, and the latter wish te maintain the riglit te give away as mmcli as tbey like te whom. they please. At the close of the givîng of presents, a big dance and feast is hcld. The strangest of ail Indian dances, perliaps, are those given under- ground. These are common among the Tewos, ln the Southeru United States. No white man, it is said, has ever been permittcd to sec one. During the preparations for and pro- gress of the dance, a careful guard is kept se that there may be no possi- bility of a white man stealing in. Large dugouts are made, with long underground passages, and these, too, are carefully guarded te sc that noue but a Tewo is allowed te pass. The Indian will always danice. The desire to shake his f cet is inborn, and no amount of civilization seems to uproot it. The character of Indian dances has necessarily changed con- siderably. Social dances are beeom- ing more common, and on some of the reserves large buildings are bei-ng erected in which the more modern Indian dances are tauglit te the young Indians. None of the treaty Indiana of either the United States or Canada have been known to adopt any of the white mian's dances. The tango and the bunny-hug are foreign te thema. They have net yet learned te dance i each other's arma.",
         "01bzcimc 11poticsan 13Y M. FORSYTH GRANT Lb my life 1 ean remein- 47 ber e ë(tions. Both nmy rAndfathers h avin g been prominent publie men, and Mny father also ini publie life front al- mosýýt bis youth, elections and politice were to us youngsters ail in the day's work, and very dfifferent, were both from what they are now. Liberals a.nd Conservatives were the bitterest enemies, the parties having nothing to do with each other, and we as chul- dren were taught to look on \"Grits\" as the nieanest of creatures. I eau well remember a frightful row I had with Mmlr. James iPînimer, or rather, Miss Annie McConkey, of Barrie, as she was then, when as children play- ing together she said something about George Brown. Now, the name of George Brown had adways been re- presented to me as something vile and too horrible to, live, and the idea that, as my playmate saîd, he was a kindly gentleman, was one which could not be allowed to exist for a moment. Ac- cordingly, we had a violent quarrel, wbich ended in a foreible separation by the governess, whosc contemptible tone 1 eau hear now saying, \"The lit- tie geese have been talking polities\". 1 wonder bow manY children would do that now. Mrs. Plummer and 1, have bad many a laugh over that vio- lent controversy. Elections lasted then for two days at least, and the e, repoirti of the canvasaersz were often broigbt to my fathier, whio mni for \\VYst Toronto, thait Ilit icyten takîng in the haif (4fl te' lity, witb St. John's and St. ariksWards. The formner was the property of mv granrdfather, Ilageriian, the naiesi Christopber (bis; owni), Eliza- betbhlydn Teraulay, etc., being ohi faily rimes, and was inbabited chiefly by the negrocs, wbo were the general wbitewasbers and barbers of that day. An old man named Lewis, a huge, fat man, black as a shoe, was Ieft by the mistress of a well-known bouse here, that of the late ilonour- able J. F[illyard. Cameron, to, do a lot of whitewasbing during hem ab- sence in tbe summer (and there was always a great amount of whitewash- ing to be done each year), but to her borror, on returning, Mrs. Cameron found that old Lewis bad actually in- duced ber cook, an English woman, tu, îarry hua. Old Taylor (a fre- quent visitor to The Globe office, wbere Mr. Biggar had an excellent portrait of him), and an old couple of the name Warren, 'were some, 1 re- member, but 1 was always terrified of tbem. Mrs. Chamberlain, mother of Miss Fitzgibbon, wrote a deliglit- fui article on \"The Coloured Citizens of Toronto\", published in the trans- actions of the Women's Canadian Ris- torical Society, and as she lived in Avenue Street, where the General",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Hlospital is uow, she saw a lot of these eu r io i s folk. Many of thema were niy faithc(r's constituents, and 1 can re- membeir wvell bis having a number at Slepy ollw.One evcninghe had an oystur supper for, I suppose, some of the p)romiinent voters. The table was set with a) huge dish of oysters in the shleil, whicb were opened by the ser- vant as- wanted, and we eould hear the \"Yah, Yah\" as stories were told. MTy inother had gone te bed, but pres- ently my father came rushîng up- .stairs, saying, III want yen to corne dewn and sing for these fellows.\" ý1y mothier, I suppose, demurred, but ho said, \"Ohi, put on a dressing-gown, and sing, iii thec hall !\" and so she did; and I shial nieyer forget the pîeture reiningiiý with me of ber standing in the long hiall, close to the dining-room door, aija-r, and singing in bier glor- ionsvol e, \"athlen avoureneen\" and1 \"Home Swýeet Home\", songs w1ilcb invmriaibly brougbt dowu the bouse, î)i( were recciv-ed witbi raptur- eus nbuis by. bier uniscen audi- ence thait nigblt. Doiubýtless3 tie elee- tion was won. On thie electien days thiere wce aflways immense crowils at the ponn-oohee big one being St. iPtrc's irket, in Qucen Street, ndi theori wais sorne dloffbt of the ward, so my. mtother, whio always drove round te tie polling-lcs ordered old Scallion to get bis big double cab aud wbiite borses (sucb a hanidsome old inan with silvery cuirls, and 1 was% puit into a blue dress and jacket and hiugýe legbhorn bat witb feathiers, au d allowed to go, too. M1y mother had bad 5sent to ber froem Ireland a large piece of peat, and, fromn an Irish admirer of bier singing, a huge brooch made of bog oak, with a gold barp in tbe centre, and \u003c'Erin go bragli\" put on, fastening the elegant \"Bur- noos\", a long embroidcred eloak then worn. The peat, a dried-up, browu turf, the size of a loaf of bread, was also taken. 'When we got te St. Pat- rick's Market, in Queen Street, just opposite to Beverley Flouse, the borne of my grandfather, Sir John Bevrer- ley Robinson, and wbere my father was hemn, a seething crowd was jost- ling iu buudreds in front of the vet- ers' place, and a rather tough-looking lot, tee, probably mainly of foreiguers spoiling for a fight. Our carrnage drove up, and my mother spied Mr. James E. Smith, late Mayor of To- ironto, and beckoned to him. H1e carne up at once, bis white teeth sbining in the sunlight as be smiled and raised bis bat. My mother bauded him the piece of peat, askiug bim to, give it te any Irishman who would came for it. H1e prmrised, and held it bigh up in bis hand, and as we drove away my mother smilingly touched ber great brooch, saying, \"Brin go bragb\" te, the watcbing erowd, and the next mo- ment Mr. Smith was ovemwbelrncd by the rush of Irisbmen crying for \"a bit of the ould land\". Many of them. were crying, aud be bad mueh to do te prevent bimself from being injured in the impulsive, bomc-loviug crewd. And the election was won. 1 remember a rnost amusing scene on the Ilustîngs, wbich was in York ,Street, opposite the eld Rossin Ilouse (now the Prince George), wherc we watebed froin a balcouy the fermning of a long procession to escort the suc- csulcandidates. Wbile waitiug, looking at the enommous crowd, a negro suddenly made bis appeamace ou the platferm, whicb was built out of the window abeve a large ware- bouse door. Hie attempted to spcak, but the crowd objected, and roared and shouted so strennously that not; a word could be heard. I shaîl neyer forget the violent gesticulations, the throwing up of arma, the bobbing of the woolly bead, the gleaming teeth aud wbites of bis eyes, the evident eujoymnt of the man bixuseîf, and not a word was be allowed to give. It was certainly a funny pantomime. A beautiful carrnage was -decomated with fiags, and witb its four herses stoed ready for Mny father, Who was presently carried ont sboulder-high in a big chair completely wreatbed With flewers. The bearers sitopped by",
         "011D-TIUE POLITICS AND ELECTIONS the carniage and hie leaped iightiy in from the chair over the door, whereat there was another bunt of cheering fromi the crowd, who then followed uip to Bevcrley Ilouse, where my grand- father came out on the upper porcli and gave an address. 1 bave a dim recollection of sccing hlm standing there with his beautiful face and snowy bain, and then giving the order for a cask of aie to bie brouglit out on the lawru. No doubt there was much drinking at the elections, though I, cannot say that I rememben anyting of it. A-nother election won by mny f ather and the Ilonourable John Crawford, afterwards Lieutenaut-Governor of Ontario, was also the occasion o! a great procession, when the two mem- bers, 1 suppose, representing the Roman Catholic and Orange vote, were earricd in a big boat on whecls, splen(iidiy decorated with flowcrs and flags, and stood claspingr bauds. That must have been the elcetion when Mly mother. a life-long fricnd o! Mrs. Crawford's, drove to York lieuse, where Mr. Crawford livcd for many years (rny Grandfather Hagerman s home, on Simcoe and Wellington Streets), and insisted on Mrs. Craw- ford ordering ber carriage and driv- ing round to the poliing-hooths of lier hnsband's division, as tîxere was some fear o! non-election. Mrs. Craw- ford, a taîl, dignified, but very shy woman, fin ally consentcd to show ber personal interest, and again the edcc- lion was won. There was a bad character in the lown, whose actual name 1 forget, but it was sornething like Feegan. H1e came up one aftenoon late la Sieepy Ilollow to say my'faîher was to be s'hot if lie came up llirough the Qucen Street avenue thal night. This was in the midst of cauvassing and iny father, o! course, was out busy with the electors. My mother was nearly frautie. There were no telephones then. and servants, with a cousin, Frank Josephi, who aiways iived with us, were sent in every direction with messages to warn rny father not to corne home. After liours of searching hie was found in a small grocer's shop, sitting\" on an up-tiirned barrel, enti.ng a sandwichI axai drink- ing a glass of beer. Having a con- fab with his electors, no douht. lie was a very poweN-rfui man, ixut sucli was lte reputation of the then ncigh- bourhood of Qufetn's Park and the avenues that hie always carried in bis po*ekt at night a short but f right- fully heavy leadcd stick withi a blunt end, whivh would, rost effectivcly have laid a man out. Probably the Irishman who threatened mny have heard of the instrument, for 1 do not remember any further trouble. There were some clever cartoons ima\u003cl o! tlicelcections and piublic af- Viris !unoirally, in w'hipl aimn krown as \"Bob MIood(ie\" furdoftcen. T eau- not reoAil thic reasoýn for isI dist0inc- tion. MNr. Toh^n Baxiter was aiii)iher xvelhknown poiîticali frivrid andI aId- eruxian. lie was; the mo4t enormoiusly '4otxt 111,11 I ever saw, wilt a fatl, Inlly fae nd wbheezy voice. ý\\ly ft hkdto entertain his mcxi frieuds, and as a tiny cliiid I ewîie the great suppers, always se t in ih d )( 1raw- îng-rooni, 1 suppose, on tbe rag ed for the occasion, as, thie room wais tlirty-fouir feet iu lengtbfl, and to tisi day the scent of the delielous spiced fruits, then sucli a feature o! any banquet, figs and raisins sucli as one neyer sees now, linge boxes o! Frenchi plurns and other confections, cornes to me. We children used to peep in at the doors when the gentlemen were al seated, and 1 shall neyer forget sec- iug John i3axter take a hinge orange and calmly cat it as though il were au apple, peel and aIl, and then help himseif to the contents o! a great jar of pickles. Sunday afternoons in the summer were popular at Sleepy lIollow for a gathering of mnen friends, social and political, and somehow one grew iup in an atmosphere o! city and country polities unlike, I think, anything the young people are accustorned to now.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE When Parliameut was moved to Que- bec, thie wvhole family went, too, for the sessýion, and the travelling was so primnative in the winters, I eau re- miember, Smail enough te curl up on an ordinairy car scat for the long niglit journey to) Point Lievis, I recail being earried ouit cither in the gray dawn or twilighit from the train to immense rowboas, baggage and servants aiso, wlhichl were drawn up onl a steep, iey siope. Whent ail was ready the men heaved and pushed, and away we went, dowu, down, until the heavy boats slid into the waters of the St. Lawrence, which was covered with broken ice. The men bent ta their great oars, singiug their Frenchi boat- songs, and every now and then oee would jumrp out, hanging on ta the gunwale, and trample the ice dewn under the water wîtth bis huge boots. For years we had rooms in Quebec with an old Mr. Keating, who was well-known to cveryone, and devoted to mny father and mother. The flrst I recali were on Parliament Hil1, and my brother and I often would mun over te the Buildings and get iute the gallery and sit there listeuing to the spoehes, littie or nothiug of wiehl wve couid have understood. Sir Allani Mâacnab was Speaker one ses- sion, I caen remember, and we both kuew bis fine head aud dignilled fig- ure, in his robes; and the oue incident I recall is while watchiug and listen- ig to the speeches, we saw our father aipproaehi the steps of the Speaker's throne with some papers in his hand. As he bent with one foot on the iower step, Sir Ailan leaned forward and asked a question, at the same time iooking up at us, who were, no doubt, conspieus, as childrcn in seats wýhcrc there werc many growu peo- pie. We saw my father giauce up at 1uS, nod, and appareutiy answer Sir Ali an, and in a few minutes a mes- senger came -up and told us we were ta coame into the Speaker's gallery by Sir Allau's orders. So we twe, mites were gravely ushered with due cere- mony into the small gal]erY opposite the chair, and doubticss did not like the distiiguished seats as well as those te whieh we were aecustomed. The waik on the Durham (aftcr- wards Dufferin) Terrace was the proper thing to do, and at mid-day a great gun hoomed from the citadel, the bail falling into the watcr, ta my infinite dread and terror. Ail the fashionables used *to walk up and down, the place was brimful of mili- tary people, and, with a splendid baud piayiug, it was a briliant scene, with the bright colours and fiashing roofs of the old city and the giorious river beueath. I eau rememaber a strauge acquaintance I pick 'ed up in an odd way. One momniug I heard a bugle %ounding its siivery tone apparentiy high up behind the big bouse in St. John Street. I ran up some stairs ta the roof and ini some way got out ou the gravcllcd top and across mauy otber roofs. I spied a soi- died leauing ou a stone parapet blow- iug away ou his bugle. It eould net have been far away, sa I veutured a friendiy remark, ta which the soi- dier, ne doubt highly amused, made repiy, anid we became great frieuds though we neyer came nearer than the roof-tops. Hie wouid play al manuer of calis for me, and I neyer spoke of the frieudship ta auyoue. I remember a Good Friday in the old city, the nurse taking me ta every Roman Cathoic church we could walk te, aud the, te me, awfui figures and paiutings of the Crucifixion, in life- like max, with the sacred wounds aud blood ail showu in crimson. They -haunted me for many a day and uight. Colonel Payuter was the command- ant one year of aur stay, and lie was very kind te me, taking me for drives round the city, aud as he came near any of the famous gates wc eould heur, in souareus toues, coming from the \"non-cota.\" \"Turu eut the guard\", and almost invariabiy the colonel would cail out at once, «Turu in the guard\", thougli sometimes for my amusement he wouid ailow the file of men te carne out and gravely take",
         "OLD-TIE POLITICS AND ELECTIONS thec saite. There was something in being aý pe rson, of eonsequenteo in those (b ys! TU, so'îeity in Quec was thený vcrty 1llgtfl have heariid MY Mothler speak! of it as being so. Chief Justice Boweiî, the first Lady Rose, wbo wvas so eharming and hos- pitabIe, Aiways heing prepared for six guets t dinner in case Sir John Roseý wished to ask friends without notice: the Priee's beautiful oid place oit the St. Lois Road, behind whieli Wolf e camne utp the bank two hundred years ago; the Mlontizarn- berts,. flic Stîiarf s, the Forsyths, are al n e of oid friends, Sir Ed- mund Ilead was, in Goverument flouse, and we were allowed to go to the soldiers' riding-school to sec Miss Hiead taking the jllmps in masteriy fashion. Later on 1 remember an occurrence whicli doubtiess at the time, was of great political, significance. My father -always a man of the Conservative party, and of influence in it as to deep party spirit-had some bitter dispute with Sir John A. Maedonald, anîd was unforgivîng to the point of refusing to run for an election. Hie thereby roused fthc anger of the Premier, and one evening, when Sir John A., -who was then occupying a hou se- lu St. George Street, sent a messagie to my mother that he was eoming over to see my father, and lie wanted hcr help. My father af flrst refused to sce him and my mother had to entreat that the visitor inigiit be received, and when Sir John came lie begged my mother to, intercede. We were ail in the library, my father having gone to the drawing-room, and front whencc, Sir John having been taken there by my mother, we presently heard loud and angry voices in argument. After a time the Prem- ier came ont and almost went on his, knees to beg my mother to intercede, which, 1 suppose, she did, and to ef- feet, for my faflier did not appear. Sir John came into the library, and as lie was then on the temperance ticket, 1 remember the tea-tray being ordereil in and his quafling the sifrong, fragrant beverageý ouf or a howl, as w ý e 10 n cuplareen l r] hMs 1ate catisc h thi«n 1fiur, wiîth ýflc uglY 1, 1vrfcat u chin aîîid he(ar the vehemenc1ýe of the toue, îiu whiehl he said If) ler, \"John must ruai. You will have to inake huîn i!\" MN'y fahe lways thiouglit helma' ant eneî\"Ny of, qir '1oh11 A., ais when Lîcfenn -{1verorof Ontarlo) he asseîîfcd to thie riîigon of an dec- fiait by iNr. Mýowat (afterwards Sir Oliver), whichli e coxîdered a con- stifutional measure, irrespective of party, as Licutenant-Governor, Sir John neyer entered Goverument Ilouse during his term there. Lady Macdonald was an enormous help to her husband, and every day and nighft was at the flouse during the session, and fhough a curiously-mannered woman, was a most devoted wife. She always made a point of caIiing on tlic memibers' wives, who then thirongred the Russell Ilouse in Ottawa, aiii I bave seen lier corne into flic draiw- ing-room there, sfately in velvet and furs, send ber cards to the various rooms, and presently lie flic centre of a large ring of women, cadi, of couirse, as site entered, under the ipeso fIat she was flic only one eled ont! lier conversational poiwers, wverc great, and suc was neye-(r dawntcdI by,ý num- bers, and wouid chant and tailk to eaeh of tlie wide circle as thougli shie was the only one of importance. A gre-at gift, truly! She was thoronglyl' verscd in polities and lad many de(- voted friends amongst Sir John's ad(- lierents, and Nvhom shc spoke of ais lier \"ded-ap.Lady Mae-)donalf must have witnessed somie wild scenes in elction times, unknown fo tIc, wo- men of the present day of blos and no donîf. shc helped by be 1r un- tiring devotion to win many. We chiîdren were aceustomed to tic details of party figîts, and knew ail about the meetings whieh, wlien weathler pcrmitt cd, welie lield in the",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE open air. One stiil June night is now University Avenue. There were we ail assernbled on the verandali of no buildings to speak of between us, Sleepy Hollow to listen to my father's and now and then, thongh we heard voice in a speech lie was making at no words, thte stentorian, distinguisit- the corner of Queen Street and what ed voice could be distinctly iteard. THE BOYS' ROOM Bv LOUISE MOREY BOWMAN THFE annshine was spattering over the floor And the littie green leaves were whispering And tapping outside thte pane. Titere were titeir college banners and books; And, hung on the plain gray wail, Sir Galaliad, shining and tail, Waiting there for bis vision, In the dreain-1illed days of yore. But now they have seen a vision And shàil tliey cornte back no more f Tlirouigl thte open door I heard the step of tite brave littie brown-eyed mother, .And thiougli site sniiled on the thresliold, In lier eyes the big tears gleamed. \"I've been sucit a hiappy wornan! We've always drcamed Titat littie grandchildren miglit corne some day, And get out thte old toys, and romp and play Just as tkey used to. But now, you know, There is something greater titan that, and, oit, Sometimes one almost grows afraid to dream!1 \"Fred writes, 'You tauglit us to \"Foilow the gleam\"', With gay old Galaitad there on our wall. Clicer up, motiter. Titis life's not al'. Think of Fred-our joker-writing titat. Well, 'We must go down to, lunch, dear. There's thte bell.\" And so we silently closed the door, And left thte room as it was before, Witit thte sunshine spattermng over the floor In a frolie of golden rain' And thte littie green leaves a-whispering And tapping outside tite pane. But 110w witen we talk of thte war, I s.ce, Above thte horrible, deatit-fllled gloom That rises before me, \"the boys' old room\"ý- Àvision witose beauty shall neyer pale; A temple that stili guards thte Holy Grail.",
         "THE SHIELDS 0F ROSSELAERE \"It is proved that the ries and usuagès cf war were frequentIy broken, particularly b\u003e' the using of civilîans, including women and chîldren, as a ahield for advancing forces exposed to, fi,.\". -Report of Lord Brijce*s CommtUee on eranttW .",
         "The Canadian Magasine",
         "lRiow for flic lbircb Mirau BY C. H. J. SNIDER ilS. ONTARIO met me a t the railway station. Sheiý was a douce mat- ron on thxe suinny side of forty, comnfortably clad in crisp cool sumnmer clothes of the saine style and eut as those of prosperous city sisters. She had a veinerable l3ueephalus--aged thirty- one, she told me--and a two-seated buggy. 1 presented my identification dise--J mean my Ontario Goverument Emp)loymecnt Bureau eard-and she mnade rooni for me and my leather handbaig. Soon we were grinding cheerfuilly along the gravel, while on eitherv side streamed by fields brown in stubble, golden witlx grain, or green with elover, lucerne, or alsîke. Overheadýi( hi-planes droned, bound to and froin the aviation camp, a hun- dred miiles away. From the fields camne the clink of whetted scythe, as somneone prepared to \"eut the ern- ex-s\" of a field ripe for harvest, or the purr of a \"seif-biuder\", slieing down the standing grain and tossing it off in twjine-tied sheaves. l3lorses' heads were now aud again visible above the grain, but the only sigu of hiumans was the occasional appearance of the yeilow brin' of a straw bat. \"Theiy eall this No Man's Laud.\" said 'Mrs. Ontario. \"Thex'e's nobody left on the farina bereabout but old- ish chaps and boys sud women. If we conld only get help-but ail the hired m'en and fax-mers' sono are off to the war 1\" After a quarter o! an bour we turu- ed into a lane and reaebed a red brick bouse wiîth white trimmiinge, all em- bowered iii lilaca saud apple-trees, and aentiuelled by Lomnbardy poplars. 1 was led ini throngh fly-sereened doors and the cool dax-kneas of green shades to a smiall bedroom. \"You can leave your valise here,\" said Mrs. Ontario. \"This ia your x-oom. Would you like to change your clothes V\" I would, aud 1 did, xuarvelling the wbule at the contrast between the ex- pected aud thxe actual in this hire- ling's boudoir. The rooin was not so sniall as to be crowded by a large mirror and dresser, two chairs, and a btxe-ur er\"bd. It was car- peted sud thiere were pluxmp white pillows. On the wall hung a framned \"cmotto\", worked in coloured wool on perforated cardboard, exhorting praise to God fron' whoiu ail bless- ings flow. These details 1 noted as, belxind the closed doox-, I slipped out of ruy business tweeds sud inito n'y hired- man's costume. There waa a coat- hanger for the preservation of n'y padded shoulders, sud plenty of hooks. I opened niy bag sud got out the gearlIbad brought. It had this order of muert: One toothbrush, Oo tube tooth paste, two pairs of wool-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE len soeks, two paire of gloves, two suits of light underwear, one linen bat, property of xny wife, two soft shirts, one pair of duck trouser, one duck coat, one camiera, one wooilen sweater. Oh, yes, 1 lied soap, towels, a few collars and handkerchiefs, and a comb and hairbrusb, besides. Stiil, my wbole outfit, închading the leather bag, did flot weigh more than fifteen pounds. My change of costume did not oc- eupy ten minutes. Fortunately my brownish duck suit was already wel stained with a season's salling usage. My bat-or my wife's--looked glar- ingly clean, I knew, and 1 was also conscious of the fact that my long- practised habit of wearing my soecs oiitside of the. legs of niy workijng trousers would be a decided innova- tion. Stili, 1 knew the bat was won- derfuily cool, very light, and su-re to stay on my bead; snd my style of sock-wearing was one of whieh 1 had proved the, efflciency. It is only the puttee plan simplified. «You look the. part ail right,\" was Mrs. Ontaro's qomewhat enigmatical compliment as 1 re-appeared. \"You'Il find Mr. Ontario over ini the oat-lleld, where you see the horses witb the bin- der.\" 1 started off briskly, for there ws, stiil an hour or so of the. forenoon left. I had gone a bunidred yards wben I remembered my gloves, so 1 ran back aud got pair number one- harvest niitts o! greenish leather, with hlack wristbands. Tbey bad stale for the forefingers as welU as the thumbs, and tbey cost fifty-five cents a pair. 1 soon heard the binder, and over- bauled that noble craft rapidly, as it appeared to b. making heavy wea- ther o! a tempestuous sea o! oats. Iu tact, it was boys-to, witb theo three horses that drew it making an ex- tempore meal of oats-in-tbe-shea! wbule the. driver lient ov\u003c\u003er it and ap- plied an oil-eau vigorously. So far as 1 could judge at a distance, frein a back view of a pair of blue overalle and a wide straw hat of the cow's- breakfast variety, Mr. Ontario wasn't a very broad-shouldered man nor very big, and bis ankles looked v.ery trim in low white sboes and white stockings. \"Good land !\" thougit; 1, adopting the metaphor of the soil as rapidly as possible. \"Have 1 been fooled in- to working for one of those gilk- bosieried gentlemen farmerst Well, l'Il bail hum ailyway.\" \"gocod-day,\" I bailed, \"Are you »-- At this, witb a final fiick of the oil-can the binder-driver straightened up and turned reund. \"Miss Ontario ?\" 1 ftnisbed, execut- ing a mental s\u003cômersault so, rapidly that xny tongue ahnost tied in a knot. \"Yes,\" said Miss Ontario, for, as Bab the Sub-Deb would say, \"It wus indeed she\". She bad smooth brown bair and frank bine eyes. Her moutb was kind aud sensible, and ber éheeks glowed with a bealthy outdoor flush, heigbt- ened perbaps a tiny bit by conscions- ness of ber'onter garments. \"I'm Jerry Fromtown, the new bired man,\" I said. \"At least I hope 1 amn. Where's Mr. Ontariol\" \"Papa's over there, shocking,\" an- swered the young lady, bopping on to the eushioned binder-seat with a serene ignoring of the fact that she herscIf migbt have been said te, b. similarly employed. \"See the man and the boy past the corner of the. oats? Get up, Qneen 1-D oil !--Jack!1\" And !orthwith sh. aud ber three- horse-power chariot plunged into the, fray with the. oats again, leaving be- hind a wake o! yeilow-headed sheaves and an admiring hired man. Around the corner of the dwin- dling oat-sea I found Mr. Ontario and Young Toronto. Mr. Ontario was a littie grizzled, but mueb too vigorous to bc taken for that purely mythiesi creation o! the cartoonist, Old Man Ontario. H. might bave been Old Man's eldest son. As a matter o! tact the gnarled old figure of the car- toouists reprei.iits the. retired tarin.",
         "NOW FOR THlE IIIRED MAN er whose home is ini the county town; and hie would neyer have got into the papers if somnebody hadùn't first drawn Uncle Sam. But this is ail by the way. I told Mr. Ontario 1 was Jerry Fromtowu, proved it by my bureau employment card, and coufessed to utter ignorance of farming. Time was when the best this would have brought me would have been au op- portunity to work \"for iny keep\", but times have changed. \"But you're strong, ail right, ain't .you t\" Mr. Ontario inquired hope- fully. IIaving acquired much muscle driv- ing a leadpencil twenty-five years, 1 repicd by teling hlm to show me a job. \"'WelI, Young Toronto aud me's sliocking wliile we're cutting, and my daughter-that's lier you saw on the way down-drves the binder. If yon think you ean sliock, take liold?\" ,'Sure,\" 1l said. \"What are you paying 1\" \"Two, some of 'em two and a hli a day, accordiug to what experience a man lias.\" \"Give me two, tlien,» I said, \"until l'in worth nmore, Are tliere many thisties iu the oatst?\" '¶Not bad,\" said lie. \"Maybe you won't need mitts, if your liands are liard. Now, my nm, watcli me and do as 1 do.\" Hlaviug already est aside my pride, 1 stripped te mny undershirt and pro- ceeded to seize a sheaf. Tlie sheaf-hersidic. Emblem of order snd symrnetry, level-based, cyliudrical, girdled witli a goodly band of its own strair, with golden heads depending gracefully like tas- sels from the Bible-cushion of the old-fashioued pulpits. And then, the aheaf-actual. A flattiali buncli ot staiks of all lengtlis, tied in the mid- dle~ witli a lienpen string sud pro- truding in ail directions, maklug al a4ngles except a right-angle, describ- ig ai curves except a cirele. And garnislied, moreover, witli ecekie aud thistie, and dear knows what not. This, the sheaf actual, was wliat 1 was required to \"shock'. Verily, whatever shocking miglit mean, it iras the sheaf that was doing it just tlien, not I. 1 tried to stand one up, but it was like baianciug an egg on end; and for the moment the sheaf seemed as fragile. I liad a horrible feeling that a complete failure of the ost crop was going Wo resuit, due to de- struction in handliug by unski lIed help. But Mr. Ontario and Young Toron- to came to the rescue promnptly. From their instruction 1 learned te grasp the innocent masses of straw, tuck them under each arm, and wîith the assistance of thigli and knce, if neces- sary, slam themn up, heada% together, butta spart, until tliey stood lu a tentlike row of five pairs, with tlie wind( hlowing merrily betireen their separated feet. Young Toronto iras willing Wo locate the tent-sites and give general instructions. Hle liad a cast in one eye, but a good heart sud more mauniiiers than most Toronto school boys. lle liad been on the farm siÎnce leaving school luthe city lu the spring, and lie was carefuily conceal- ing the tact that lie iras going te have a sixteeuth birthday \"some time uext week\". lu this part of the country birthdayi congratulations take the form of eolid irater applications, lii\u003e. erally supplied by ail wlio eau get within tlirowing distance. The first hour's shockiug was the longeat fsrm-work 1 did. It iras not that the sheaves irere lieavy, but they irere-rather, I was-awkward. And the walking iras terrible. In ten min- ultes I liad adopted thc lieavy stum- ling gait of the Shore Acres stars, sud I neyer released it until 1 reacli- ed concrete sideiraika again. Laugli at it if you like, but it is the only way te save yourself as you pleugli througli dodu, ireedsand stubhle, with befli arme engaged. Around sud arouud that blesaed field ire trudged, overtaking the biuder whlen the kuot- ter or the kuives or the siats or soins",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE other part of that machine, or the grain itscif, gave trouble, and falling behind when things went smnoothly for Miss Ontario. _Whatever lappen- ,ed, sh. was always, able to remedy matters for herseif, so tlat we had three pairs of arms for the shiocking and began to use Up thc overplus of sattered sbeaves that had accumu- latced, But ere that occurred 1 was drippiig with perspiration, blind with thce beat, and flrrnlly conviueed that tlic sheemaker should. stick ta bis last and city men te the sidewalk. I was cither to\u003e hiot or tdo tired te hear the eaUl when it came, but Mr. Ontario anniounreed i a casual way, \"Dininer. Uinhiteli them horses and drive tlwem up,\" and the binder ceased its seng. Mliss Ontario drove lier steeds before lier, trotting behind themn witli careful steps as she pîcked lier way through the stubble te, the lane; anrd we three lurchcd after, en- gaged in a cemplicated discussion on how many balls of binder twine weuld b. needed for this harveet, and whe- ther it weuld b. better ta buy uew against a possible price advance next year. Mliss Ontario, over her sheul- d1er, had the affirmative-but Mr. On- tarie hadi tihe casting vote. Atter the horses had been watered, stabled and ted w. arrived at the. house, ler. I encountercd a great profusion o! those twin luxunies in thec eeuntry, hiard and soft water. Persowally 1 neyer did like either. Soft water always smells of decaying vegetation, and biard water always tastes bitter-te the city man. IProb- ably w. miss the. taste et our beloved chiorine sterilizer. Jlewever, Mr. On- tario's wella were excellent o! their kind, the water coming up clear and very rold, and hie cistern yielded a bountiful supply ot ydllowish fluid whioli lathered easily and proved vcry acceptaible. There was plenty ot soap and plenty of towels, and we made extensive use ef bath. Then we fouglit past an army ot flues that b.- sieged the screen doors and mat do'wn te dinner. I was lucky, havîng Mr. 'Ontario, the base of supply, on ni r left, at the head of the table, and Miss Ontario on my riglit. Mrs. Ontario sat at the other end of the table, Young To- ronto opposite me, and a rosy-check- ed Miss of fourteen or so, who was sojourning an the farm, sat beside him. A littie Dublin-boru colleen of thc saune age waited on table. She liad corne to Canada as a baby, but retained enougi :flaveur of the Liffey to explain, te lier rnistress that the reason she liad left 'so rnany eyes i the petatoes was that they raiglit sec their way into thc pot. Dinnier costumes, varicd. Mrm On- tario was the pink of propniety i the cool starched things aforernentienied. Mfiss iRosy Cheeks wore a pinafore. Miss Ontario retailled lier overalls. Mr. Ontario and Young Toronto wore their workiug shirts. So did I. The festive board was smiledl upon by a framed photegrapli of Queen Victoria, and restrained from fr1- volity by a portrait ef Gladstone on the opposite Wall. Above tlie door leading te the hall was the text, work- ed in wool like the one in my bd- reoon, «God is Love\". There were alse on the painted walls two franed lithograplis, a mimmer scene and a winter seene, an 'anframned picture ef very gorgeous fruit beside a bowl of goldflsh, an iusurance« cimpany's calendar, and an early Vietorian print entitled \"The Lover's Recon- ciliation\", wbich ernphasized the dit- fieulties of endearments duning th~e reigu of crinoline. The table was covered with a white linen cloth. It lad an asparagus feru i a brass bowl in the centre, and Mrs. Ontario struck a lîttie bell whenx sbe wanted the Duxblinette. Glasses were filled from 9- freaiuly puinped pail of cold water, which stoed at 3fr. Ontario's riglit knee on the floor, the. food and drink and con- versatien circulated in a rapid stream, Mr. Ontario being the. reconie ~source and fountainhead for ail three. The. menu cnitd ef sirloixi",
         "NOW FOR TUE HIRED MAN steak with bro'wn gravy, boiled pota- tees, carrots and beets, with a salad of sliced tomatoes and cucumbers4 very pleasantly cool from the refri- geracor, and apple pie for dessert. There was tea in plenty, with white sugar, and cream frorn the farm._ The butter carne from a ncighbour's, the bread from, a baker's, and there were two varieties of home-bakcd biscuits; aise cake. 1 have detailcd this flrst menu because it ivas typical e! eur dinners while I was a hired man. They wcre always different, but ai- ways as ample. A bell rang ere the gravy hadl been served. It was net the cail for the Dublinette, and I looked around in- credulously, reminded e! the desk telephone I had left several million miles behind me. Yes, tbere on the wali behînd Mr. Ontario sat auld Niek, in shape oW 'phone-- \"À toway tyke, black, grim and large, To gie the muaîc wau his charge' \"- and he did it, in an almost continul- ous series o! embinations o! long and short rings. «It's a party lime,» Miss Ontario expiained as sie heiped me to toma- tees, \"and everybody's using now that they'rc in from the fleide for dinner. That's the ring fer Hazel's place. She's just thxe came age as I ama, and she'secuting this year, tee. Our ring's a short and a long. She's eut forty acres se far, and I-there's our riug\"-as a short-and-long tintinna- bulation interrupted. Mr. Ontario, it appeared, had about as much seclusion in the pri- vacy o! his demestie board as any desk-siave who tries te swallew sand- wiches at noon heur. Iu the inter- -vals between helpings of apple-pie and bee!fsteak he, by telephonie, beught a cew and cal!, three miles away; sold the cal! fer ten dollars; received an S.O.S. call frem a neigh- bour who nceded a rope spliccd; ar- ranged with anether neiglibour te take bis xnilk te the station the fol- lowing morning; found that the tra- velling tbreshing outfit would be able to give him a haif -day next week; agreed te splice the rope whiÎle the rope owner drove bis newly-purchas- ed cow in for hixn. The meal was net a hurried one- for anyone except Mr. O)tairio. The wash in cold water and] the streteli- ing of my leg-s under the table Lad largely restored my energies-as the varishiing s1feak attested-and I liad plenty of leisure te follow tihe rail- way signrboard's advice to '-stop- Look-liîsten,\". Miss Ontairio was neither self-eonscious ner conceited. She laughied at my confession of amazement at my first sight of her, and ber mother explained that the year before, when ber daiighter'e everails made their firet appearance, everybody professed te be aghast at them, but now they were being adopted by many of the girls on the f arme. \"It isn't for their leoks,\" Miss On1- tarie explain.ed, «\"for goodness knows they are ugly enough, but yen really cant get on and off the binder-seat with skirts and keep the hein out of the machinery.» And this seventeen-year-old slip of the geed Canadian maple tree, who had eut balf a hundred acres ef grain in the last fortnight, was, ten menthe in the year, a smart-frocked high Sceel girl, riaing at six e'elock in the merniug te catch a train fer th.0 eity, and returning te ber lilac-ahel- tered homestead, acheel beoks in band, areund seven e'clock at night. She had worked at the hayiug, and she was geing te werk in the naow when hauling-in began . She ceuld talk as well about Charlie Chaplin, the First Hundred Thousand(, or the antice ef a \"tin lizzie\"', as she could about the price of binder twine or bow te eut a field of rain-beaten oats. She believed hats and shoes and gleves were the essentiala e! a cee- tumne, and weuld rather have thinge simple and plain and very, very good, than frilly and cheap. And se en, Ail of whieh, er moet of whieh, I",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE learned, not in conversation with lier, but withliber niotiter, or fromn the conversation which raced between them. while tihe telephone claimed Mr. Ontaria's attention. It was an hour and a haif froxu the. tixne the weleome dinner eail had interrupted our shocking operations tiUl we resumed them. That interval proved to me a very heipful re8pite. Of course, in addition to getting our own dinners, during titis period, we had also ted and watered Queen, Dol and Jack, the~ tbree binder horses, and pumped-with the. assist- auce of a titree horse-power gasoline grunter-a trougit full of water for the. seven dairy eows and haif-dozen caives and steers that formed Mr. On- tario's bord. Lt seemed odd that Mrs. Ontario should b. buying butter with titis source of supply so near at hand, but the. explanation lay in the faet that the xnilk was siiipped daily to a dairy in the city. 1 began my trudge after the bin- der thoroughly retresiied. Tire o'clo\u003cck came, and titre., anxd tour, and I was again perspiring and stumbling along, with no energy left for anything but the next sheaf, when there was an- otiier hall froni heaven, so to speait, and Mr. Ontario announced \"lunch\"». We forthwith adjourned to the house again, and st dewn to an elaborate tes.. That isto say, wehad the hlp- fui fluid named, and bread and but- ter, toniatoes, biscuits, cake sud pre. servcd cherries. Titis meal iras oe o! the more elaborate of its kind wnl\u003ci I experienced in my farming - as a rnie it iras carried ont to, us in easily titan betore. Net only on titis first day, but on ail full da\"s of my toil did I notice this phenomenon; my iast hour and a hait irent the most easily et aill W. worked in the. field until the sun dipped; then trailed stablewards, to teed the horses and cattle and seventeen pigs, and put ail the live stock te, bed. Miiking itad been in progrese for some time, under thie auspices of the Dublinette aud Miss Rosy Cheecks. Mr. Ontario finished it. Being unskilled at this task, I iras cxempted. Instead, I got hay for the herses. I iras amnazed at the buik of their proyeuder-it measured by the. cord and weighed by the ton-and at the. difficulty of ahstraetiug the ap- pareutly looa. blowy material froni its iurking place in the staek or rîcK. Lt iras tiie firat time I had had a fork ini my bauds, and I was awkward Heir awkward I eo'uld be iriti a ferk 1 was yet te learn. It iras near ni». befere we wree tbrough o\u003eur chores, but aithoughit was the titird meal in eigiit bours even I had no compunetien about sit- ting dowm teo the supper that mas spread. Thtis ineal was something affer the fasion i xany Englisit homes, and its menu-a composite front many evenings, titis is-iuciud- ed tried potatoes, eggs, eold meat, or fisit. bread, biscuits, cake. nie. fruit !,Aiss littie li",
         "NOW FOR THE HIRED MAN ling a drop of water on the fluor-- but alas, the place looked like an un- swept granary with the oat-heads, chat! and thistledown I shed f rom sleeve and sock and shirt as I moyed my clothing! Then I remembered the carpet-sweeper of the morning, and gently induced that worthy in- atrument to perform for my benefit; for, apart altogether from motives of pleasing Mrs. Ontario, 1 knew 1 would have tu negutiate that bedroom fluor in my bare feet. I emerged for long enougli to bid the others good-night, and then dived into the in-viting sea of cool s3heets spread over a feather mattress. 1 suppose 1 must have laîn an hour and a haîf in a sort of trance. I knew 1 wus desperately sure and tired. I seemed to be on \u0026ire, front the roof of my head to my tocs, but 1 was too heavy tu even try for euse by tossing about. -Every inflamed mus- cie I had claînoured for recognition, but my brain seemed bent on noth- ing but sleep. Probably I did sleep; at any rate I suddenly heard tha elock strike twelve and became wide awake. Then 1 realized that the fever of my body had died down. 1 felt 1 was master of my muscles or was going to be; and 1 dozed. Next thing I knew there was a gray light ini the room and the dlock was striking five. Immediately I heard the voice of my master at Young To- ronto's door, saying, \"Young! Young! Are you awake ?\" lie had told me he would not caîl me before he need- ed me;- and it was six o'clock befure the summons came. And when it did come ît brought -'vith it one of the greatest triumphs of my career. Kuowing the custom among country people in America of flrst-nanung everyone un farina, I had told Mr. Ontario when 1 made my bargain that my name was Jerry. For the first haif-hour he had \"My man- ned\" me, whereat my soul wrîthed. For had flot 1 been for a decade or two a man set under authority, hav- ing tuider me those tu whom I could Say go, or come, or do this, and they would go or come and do-su long as the ghost walked regularlyl Su tu be haîled as \"My Man\" galled, but I didn't let it show, and it didn't lut long. After the flrst haif-hour my employer Jerried me and I waa well content; for while Jerry is not the n'ame of a good workman, it car- ries with it a certain flavour of coin- paxiionship, 1 was hailed this morn by rny employer-and ever afterwarda by him and aIl on the farm-as \"Mr. Frorntown 1\" I never was proud of that titie be- fore, but I swelled with satisfaction as 1 tumbled ont of bcd and answered, \"AIl righl 1 bad made good, and I was glad. I had notîced Young Toronto ad- dressed Mr. Ontario as \"Boss\", and was half tempted to follow his ex- ample; but as a youngster I had learned to \"Sir\" skippers and mates withont blistering my tongue, su it came easy to use that vocative when I wished tu vary froin \"Mr. Ontario\". Neighbours called hima \"Jîm\"; and Young Toronto called Miss Ontario \"Alice\". 1 stuck te \"Miss Ontario\", although 1 was old enoughi to have called ber daugliter. The reason for my indulgence mn the matter of sleep was that Mr. On- tario and two horses had to make a trip tu the train with the milk before the day's work iii the fields coin- mcnced, and hc and Young Toronto and the Dublin lass sufflced for the xnilking. 1 startled the last-named inember of the household, who wus presiding over the breakfast cere- munies, by asking for a dipperful of cold bard water and using it up in toothbrushing before plunging into the basin of sof t water she had ready for my murning ablutions on the verandah. (-We men always washed at this une spot, there being a wash- stand, basin, waterpail and towels kept there for the purpose; and the cistern punip was bard by, or, 1 should say, soft by, probably). Breakfast consisted of oatmeal por-",
         "THE CANADI\u0026N MAGAZINE ridge, wlth pleuty 'of cream and brown and white sugar; eggs as required, and bread, butter, biscuits and pre- served fruit or marmalade. Let it be understood that because I enum- erate thus faithfuily these mnenus, it docs not foilow that I exhausted theni ail. Aýs a matter of fact, I was neyer able to completely sample any one of thern; and 1 estAlished a reputation of being a «slim eater\" simply be- cause iu self protection I hadl to leave mny a tempting dish for' furtiier reference, Had I attempted to eat ail the. hospitable Ontarios urged me to try 1 would have been lu the city hospital or a country cemetery within a week. After breakfast I 'helped Young Toronto\u003e feed the stock and dlean the stables and eut 'wood for the kitchen until Mr. Ontario and hie horses re- turxied from the railway station. Soin. mornings it was half-paat seven and Borne inornings half-past eight before we got to, our field work; and Miss Ontario usually appeared an bour or so later, taking her father's place on the binder-seat. The. women of that household rose later than the meu-and worked later at inight. Mly second day's ehockiug left me as tired as the. first, for 1 worked three or four more heurs; but I had lees complaint frein fevered muscles when 1 ceased work, and 1 get to sleep readily and slept easily. But I had all my purgatory over again when MisaOntario had the last field «down\"-that le, the grain all eut- and we conimeneed te \"draw iu» from n e o! the fields where the bar- Iey had been dr\u003eiug ln shocks for a week or more. The manner o! «drawing-in» was on thie wise. Young Toronto was sta- tioned in the mow in the barn,to ar- range the sheaves-snd thia le as much an expert's job as window- dressing. The sheaves around the borders o! the. inw must b. arranged s ide by side, butts pointiug outwards, The inner rows are srranged in thie opposite !ashion, the ead out'wards and overlappîng their fellows to the extent of flhc band or binding. Young Toronto had 'Miss Ontario to, assiet hlm. She was also, ring-mistress for the good hors. Doil. The latter had to hoist the sheaves up into the inow. Mr. Ontario aud 1 sallied. forth for the sheaves themselves, ini an equip- age known as the \"rack\", drawn by Jack and Queen. The rack was a collection of four stout iron wheels, a great number of broken boatrds gathered into a general platter-shap- ed quadrilateral, an assortment of boîta, nails and scraps o! wire, and an utter absence of springs. Two wide frames known as \"cladders\"$ rose from eîther end o! the rack, to, hold the. sheaves iu. It Was a tooth-shak- ing carrnage when empty, but very coinfortable when loaded. Anmed with forks, Mr. Ontario and I drove do-wn the fanm lane to the. barley field and halted at the. firet shock. Then h.e spread the firet sling- nope, a double-ended affair fastened at the extremities to cither side of the ladder at the. back and stretched se that the. eye marking the middle o! it lay lu the. centre of the. rack. I had to, stand on the ground, spear the, sheaves with my f onk, and toss thein up to Mr. Ontario on the rack. H. caught tihein with hie fork %nd arranged themin tiers upon the sling- rope. It wae really a very simple operation, but unti yon have tried to handie twenty pounds o! banley Istraw on the end o! a six-foot fork you have no idea how cluimsy you eau be. The sheaf goca everywiiere except where you want it to go, and the. !ork whlih enters it as though grased stays lu it as thougli glued. Mlroer, the. fret sheaves have te b. lifted shoulder-higii, and the. next higiier, and so on; se that, ene the",
         "NOW FOR THE IIIRED MIAN from breathîng through my inouth and yearnîng for deliverance. There was a moinent's blessed respite as the rack was drîven and I walked from shock to shoek; and there were sev- erai such moments every time a fresh sling-rope had te be adjusted. We used four, two in the baek haif of the rack and two in the front, and each held three courses of sheaves. I hid heard terrible tales of the building, of sky-scraper loads, and was pleasantly disappointed when fromu his airy percli on top of the sixth course, M r. Ontario cailed down \"That'Il do. Give me your fork1!\" The load wasn't se, very higli-at the most ten feet above the ground. \"Cliînb up,\" said lie, and I climbed up the one-runged ladder at the back aind :Rung uxyseif panting on top cf the sheaves, grateful, ch, se grateful, for the fifteen-minute ride that lay between me and the barn ! When we got tiiere 1 had recovered rny wind and was able te take a les- son in unloading. Overhead, ini the barn, a metal carrier travelled on a traek under the ridge-pole. Fron the track depended a book and pul- iey and chain. The ends cf the ehain were hocked into the ends cf the sling- repe and heve tant with a dog-and- ratchet pull. Then Miss Ontario drove Dcli off at a smart pace, and, Doli's whiffietree being attached te the fal cf the hoisting tackle bock, pulley, chain and siing-Ioad seared towards the barn roof and ran aleng under the track te the required spot. A pull on a trip-repe released the whcle bun- die cf sheaves, and they feil in a leese pile upen their earlier gathered brethren in the mow. Here Young Toronto, with such assistance as every disengaged ferk could give, straiglit- ened then out, or in a teclinical phrase, \"mcwed tLem away\". Mow- ed, by the way, rhymes with ercwd, net crewed. This hoisting arrangement was f ar frein wcrking with the duil perfection of the description given. Once we lest a quarter cf a lead ou thec barn- floor and broke a sling-rope, through a bight of the latter catching on a corner cf the rack. Once we lifted the rack haif way off its axles thirough a sinxilar mîshap. Somnetirncs the trip-rope would foul and refuse. te, open the hook, and once ive parted the hoisting- tackle. That appcaredl te be the main trouble of tic farmiers in the neighbourhood; and as my em- ployer was the only man in the coun- tryside who, ceuid spice a rope-ex- cept înyseif-we usuaiiy heard of such mishIaps, very oftcu by tele- phone. Ilalf an heur later a buggy bearing a shame-faced neigbibour and a frayed rope would heave in sighit, and eperations weuld be temperariiy suspended. By noon I was very, very tired, and my hands were beginning to blister. I have always made a practice when doiug new manual exereises, cf miak- ing each liand learn te do the ether's work. It is net liard, when both hands are unskiiled, te change frein one te the other frequently, and it is a big help. I had doue this carefuily in my fork-handling, and se lied the strain well distributed; and anether thing Mr. Ontario teld me hleped save my skin. On has advice et neen I batlied my hands tlieroughly in, celd water £rom the barnyard pump and then rubbed thein with sait frein the barrel in the feed bin. it hurt a little, but the sweliug had ail disap- peared before I started wcrk in the afterueon. Nor did 1 liesitate, after dinner, te don my number two pair cf giev'es- housemaid's cetten fluger gear. Tliey were very loose and soft, and, coin- bined with the sait and water treat- meut, whicli I repeated several times, were the saivatien cf my hands. It was net that 1 minded blisters, but I knew that unless 1 kept my hands in wvýorlçing shape 1 would be cf ne use whatever te Mr. Ontario; and as Youing Toronto was tee light for pitehing, as my job was called, it was rather essential that 1 should stay lit.",
         "64 THE CANAI Pive o'clock lunch was a most wel- corne relief that atternoon. 1 did xDot eat much, but I. dipped three cups of eoffee out of the pail kept warm be- tween the sheaves; which is more cof- tee than' 1 had ever drunk at one sit- ting. 'Mr. Ontario had to take Young Toronto's place in the mow as the sheaves rose to the rafters and care- fui paicking was rcquired, so Young Toronto took his place on the wagon. As pitched the sheaves to him lie plcd thexu by hand instead of with a fork. This was slower, and there- fore eauier for me; and perhaps it was because of this that I teit my usinil rush o! extra steam i the last heur and a hait, aithougli we worked until it was s0 dark we could net sec the aheaves. 1 waa tired when 1 sat down te supper; so tired 1 could net eat, and I ceuld have drunk the ecean dry. But 1 munched something sud drank as mueli tes and as littie water as 1 eould, and crawled off te bed after as short an intervai as was de- cent. And the next day it rainedi Oh, blessed rai Mr. Ontario didnit see it i that liglit, but I ne.ver heard swecter mnusic than the drip o! the water from the caves that mnorning. 1 kept my muscles from relaxing with ail sorts ot chores, from diggig po- tatoes for dinuer to loadig coal at the rsilway siding three miles away, i preparation for our comng threshing; but it was an off-day, and I had time te re-read halft1rough the First llundred Thousand, whieh Miss Ontario lent me. After the rain was ever we spent haif a day turning the shocks te lias- ten the drying precess, befere reaum- ing drawing-in. «We worked liard that day, and the 'next, and the xiext, and se on. But my muscles were Dow in tune and my hauds tough, and I AN MAGAZINE couid pitch as long as the horsesl wouid stand up i the harness. I found farni work a great deal harder on the muscles than city toil, but-perlis because I had no re- sponsibiity-much eser on the head. At any rate, ne matter how Wearily we went to bed, we always got up re- freslied in the mernig. The draw- back te farm work as a permanent occupation was that it onlYlctt a man time to est and slcep. I was frankly sorry when my en- gagement wý%as up. So were Mr. On- tario and the Ontario f amily. They ail said so. 1 bestowed xny harveat mitts on Young Toronto, and my housenisid's gloves on the Duiblînette. They cost fifteen cents, and wearing them had saved fifteen blisters and aise my fifteen-doliar wrist watcli. 1 found the latter in the sleeve of one o! the gieves one evening 'when I went toeclimb up on the last load. I hsd brokeni the strap, unknowingly, out i the filids, but the eheap bit o! cotton had cauglit the littie timepiece snd lield it, Mr. Ontario thanked me for coming out and paid niy wages i full and aaid lie hoped lie would get as goed a man f rom the bureau i xy place; sud in the sweet seren- ity o! a Sunday inerning Miss On- tario, pretty as a cover design i lier voile shirt and sports coat, drove me te the station. A buxeni dame, who aoted as post-zuistress snd station Rgent-for we were still i No Man's Land-gave me my ticket and col- lectedi the silver with one band while she fluttered a green sud white flsg wlth the ether. The train was-alaa -exaetly on time. 1 waved adieu te Miss Ontario, and an hour later was finding the concreâe o! the eîty aide- walks strangely unsympathetic te- wards the plodding feet of the ex- hired man.",
         "ENJGL#ND IN AR0S ,,53yCnJçg4I1W VII.-THE FOOD PROBLEM 0 date the problem faced ini the £eeding of the people of the British Isles is flot that of food shortage, but of food distribution. To the foreigner that assertion xnay seem te, deprive the situation of most of its seriousness; to us who live through it and watch its development there- in lies more menace than in the ex- pressedl hopes of the Kaiser. British îngenuity may be depended upon more confidently to »overcome the enemy than to alter internai affaire in order to cope with unusual condi- tions. Nothing is so powerful against the Englishman as his habits and systein. No one in the British Isles has feit the pinch of hunger. And it is not likely that anyone will. What suifer- ing there has been arises from the temporary shortage of unessentials and from high prices. Sugar and potatoes suin up the total of national deprivations owing to the war, and neyer did they approach privations because there bau a.lways been some- thing te take their places. Befere there is actual wanit the British 'will have solved the submarine. But after three years ef a situation that has continually pointed to food as one ot the vital factors ini the winning ef vietory they are only new nearing the solution of a situation with whieb the enemy has nothing to do--which 65 is, indeed, indigenens to the Britishi race, but more particularly to that section of it residing in England and Scotland. The problem of distribution is two- fold. The limitation of supplies- rather the necessity ef conserving for an uncertain future-demanda an equality of distribution that ignored individuals and elass. The second difficulty is the British character- an independence which resents con- trol and dictation. 0f the two the latter was the more immediately dan- gerous at the beginning of the con- servation niovement. But cemmon sense is asserting itself, s0 that equal- ity of distribution now occupies the time of the Food Controller. When he found temperance in eating to be se necessary as te justify Govern- ment action, the Englishman yield- ed to a pressure whicli he naturally resists. But having yielded, he was forced te set te work on the national system of class favouritism-as, in- deed, hie has been forced te do in every problein connected with the war. It was Britain's unquestioned comn- mand ef the seas that delayed food measures which were reasonable frein the very first gun. That inbredand time-honoured confidence i victery laid a heavy hand on reasenable pro- vision sud prevision i every set of war. In the matter of food arbitrary measures did net seem to be neces-",
         "THE CANADL asary early in the. struggle. Depeud- ing cutircly, as it did, on the control o! the seas, Great B3ritain was justi- fied lu hier confidence, a confidence that would( nover bave been shaken iiad flhc Germans adhcred to the ruies o! ýwar!arc. One mieaisure only was taken early i the war te protect the food supply of the Britishi T9lcs, an obvious oe lmmediaitcly dcmandcd by the fact that thiey had becu procurlng more than sixty per cent. o! their sugar fromn Germany. A Sugar Commis- sion waq appointed. Thcrca!ter, for more than two years, even -wheu the casual onlooker was viewing flic situa- tion with alqrm and the Asquith Gev- erument itseif was talking mucli o! plans in flic Bouse, nothing furtiier was douc. -Always in tihe mid o! the people was the. thought that the. enemy could not drive Great Britai te defensive measures that would re- fleet upon its specisi aphere of power; and in the mind of the Government was the. hope that political balances need net b. distrarbed by restrictive action certain te b. resented in some quarters. For it must not b. lmag- ied that party aima and hopes dis- appearcd with the. formation o! a Coalition Cabinet. Tii. second officiai move o! import- ance was made in Octeber, 1916, when a Wheat Commissien 'undcrtook te readjiust the. grain situation. Unfor- tunately it wss weighted down with the Asquith love o! laisser-faire, and its duties neyer materialized jute ef- fective action. At a. time when the. enemy was openly sinking merchant vessels aud tiireateuing more, when the demanda o! miiitary operations and national supply were se defleet- ing shippiug from the. ordinary\u003e chan- nels of f ood transportation that re- serves of grain in the British Isles wcrc being serions!\u003e' depleted, ne action was taken tewards replenlali- ing these supplies !rom a world's pro- duction that was above the. normal. Ainerica and AustraliS. were offering the. grain, but Englal3d was lot *111- kN MAGAZINE ing to distunb the, trend of affairs in order to, facilitate the acceptance of the offers. The press of England was becom- ing alive to, the menace, and the Eng- liali press lias a voice more powerful than that of its brother across the. ocean. The people were growing aniious. The difficulty of securing sugar was impressing even the. thoughlcs with the need for action. Mr. Asquith was forced to promise operationis which were loathsome, to him, not alone for their antagouism te his policy, but for the danger he well saw would arise thcrefrom te bis personal popularity. H1e an- nounced the establishiment of a new department iicaded by a Food Con- troller. It promised wedll But the. Food Controfler was neyer appoint- ed. Weck after -wcek thec country waited. Mr. Asquith was at bis best In his promises of what that import- ant officiai would doihis explana- tions of the delay. He was at his most iiatural i his inability te corne to the point o! action. It was the accumulation o! su\u003c% dilatory acts as these that brought about bis downfall. Just three daym before an anxious Cabinet, baced hy a roused people, demanded bis resig- nation, Mr. Runeiman, one of bis Ministers, placed before the country oue Ione food mesre that even then Iooked like a smail inouse for the momntain to bring forth. Restric- tions were plaeed on restaurant fare -or rather attempted restrictions. Luncheon was te b. a two-course meai",
         "ENGLAND IN ARMS troller, Lord Devonport, a man whose intimate connection with food supply as the head of a large multiple store company seemed to qualify him for the position. It was a disappointment to the country and to the Premier himself that the seeming, qualifica- tions for the Controller's office shnuld in the end prove the insuperable obstacle to. his effectivenesa. Lord Devonport introduced many ineasures Ifltený(ed to cope with a situation passing rapxdly into a seiîons stage, but a eamsurvey of themn diseovers them, to he, after ail, paltry, a mere touching of the surface. Lord Devonport took pleasure in vetoing2 the Runeiman restaurant or- der fouir months after it hadl been put inito effeet, and almost the samne tîie aFter its folly had becomre evi- dent. The limited course meal brouglit only one result, that diners ate more solid me-at, and less of the odds and ernds,, thie entrees and unessentials and maike-overs, that give the dainti- est toucli to restaurant f are without affecting food stocks. Men formerly content xith a smail helping of meat in thie interests of the decorative couirse, demanded meat and bread and cheese, the basis of subsistence. The new Food Controller, too, wau :foreed to deal with bread, tea, con- fectiovery, potatoes and othier vege- tables, and sugar. Rlis suibstitute for the Runciman restauiranrt control was a ineatle-ss day and a limnitation of thec amounts of meait, breadi and sugar served at each meal. This was later altered heeause of its drain on bread in order to take the place of meat on the meatless day. Rread hc attempted to regfflate by prohibiting itsý sale until twelve hours after b-aking, and by limniting its s'hape, weight and constituents. The adulteraition of flour by maize or rice, aud the prohibition of the waste that produces white flour, resulted in what is knowu as war bread. It was an effective measure, despite the con- tinued opposition of the people. Tea -onsidered in England almost as great a food necessity as bread-was regulated in its eheaper quaitýies. A eurb was put on the uise oif sigar i confectionery, pastry andl ]ng n the early part of 1917 potaitoes wvere passing so rapidly into the,, list of Shortages that price limiitaliion- wus uecesary.Three cents a pomfnd for old stock was established forj thie eajrly monthis, risinig later a haîf-cent.ý Buit no mueasures eold( iincrease theo sup- ply, and no attemipt was, niiadeo to pr-e- vent the farmners hioldinig thewtoks eor higlier prices, Foýr motsit mnight bie said there w4ere rio potatoes in Bnigland. And wýith thie fallure of poftaes the vegetable Substitiltes ald- vanced uintil the Food Coroller was foreed to limnit the price of soie of themn. Wh«']ere, Lord Devoniport fai1led was in his reluetance to take a fir staind, to, enforce the law, and priwneipally to curtail the profits of thie trader. Hie attempted to suive the pr-oblema by appeal. A chart of patriotii pro- portions in the da9ily, diet was flung at the public ini a thousandl way' s, l'le fences were covered with it, the newvs- papers gave it daily space, lecýtuirers flooded the country, aud, at a timne when the shortage of paper was seri- ous, the workingmeu's psyV envelopes wee, crammed with a literature lie neyer read. To the. eredit of the couin- try the consuiption of breaid and meat miaterially resd ltnt the two insuperable obstacles to succeess were the inability of ninety per ieent. of the people to purchase the ad1vised ration of sugar aud the cage,-(ricas. of some to seize the opportunityv for gorging. Whule there were miillions willing to cunb their appetites thiere were flannting thousands of pro-Ger- man symnpathies or uffer cairelessuess whose deliglit it was to evade the ap- peal aud the laws. And at thie very timne whenl the people were beggcd to stint thiemselves interned and impri- soued Germans were allowed many tiines the. ration; sugar and potatoes were being commandeered for them when the workers of the~ country had",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE te go without. The iconsisteucies of the situation were intolerable, and the effectiveness of the appeal diminished weekly. In the matter o! enforciug the law there was singular laxnesa. Here and there a dealer was fined, althougl it was impossible te go on the streets without seeig plaily advertised i- fractions of the food laws. And the fine was usually but a sunaîl part of the profit made from the illicit, trans- action. Indeed, there was apparent, ln store and home and restaurant, a merry revelry of law evasion that un- did the patriotismn of those who hon- estly rationed theunselves. Profiteering went on without re- striction. Lord Devonport, head o! a big grocery concern, persisted ln refusig to limit the profits of gro- cors save in a few glaring and insig- niant cases. Swedes, for instance, the substititte for potatoce, were limnit- ed i price to three cents a pound, a price so many times what the farmer and greengrcer luad been receivung that neither eould comuplain. The set- ing of prices for potatoce and beans was uch advertised but uuimport- ant, for both disappeared frorn the market almost immediately. Aithougli the eoat of bread to miller and baker was xnaterially decesd by the new laws, the price advanced instantly to the consumer two to four eent,3 a four- ment to be sold over the counter for thirty-two cents, but it neyer appear- ed on the shelves of more than a very few stores. With meat no attempt was made to interfere untid the last days of Lord Devonport's office, and then only the speculator was eliminated, the re- tailer being perxuitted to ask what lie pleased. 0f the retaiers the butcher was the most heartless profiteer, the consumer being asked sixty to one hundred and fifty per cent. profit over the wholesale prices. Even the sup- plies controlled by the Government, sucli as New Zenland mutton, were turned loose upon arrivai ini England for the Nwholesaler and retailer to make what profit he wished. Laid down in London by, the Goverument at thirteen cents, it reached the pub- lic at thirty-six to sixty cents. The buteher could not buy it without a large purehase of English mutton at extravagant prices. And in the mean- time, in order. to maintain the level of prices, tons of uneat were left to rot on thxe docks, * There le no better example of the injudicious snd unf air distribution of supplies than sugar, the conimodity that lias induced several crises al- ready. To the people the only result of the Sugar Commission was an im- inediate ruse in price. Against this there lias been constant complaint, for it le known timat the rise repre- sented taxation and Goverument pro- eared fi poorer ýcember ýets froi",
         "ENGLAND IN ARMS the Sugar Commission released to the wholesalers their shares of the avail- able supplies, and washed their hande of any further connection with the commodity. Theoretically the whole- saler was supposed to pase on to the groeer his share, but that he had favourites is proved by the faet that some of the large West End stores seemed neyer to be without sugar, whule the small grocer of the East End was denied a pound. It must be remembered that every pound of sugar shipped to England was Gov- ernment-controlled. No con trol what- ever was exercised over the retailer save in the matter of price, and the shortage of the available supplies en- abled hum to inake sugar the basis of his trade. Hie sold to, whom lie pleas- cd in the quantities lie pleased. lUs independence became impudence, A customer was always a beggar, for lie was entirely at the mrney of hia gro- cer. Sugar was denied those who could not; afford to inake their pur-. chases extravagant. Some systema seemed to arrive with the demand for a purchase of fifty cents' wortli of other goods witli each half-pound or pound 'of sugar, and this was ateeept- cd by the authorities as a wise pro- vision against wasteful purchases of the limitedl eommodity. It was the strength of elass ini England that for many monthe prevented the authori- tics from realizing that sueh a stipui- lation reserved sugar for the ridli who eould afford to buy supplies they did not need in order to obtain the sugar they did. It was only when the mer- chants began to extend the sane de- mand Wo the purdhase of other food- stuffs tliat the Governinent forbade any conditions witli the sale of sugar. But the grocer was stili left to seil to whom lie pleased. No improvement whatever resulted, sinee the grocer simply rcfused to seil until another large order was given. The cry of the poor-the long, hope- lees queues, the untrained cooks help- lem to provide for their large families vithout that wbieh had made up sucb a large part of their food-wus pîti- ful. And all the time the 'West End shops were selling it in fifty-pound lots or less. The Government's loose effort to enable fruit-growers to pre- serve their fruit was equally unfair. The growers sent in their require- mente, and the sugar %au released to, the grocer inentioned in the requisi- tion, but without any control over the% amount he passed on to the growver. 0f four friends, no two received the same proportion of that which they had asked for, the amount varying from fifty to nirety per cent. No one knows what the grocer should have given out, The latest measure ini the handling of sugar, Wo come into force ini Oetober, is a form of card supply, but still there is no safeguardl that the grocer will seil to lis customnere their individual shaires of the avail- able supplies. The clamorous proteet arising wais more than thrcatening. Lord Devon- port accpted the inevitable and re- signcd. Lord Rhondda assumed the thankîcesg job. It is typical of Eng- Ilali publie if e that only a titled mani is considered competent to undertake public work. The war lias introduced a Geddes or two; others will have to foflow. ?artieularly unfortunate in the inatter of controlling resources je this habit, since these wealthy titled men are eo closely concerned in a financial way with the industries and commerce of the country that unpre- judiced outlook is nîgh Wo impossible. Lord Rhondda had made good ln hie first Goverriment office and in private lîfe, and initiative was not lacking. luis mis.fortune was that lie was ap- pointed at a time when publie im- patience would not brook delay. With- out time to study the situation sud devise methods hie was driven to in- stant action. The result was a hun- dred more or lesa vague promises that aeemed Wo fit i with the demande of the people, and one act only of the inimediate future. Proflteering was the bête noire of the people, and oni profiteering he came ont strong-in",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE, word. Thus f ar there la only the promise that profiteering will be pun- ished by imprisoninent. Speculation la to be stopped, how is not apparent. Lord Devonport had alreadly issued orders te that effeet in the case of mnt without affecting inueb the prîce to the consumer. The only definite act which -would tend to, soothe the people was an obvions expedient. Tt deailt with the commodity most fa- miliar to the table-hread. Breadl was ordered te be sold-sonie time in the future-at elghteen cents a quarteru boaf. Realizing that the Britiash Iles mlght bc called upon to depend upon their own resources, lie tuirned to the fariner. Land was tilled that lad nevwer been broken for centuries, and the farmer became a real producer. If he didn't, there was a 1law to take his land frein Jin 'tenpoarilv. Ploughing was done hy trac(tor, niglit and day and Sundays- The added crop acreage wpa expected to ainount te millions, but lack of tractors and lelp and qui*k co-operation redueed the anieunt to less than iialf a million acres. Next year the millions are promiscd. Allotments sprang up everywhvere-vacant lots, golf links, railwayv tracks, parka. London alone la producing eight hundred extra acres of vegetables. The additional growth lias redueed the price of po- tatoes for the moment to leas than it waq hefore the war; and the absence of m-arket organization ia leaving tons te rot. England was driv en te act before ah.c eould complete the organ- ization necessary to reap the greatest reward. The solution deoes not yet appear. If the saubinarle continues even its present success, and the. measures of the future do not inprove suibata'- tlally on those of the. paat, the. British Ilka will feel want. Private profits, private shlpping, block ail the Gev- ernment can do. The controlling in- fluences of supply and demnand, arc non-existent in turne of war. With Governinent interference they lost al- inost al] theîr power, in ail justice. To continue that power is to exploit the Government of the people at the. cost of the people. To-day thie old tenet of the economist mens nothing more, in the case of importations, than to ask the people, at their nwn ex- pense, to make trade possible by lin- port reguilations and transporta-tion protection, and then te expect them to pay the trader according to the. volume and expeuse of that protec- tion. And locally-grown products are directly dependent for price, especial- ly in England, onl the available stocks from without. The stopping of proflteeri-ng la a pleasant ambition, to talk about but an over-lofty one te anticipate. Pro- fiteering doea not end with the grocer and butcher, the wholesaler and ship- per. It lias entered into every phase of home 11f e. Onily the man in khakd, who assumes al the rîsk of war, la preeluded frein it. The. workingxnan, the elerk, the farmer, the thousands of Government officials who have risen witii the war-even the Govern- ment itself-are proflting froiri the war. But the burden la uneven. The. workingman of England can preseut a good defence in terms of compara- tive wage scale, but ln ternis of total reveipt-wliceh ia the basis of his liw- ing-he niight be cailed a proiteer. JuTs five pence an hour of pre-war days may have inereased only sisxty per cent., while living haa advanced The next article of this serias will discs the elaborate plansi land for the cons.erva.tion of materials.",
         "BY EDITH G. BAYNE ARWELL stood, for a moment on the threshold of the reception-room, looking about him. ie glance was one of per- spicaeity. For had lie not made it a mile neyer to cultivate the society of duli women. They bored him. They might be ever so charm- ing physically, but when their iîps dropped commonplaces lie Rled their presence as one pursued by some un- known horror. 11e had lived long enougli to understand the peculiar truth of the philosophy embodied in the old saw about beauty and its mnere cutaneous depth. Thirty-two years of life and the attaînment of at least the groundwork of bis ambition had brouglit him wisdom of various kinds; but even as a neophyte in the study of the other sex lie had always leaned rather to plainness of face allied with a brilliant mind as against superficial beauty and triteness. Incidentally lihe passed over al women under twenty-flve as being ont of the running, as far as his partieu- lar requirements were eoneerned. R1e h ad not yet met him Madame de Stael, but-there was always hope. Hlis discernîng and sornewhat cold eye nfyw passed rapidly ovIer the throng. It was a large assembly and there were many strangers present. After nodding to several acquaint- auces lie wanderedî off in the genera.l direction of the library. Near the door of a smali writing-room where the orchestra was stationed lie paused. 5- Wilmot lie Page stood there in lively conversation with a pretty doil iu shieil pink. Harwell was, obliged to odle rather closely to them in pass- ing, but Le Pageo did not notic lis friend other than by a brief nod. There-was suffieient of the gallantry of old GanT in Wihnot, to inake hlm any woman's kniglit, but lie possees- ed always a particular faeuilty for discovering the prettiest of the sex. FLarwell smiled sardonically, stifled a yawn, and withi hands behind his back tooli up his stand a few feet away and watdfor chance to seud him a mnan -with whom lie miglit eeafpe to the smoking-room. \"Thiere stands old Harwell,» said a deep. taunting voice in his rear, «hike Wisdom on the heiglits, disdaining as usual, the soft chattering of the apes, faîling utt;rIy, as always, to appre- ciate the charm of beauity, waiting only for the thrnist of repartee, the flash of an epigram. Wake up, old man, and corne siong to the conserva- tory. 1 waut to show you-»2 flarwell had wheeled to flnd hie friend Atwood by hie elbow. -«What do you want to show me, l3illy ?\" lie demanded. \"Tm feeling rather more bored than usual to-niglit. lard day atthe office, and I'm a real number one saniple of thc tîred 'busi- ness main. Sn don't introduee me to anything that giggles and ays 'per- feetly lovely, y' know', or 'Il-l'II make traeks for home if I have to escape by way of the coal-chuite 1» \"I admire your self-abuegation in",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE putting in an appearance at ali Can't yen get rid of that obsession of yours and make yourself agreeable, for once, to the dear ladies? IFow- cirer, it ia merely a flowering shrub 1 wish you te meet. It's an exotie bloom that Denwood brought from the tropies. fias the mnot wonderful farwell relaxed iute a smile, for planits were Billy Atwood's 'obses- sieni', and, Ro, with the free masonry of hobby-riders, like drew te like, aud tegether they sought out the cool green retreat. CeWho la that gentleman te whom, yen nodded just now?'\u003e asked Miss NelI flenderson of Wilmot Le Page. -Whieh oee ,\u003e ,'The tall, dark one, with'the tired look on his face,\u003e she replied, lean- ing forward slightly te watch the slowly retreating form in irreproacli- able evening attire, which had -at- tracted her attention fromn the faet of its having towered over inost of the others. '\u003cSee. That one. fie looks She was about te add «different\", but lie Page new turned reluctantly fromr gazing iute the bine poils which were her eyes, and followed tier glanee. \"Oh, that hiap t fia name is fIar-e wvell-John Harwell. Lawyer. Clever fellow, yen know, and air that. As I was saying-\" CeJohn Flarwell? Why, I believe 1'ire heard cf hlm! fie's immeinsely clever, isn't be?\" \"fie hau certainly buillt up a won- derful reputatien. But, unfortun- fitely, he's a most unsociable man- sort of misogamist, yen know. Well -perhags nût that exactly, either. 1 believe the dance programme la about te begin. May I have-\u003e \"ýOh, buit tell me what yen mean. la be a-dees he hate women reallyj? Hie musf be horrid !\" \"fie won't look at a woma-n under th e 'dead-line', as hc cails it, whieh la twenty-five, and lie wou't look at any -woman who cau't lay somne claim to being a bas-bleu. It's a craze of lis. 1 believe he had a clever nmother, and therefore he demands-bnt, please, are yen engaged for the first dancet\" \"No. Let us sit it ont, shall we t Or ne, let ns walk about instead. I'm beginning te feel stnpefled in this air. It's stifling.\" \"Ah, 1 know where we shail go. Te the conservatory, mademoiselle! The re, tee, it will be cemparatively quiet-nothing te, be heard but the cool hissing cf the fonntain.\" \"Dear me! Men are qneer crea- tures,\" ebserved Miss fienderson, thonghtfülly, as, having weven tbeir way in and eut among the gueats, she and Le Page found themselves at last beside a trellîs cf roses just within the eonservatory doors. \"I hope,\" said Le Page, \"that I am net included in that se sweeping--2 \"Oh, you! I wasn't thinking cf yen. It-it was that qneer yonng man we were speaking about. lie- he anys me. I neyer heard cf a man desiring bramas before-befoe beanty. fie must be au anemanly.\u003e \"Neyer mmîd, mademoiselle. There are enougli of us left who-are ap- preciative c And Le Page, shrngging, broke off ,awkwardly. Even his ga2lantry and fineàse were unequal te the task of putting înto cold words a tone-poon\u003e made up of bronze hair with littie glinting red liglts--hair that was piled high upon a smail head; o f a rose-leaf cheek, where a dimple danced; of eyes that had a way of changing in a flash froma serions thoughtfulness te merrimeut. \"Mr. Le Page, 1 want to ask a faveur of yen,» said IMiss fienderson fiurriedly. \"Please don't refuse. 1I \"Ask of m~e anything-auything!' and the squire of dames pressed a hain te his heart. \"Sh! 1 hear voices. WVýait.» After a moment, the sunds ceas- ing, she weut on: «It la ouly that I'd like if yen euld contrive te introduce Mr farwell te Ymn .»",
         "THRE BLUESTOCKING Le Page's face fell perceptibly. \"Oh, is that ail! Believe me, you wouldn't enjoy his soeiety.\" \"But 1 want to-to have some fun at his expense. Hie sounds unusual. \"As you like, mademoiselle. When 1\" \"Let me see,\" and she consulted her dance card. \"Il have the fourth dance free, for, like the first, it is one 1 don't know very well. Bring hia then.\" At the appointed time, and by dint of a4roit management, Le Page con- ducted the now frankly weary Ilar- well to Miss Henderson's side. The grave Young lawyer swept a casuaI glance over the girl, and, bow- ing, murmured a conventional and haif -absent greeting. She returned it in kind and went one better by manufacturing a yawn whieh she made littie effort to coneeal. \"Uinfortunately 1- do not dance,\" he began politely, \"or 1 might do my- self the honour of-\" \"Oh, don't apologize. I'm tired of dancing. After al. what is it but a giddy, senseless whirl? 1 rather re- gret having wasted an evening like this when I miglit have remained at home witli my Schopenhauer.\" llarwell started. \"Witli your what ?\" he asked, withi a glance of curiosity. \"My Schopenhauer,\" and Miss Henderson became suddenly interest- ed in something aeross the room. \"Oh !\" and Iiarwell smiled ont- right. \"I-at first 1 thought it miglit lie a pet dog.\" lie looked with some slight degree of interest at lier, noting in a haif- conscioua, way the rieli tints of lier liair, the curve of lier cecek, the sha- dow of lier lashes, and the red lips, faintly supereilîous. Il've neyer read him,\"- lie admitted candid1Y. \"Few Young men -ave the mental calibre to enjoy him,\" she said. \"lIt takes a mani of experience and know- ledgoe of the world-also an unpre- judieed mind, 1 mîglit gay., She yawned again, hlf openly, as before., \"You evidently have suffragist- perliaps Soeialist-leanings.\" \"Leanîngsl\" There was a world of meaning in the way she repeated the word'after hua. Hie seemed amused-aiid in- wardly she was raging. \"You-e r-are a prof essional wo- mant\" he queried. \"Ail women hiave a profession nowadays,\" she answered. \"I asked in a spirit of doulit. You -pardon me-do not look the type.\" \"I perceive that you have littie knowledge of women. But ]et us not fiownder into a wordy dîicusîin. 1 ara not in the humour for argument. I have heen working ail week on a paper for our Forward Clubi, aind uiy brain is weary. 1 came to thiis affair to relax. But, reaily, thiese gyathier- ings-crushes, 1 shouild say e.vený-, in war's cause, are a bit of a bore, aren't they? But T needn't ask you, for I daresay you've enjoyed yourself im- mensely.\" \"On the eontrary-that is, until this moment.\" Miss Henderson lowered lier eyes to bide the gleam of exultation that she knew miust have leapt to thiem. How many girls of John llarwell's acquaintance could boast of stha compliment from lis peinurious lips? She took no appairent notice of bis. remark, but sighied and twirled lier fan.* \"So you do lectures,\" let saidl sober- ly. \"What is the suibjeet of your paper for the Forward Club t\" \"I'm afraid it wýouildn't interest you.I\" \"But it miglit, you ko. \"It is 'The Evolution of thie Cosmios in Relation to the Progress of the Unit'.\" llarwell was a full minute in get- ting it. Then lie whistled softly. \"Are yon free for the next dance spacet\" he asked. \"I'm sorry. My programme is fill- ed to the end.\"",
         "THE CANADIi \"Hrow about supper, then 1\" Miss Henderson hesitated, a bit de- murely. \"lThere was a young inan who brouglit me. 1 believe it is under- stood that I go in to supper with \"Coiildn't you put hi off?\" M1iss Henderson thouglit she miglit try. So Harwell took lier in to snp- per, not deignîng to notice the glare frqm a pair of eyes belonging to a good-looking, fair youth who was obliged to take in. a lady with 'an car- trumpet. Harwell began to enjoy huiseif. Here lie wafor the flrst time in lis 11f e, talking to, a beautiful woman who had also brains, a quîek wit, and the most charming originality. And she seemed but a chit of a girl! t er humour was spontaneous and never barbed. She stood out from ail the other women of hà acquaintance like a diamond in a duatheap.' Harwel began to revise soie of has pet theories. They spoke of philosophy, of poetry, of religion, of polities, and then of literature. «By Jove! You're positively re- freshuigt b»li broke out at one point, after she baad remarked that many people carried their religion like a dead body-by the head anxd heels, witli the middle sagging. The talk baving got arould te fic- tion heroines, Miss Henderson proved herself to lec an impartial critie. Shp, 1ashied and praised witli equal justice both Engilli and American authors. \"Ulow annoying to open an other- wisèî clarming book,\" lie said, \"and flnd tIe heroine a raw misa of sevon- teen or eigîteen! And to find lier en- dowed with ail the grace and know- ledge and wit o! a woman of thirty 1\" \"As Byron says, they 'smel o! bread and butter'.» Hlarwell inter- jected. \"A book 1 read only thia week had aucli a heroine. She had the repartee of a Pinero, the passion o! a Cico- patra, aud the bard sense of a husi- RN MAGAZINE ness ýnan. I fiung her across the room-the book, I mean, thougli 1 wisli it cotild have been the girl!»' \"Cheer up, though. Authors in general are raising the age. It is twenty-six at present, I believe.\" 4I would write a novel myseif,» said Miss Flenderson, hlf vindietive- ly, «only I don't want to crowd the mourners.\"j IIarwell shot a swîf t glance at lier. But she looked quite serions. \"il admit that Amelia Sedley for one made me wish to tear .ry liair and beat my brest,\" lie said. «Also those two dear chîidren of fifteen and qixteen in 'The Virginians'. Tell you wliat! Iiets do a novel togethtr. Yeu shall build the plot and dress np the charaeters, and I shall work in the bits of dry phlosophy. Do you follow met1\" 1 I'm ahead -of yon. Ne publisher would-\" \"Tut-tut! 1 thouglit you were an optimist! I can almost sc written on your shield, Veni vidi vicie\" \"You are afllieted witli mental my- opia, then. Wliat you, sec is Farilis descensits averno. I am au out-and- ont Boliemian, and I say wliat I think always. It must be my liair, I sup- pose. My brother says I'm a very temaperamental person, and lie pities the man-\"2 She broke off witli a charming blush, and passed the salted alinonds te lier other neiglibour. \"I envyj the man,\"' Harwell liasten- ed to say. \"I should say you wpuld be an ideal life partner for a peppery fellow-say a grtimpy lawyer, now- you are so taeffalan- \"Don't. 'We mustn't lock horns se early in our acquaintance. \"I' not taetf ni. And I'ni not a eacifist, if that is what you were about to say. I'nx afraid the poor peppery partner would be up against il. Hie never would be able to hit out and get away with it, for 1 would be riglit there witli the return walp.\"* IJarwell laughed, A number of people glaned wondleringly at him,",
         "THE BLUESTOCKING remarking lis very evident enjoy- ment and bis most unusual anima- tion. 111 should like to see you home,\" he said, as tliey rose from the table. \"'You can't. P'm provided for ini that respect.\" \"May I call to sc you, soon, then ?\" \"Ima very busy person.... Weil, next week ?\" His face fell. She reiented. \"Wednesday evening, then, if you like.\" That was but the begînning. That Wednesday was oniy the first of inany Wednesdays, and after a time Sunday evening was added. Miss Henderson's home ivas almost as charming as herseif. Thcy in- variably occupicd the cosy library, and Harwell, wlio lived in a board- ing-house, found it exceedingly rest- fui to lean back in a deep-cusbioued chair opposite Miss Neil (wlio usually liad a bit of needlework), discussing books and many other things, while lie watched the play of the fireliglit on her hair. She generally dlid the listening now. llarwell's tbraldom was compiete. He had begun to feel as thougli lie had known her ail bis life. \u003eShe satis- fied every fastidjlous requirement of lis ultra-fastidious, nature, and occa- sioually he would endeavour, baiting- ly, to put this thouglit into con crete form, but always the girl would change tlie subjeet abruptly. Upon one matter ske had remained reticent. That was lier work. Harwell often wondered, with chagrin, if coneîv- ably she stiil feit that lie waa incap- able of understanding. That she was exeessîvely busy he could not doubt, for sbç was paipabiy weary upon mnore than one evenmng, thus compeil- ing him, very reluctantly, to make an early departure. A change liad corne over the girl. - When unobservedl she wore a troubied look. Her friendship with the young lawyer was taking a trend that began to lead ber into hitherto untried ter- ritory. They seldom'spoke of phil- osophy, or merely abstract matters now, but revelled in personalities, ini mutual tastes and desires. There were, too, many long silences between them, silences that neither cared to break. Harwell, who, in bis prof essional capacity liad been retained upon a Governmcnt commission, had been chafing for montbs over the delay whicli had prevented him from going overseas witli bis battalion. But on an evening ini May when the two were returning to the girl's home after a military concert he broke the newa to ber of his impending departure. '\u003cSo I will not go in to-night,\" lie added. \"Because I have packing to attend to and many letters to write. I leave early Friday morning for Quebee.\" Visîbly in the clear spring star-' liglit she had paled. After a pause lie went on: \"'But I want to sce you to-morrow -partcularly. 1 can't wait until evening. 1 have something to say to you that-\"-ý He broke off. The girl was a long time finding ber voice Perbaps she had feit unable to risk it. \"How soon in the day? I-I arn busy ail morning and ail afternoou.\" \"Isn't there aluillsomewliere? How about noon VI \"Say eleven-thirty, then,\" ahe said, after a moment. Promptly on the minute Harwell, in bis officcr's uniform, was admitted to the drawing-room of the girils home. Re feit a trifie iii at ease, and would have preferred the library, their common nieeting-ground. In less than live minutes alie camle in, somewbat; lesitatingly. Harwell rose. is lips openedi to emit an exclamation, but closed again, and witli surprised eyes lie only gazed. She worc a large overail apron ocf crisp bine percale, and ber sleeves were rolled to the elbows. A cap of the same niaterial covered aIl but a few tendrils of lier glorlous hair. There were traces of flour about her,",
         "76 THEJ CANAD and lier cheeks w ere unduly fiushed, as of onie who bas been bending over a hot ceeoksteve. If was tlie first time that lie had sen hier in anything but the meet expensive and fashienable attire. \"T kniow J look a fright,\" she be- gani, \"buit you will have te excuse \"'it isni't that\"'hle put in quickly. \"Ras ene of the maids suddenly left V\" \"Net at ail. J-I suppose you ex- pected me te, corne inte, your presence witli ink-stained flngers and a look of mental detachmnent. Now didn't JIe mnade ne reply, but the warmtli iii bis oes brought a deeper flush to hier iilready pink countenance. «What-did you wish te sec me abouit?\" ' Hlarwell cleared his throat. \"J vamne te ask yen if you would marry Vmer,\" hie said. Shei skink into a chair. \"I-I1a', she said in a smnall voice. Harwvell was, ant unemeotional maxi, but hie grew a littie white. \"Why net?\" hie asked. \"You- miust have kniown tliis was coming. I want te marry you this afternoen.\" \"\u003cI can't,\"' slie repeated. \"I can't ever. Den't look like that! I didn't know wlien I began this how-hew it %vould end. It was ail a bit of fun. 1 didn't mean te-\" \"I don't know what you are talk- intg abeut- \"Ohb, buit-can't yeu see-can't yen undel(,rstànd? J'm a-an impost- or. inm net wliat youi think-\"2 Ilarwell, plainly puizzled, Stood looking clown upon ber as alie sat, the picture of confusion and despair, clasping and unelasping lier sinail floured banda and looking up at him witli big, \u003churt, contrite eyes. \"Jl couldn't tell yen-J tried often. You think J'm a midnight-oil burn- er, a bluestoeking, a female orator, a woman's club offlecer, a elever wo- mfan- ccI think yoeu're perfect.\" I AN MAGAZINE \"I'm net.' J-'m cook for a mn- tiens canteen!\" fie did net seem. greatly startled. \"WVhat's that get. te de witb the question? J love you and I want you te marry me. I weuldn't care if yen were ceok fer the King of the Fiji Isianders.\" She smiled fleetingly, blinked lier eyes hard, and was silent. \"I'm going te France, and God knows when, if ever, V'i be back. And I want-\"' And ail cf a sudden alie had fling lier bead upný lier arma on the chair- rest and was weeping convuilsively. In a moment Harwell was beside lier, lis arms about bier. She sobbed the story into bis kliaka sleeve, then. \"J-1 tocà tIc contract five menths ago. Derry and J wanted te help. Shc's clever and-serves on commit- tees and-makes speeches. But J'm net. There wasn't a thing I coul d d-do well but ceok., TIe canteen s--sends up for flic stuif twice a day, and it g-goes dewn in baskets. Tîey like my seup and pies and custards. J give my services. It is ahl J ean de--my one t-talent. But J can ceek !\" SIe Iifted lier hiead witb some show cf lionest pride, but discovercd that JJarwell's çycs were humorously, tenderlyý a-twinkle. \"Tf yoni're geinf te ýlaugh a- Hec sobcred instantly.- -8e liere's your bluestocking- erying like a baby! And, oh, yes! I neyer read Schopenhauer. J enly remembered his namne because T fell dawn on it at a spelling.mnatcî once. And J neyer got up a paper on ariy- thing. J don't know wbat the E1,vo.. lution cf tlie Cosmnos is, fer J anly read it eff an advertiscment card in tIc street-car that evening. And y brain wvas neyer over-weary frein study becauise J'm bopclcssly donies- tic 1! She struggled free and got te lier feet.",
         "i TIIE J3LUESTOCKING \"One more confession,\" said the munitions cook, and lier eyes souglit the rug. \"I-askcd Mr. Le Page to infroduce you to me.\" \"I know,\" said Harwell easily. \"I was behind a potted palm in Den- wood's conservatory. I recognized Le Page's voice, but, of course. didn't know yours-at flic time. You haven't said eyes' yet,\" he added signiflcantly. \"But I'm sf iii under the-the 'dead line-and I have neither brains nor-\"2 \"Listen. 1 don't want a woman with a head like an adding machine. And I was a stupid fool ever f0 draw a 'dead-iine' -,here your sex is cou- cerned. I eonfess myseif f0 have heen an ail-round'ass. Come liere and make a flour-dab on my right shoul- der fo match tlie one on the left.\" When the noon whistles broke in upon tliem Miss Henderson hurriediy dusted HTarwell's tunie and flien pull- ed him quickly fromthe room. \"If I arn only a eook, Fin immense- ly proud of my productions,\" se said. \"Let's go to the panfry, I want fo show you some of fthe tooflisome things I have been turning ouf since ciglit o'clock.. Perhaps fhere1ll be a big piece of raisin pie- \" And Hlarwell, being- but a mere man, offered no dlemur.",
         "A NEW DEPARTMENT 0 HIEN \"Bill\" MeNurlen went acrois from Iowa to Saskatchewan twelve years ago he had more energy than money, not- withstanding the loss of one arm, and more downright enterprise than nine- ty-nine fariners li a hundred. He was a farmer, even with one arm., andI he settled on a homestead near thie town of Rouleau. Like everyone ebse he had to borrow money froni a batik, but he believed that borrowed money la just as good as any other kind if only the Abmiglity could get a chance to irease it. Both hie and the Almighty were willing to give the. money time to inerease, but the bank wasn't. Payment of the. note became due, and Bill hadn't enough money. He told the. bank manager that the money was ail right; it was i the. ground, the Alrnighty was doing his part, and the grain was growing. But the manager told Bill to dig down and get the money. Bill hua- tled across to Regina and there got another bank to back him. Then he raised the. note and went back to the farm. In time, with the aid of fre- quent rains and sunshine, Bill's wheat was li the. local ele'vator, and li Bill's poeket reposed a cheque on the saine local batik for $5,300. Bill took the eheque across t. the. bank, and, lean- 78 \u003eF PEOPLE AND AFFAIRS ing the stub of his right arma on the counter in front of the caahier's wic- ket, passed it under. The cashier supposed Bill would deposit the cheque and then draw ît out \"as lie needed it\". But Bili replied that lie would take the casli-now. \"It's a pretty big amount,\u003e' aaid the, cashier. ' Suppose you deposit three MRS. FLORENCE RANDALL I",
         "NORTHERN LIGHTS thousand and take the balance in cash.\" \"Nothing doing,\" said Bill; 'II want the cash-the whole lump-to-day.\" With that the cashier went to the manager. The manager came from his office and suggested that as it was unusual to pay out so mucli cash at once, Bill might have the cheque eashed at his owri bank in Regina. «IBut I want the cash now,\" said Bill. \"Well,\" replied the manager apolo- getically, \"to tell the truth, we have not that mucli money on hand just now. But it's ail right, you know,\" he hastened to add. Just then Bihl's memory began to work. \"DIo you remember,\" lie said, \"1when my note fell due and I told you it was ail right, that the money was in the ground 1\" The manager eoioured and eieared lis throat. \"The money was in the ground then,\" Bill went on. \"Now it's in the elevator over there, and 1 take it that the elevator company wouid not give me a eheque on this bank unless they had flrst put the money here. You- told me to dig down and get the nxoney; now, you dig down, and be xnighty quick about it.\" The manager put on his hat, went over to the one other local bank and borrowed enougli money to, prevent Bill from elosing the doors. The banks do not worry Bill now. ne lias several farms in one, several automobiles, a motor-truck, and an ordinary fortune in f arn' implements of the heavy, expensive, 'Western type. WHTAT ARE THEY LIKEI y OU mnust have asked yourself the question a dozen times when reading stories, articles and poems whieh struek that intangible chord, that nameless note vibrating through the being of every person who, us inot hopelessly atrophîed as to soul. \"BILL\" McNURLEN Who alinut broke the. bank at Roua Strangely enougli, this poetic-look- ing photograph shows you what a poet is like-Florenee Randali Live- say-and you WÎIh doubtless say to yourself, \"Wefl, n wonder 1 liked that book of Ukranian Songs so much.» Mrs. Livesay will tell you that she îs glad, to have had country girlhood for the vision of the Comp-",
         "AN IN VIEW OF THE GREAT'QUEBEC BRIDGE ton hils and vallWys lias still a pot- ent influience on lier work. At the hePgiixrning of lier cancer she wnote character sketches of thte village peo- pieý, and( poemns -which took a breath of glowing country to the fettered city-bre(,ds; and these werc publislied wlien the wniter was still veny young. Slie will also tell you that when in Sýouit Africa slie felt that lier first oIpportuinityý to \"really write\"' had corne, and site seized it. A very few montits' residence in the West was -,uffieient to interest lier in Uknanian folk lore, and lier book of Uknanian Songs lias brouglit nothing but the highest of praise, not thte least of whlch cornes from The London World in these words: \". - . haunting, exquisite things for which we owe the translaton an unending debt; a book every poetry lover will pnize.\" If you picture M-Nrs. Li'vesayý eoverîn muiles of counitry and poking into is( lated huts and other people's b-usine,ý to gather bier material, you are wvronj Site opeiied hier cars as well as liE heart, and listened to: her Rutherfia dontestics, interpretiig their prod gality of poetry into English. Of lai Mrs. IÂvesay has been doing consi( erable lecturing, but one doubts thi lier success, great as it is, brings liE the saine gratification as that whîe accornpanied the publication of a ri ligious pocu' rny 'years ago. 1 ecated no end of comment arnong5 lber school-rnates, whe were not to 1 convinced that it did not represer a penaxice for somne darkly secret sii and for a 'whole year 'Mrs. Livesa knew the discornfort of living tc mucli iu the lirneliglit, for lier gi: friends were quite assiduous lu uri A14 I N",
         "NORTHERN LIOIITS LADY ANNE CAVEND\u003eISH scated betweeri ber father and mother, the Dukte and Duche» 'of Devonahire ing hier to confess! She is a great be- liever in newspaper work as an ail- round education for young girls, teaching them acduracy, to get other people's points of view, discrimination and giving them an unlimited chance for the observation of cliaracter. She fias, gone through lots of drudgery and lias done mueli hack work, but even it was not all drab, both sun- sihine and shadow preparing hier for the larger successes which were to TTE YOUNGEST PRESIDENT IN CANADA. A ND of se large an organization, '~toc! But this is the whole story: The members of the Ottawa ilorti- cultural Society, numberiug more than seven hundred, were reeently învited te inspeet the grounds at Gev-- eruinent Huse. The most initerest- iiug section of these proved to be a garden planted and tended by the charming little Lady Aune Caveu- dish, the youngest daugliter cf Theji, Excelleneies. Spontaneousiy snd unanimously the Society requested that they be honoured by liaviug Lady Anne as houourary president cf the organization, and therefore we are back to the startiugpoit-she is the ydungest president of the largest so- ciety of its kiud in the Dominion. But, to start again, it is well te note that horticulture is in Canada oue of the neglected pursuits that the war prom- ises te stimulate. And in this con- nection a]so the daugliter of the Gov- ernor-General is doing a good werk.",
         "THE 14ONOjURABLE HUGH GVTHRIE, M.P. One of the first Liberals to join the. new Union Government THE CONFEDERATION STAMP T HE issuanco by the Dominion Government of special postage stamps as souvenirs of Gonfederation tempts one to remark about the not- ably unattractive eharacter of alrnost ail the regular stampa ixsed i Can- ada. 0f ail things that go abroad the postage stamp is the one that is most widely seen. Then, why should it not be made attractivet Our stamps should be artistic, originel i design and contain other qualities that would distinguish them at a glance from al CANADIAN CONFEDERATION STAMP .THE HONOURABLE C. C. BALLANTYNE. One of the first Liberals to jdn the new Union Governmcent other stamps. It would be a siplendid advertisement for the Dominion. Other countries, for instance, Japan and Russia, issue postage stamps that are veritable works of art. UNION AT LAST S IR ROBERT ]3ORDEN has had t wrestle with the most diffleuit politicai situation since Confedera- tion. There were so many eonfficting elements that it was impossible to please aill His first attempts at the. formation of a Union Government f ailed because the Dominion Liberal leaders would not a.eeept the condi- tions, Later it was announced that Mr. C. C. Bailantyne, a wealthy manu- facturer of Montreal, and Mr. Uugh Guthrie, M.P., of Guelph, had gone in; and within the next few dlays Sir Robert's big coup was made by the joining of Mr. N. W. Rowell (On- tario), Mr. J. A. Calder and Mr. T. A. Crerar (Saskatchewan), and Mr. P. B. Carveil ('New Brunswick).",
         "THE LII3KAKY TAB3LE THE BATTLES 0F THIE SOMME By PHILwp GIBBS. Toronto: MeClel- land, Goodchild and Stewart. fiBRE axe those at home who, to preserve sanity or to play the coward, would fiee far f ar away fromn the shrieking field of Flanders. Let such not read ?hilip Gibbs. Mr. Gibbs does not, like many writers, invoke the catalogue of gruesomeness that benumbs perception and mercîfully wards off realization. One is ufipro- teeted against the horror of his pages. For hie goes quietly on, quietly, vivid- ly setting down the moves, progres- sions and retreats, in the business of war. It is ail a business. It is al there before one's eyes, so easily, so dîstinetly, so naturally portrayed, that ît really kappens. Philip Gibbs inakes war occur. This 18 it:- As many men as coula get into dug- outs to the north of Poziéres were down thero yestorday, listenÎng to the crashos of car heavy shoîls, whieh vers smashlng the trenches about thora and sereaming overhead on more distant journeys. The Australians and English troops, iii- cluding men of Kent, Sussex and Surrey roglimnts, were waiting in their own tronches. A erescent moon came up. The woodu darkened. Shadows crept down front Tldopvai. Distant cornfields in the world beyond the war, s0 noar as miles are count- ed, qo far away in peaco, became bronzed and red, and then ail dark and vague ia the ovening mist. Above, tho sky was still bine, 'with stars very bright; and glis- tonlng. It was, I think, about nine o 'dock--as the elock goos now in Franco and Eng- land-when tho, British troops left thoir tronches. They vent quietly without any areat clameur across the five hndared yards of ground, dusky figures, the brown of their khaki no different from the colour of the earth around themn, thriouigh thoe gloom of coming niglit. Tho Aulstraliaus worked up to the right, the English to the left. Beforo themn was the Germnan s;econd line on a front of about 3,000 yardsi, and part of that long lino whi c w\"as pierced and takea on July 14th between Bazoaitin le Petit and Longueval, whewn the British troops vent up in waves and astoundfed the world by their acivmn.It vvas no longer a âine of tronchies. It wns a line of humnmocky and tumbled earth along innumorable shî-rtr.Only the dug-outs, or -soute of thom, stifl ro- mained in ail this chaos, flleld with living and wouaded and dead. Out of the wreck of oatrth. as our mon advanced, living mon came out in groups. Tiiere vas some bayonot fighting and bombing. Promn behiind the German linos in isolntcd redoubts machine, guns woere at work spraying out bullets... Mr. Gibbs's book will probably be a widely-read register of the batties of the Somme. MERLIN By EDWIN ARLINGTON ROBINSON. To- ronto: The Macmillan Company of Canada. A VAGUE pain ià the reward o King, Merlin the seer, Vivian the loveIy, Sir Dagonet the fool-they are ail of them, bound in the coil of fate and change. And the poet makes his poem say: 1 belioe Anothor age will hanve another Merlin, Another Camnelot, and another King. The poem closes: ....Colder blow the wlud Across the world, and on it heavior lay The shadow of the burdoa of the. night; And there was darkness over Cnaelot..",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE I hie earlier volumie, \"The Man Against the Sky\"', E. A. Robinson show-ed an acrid originality that lured the reader through hie pages. Somne may imagine that because here lie takes as hie basis aspects of the Arthiirian legend~ and becomnes in places Tennysonian, that the later volume 'will fail. But it does not f ail. There is a sliglit stalenese about it be- cause of its subjeet matter, not so much lbecanse the subjeet matter je stale, but beeause one expeets it to be so. One doubts if th~e modernizing of an old themne quite succeede when Lamiorak in an otherwiee rather gond bit of speech-mnaking concludes: '' As for the Grail, I'veý never worrivd it,. and go the Giaîl 1ias neyer worrivéd ie. But thle total effect of the poei is a poet's resuilt, worthy of fthc author of \"Ben Jonson Entertains a Man froin Stratford\". Here is the poef's picture of Vivian: The lady Vivian in a fragile sheath Of crimson, dimmed and veileci ineffably BY the flame-ghaiken wherelu site sut, . . heard Merlin comiug.. The poemn is a poemn of flic coi of fate and change. Tt is the sense o! tlue coil brouglit down to date that gives fthc reader vague pain. Robin- son sayvs: Tinte swings A mnighty scythe, and sorne day ail your pence Goes down bef pre its edge like so muib elover. When ail men are like you, my lord, When ail aire rational or rickety, There imaY be no more war. A STIJDENT IN _ARMS B3Y DoNALDr HuNFca. Toronto: Me- Clellend, Goodchild and Stewart. T IIE stifdent, the author of titis book, was a firmn-witted zealot in fthc battles of fhe 'Somme. Even amnid the strenuons troubles of camp and trenchlie had a peu tbat couild not help mnarching to its own sound uipon papet. And he enriched The Spec- tator's pages with essays that are inow available in permanent form under the above caption. Essaye, did the reviewer say? There is sucli bub- bling spontaneity about them, sucli gusto, and freshness, sometimes sucli Iack of 'literary convention, that one scarcely knows what to name themn. They have a way with them that ie ail their own way. What we ,should have had front Lieutenant Uankey had war and death not called lii early away it will be left for those who knew him privately to best iina- gifle. From these pages we gather the impression of one possessed of what amiounted to genius for reactmng to the stimulus of circumstance. Noth- ing seemed to toucli Hankey without touching his niind. Everything set htim'thinking, not always profoundly, as hie later published volume shows, but always brightly, takingly. Some- tirnes lie suddenly flashes an amazîing originality in our eyes. And whether he ie writing of \"Kitehener's Army\", or of 'Some Who were Lost, and Afterward were Found\", or of \"A Student, Hie Comrades, and Ris Churdi\", lihe is a phrasemaker. We like to read the book of a phrase- CHRISTINE BY ALICE CHOLMONDELEY. Toronto: The Ma1cmillan Company of Can- ada. T II autor0f this book is an Eng- is sinister in its insincerity. It will not be weIl regarded by the better type of patriot. There is somnething almoqt of the sacrilegious and the blasphemous about it. The typical love of an innocent girl for the world and lier mother is exploited for the ends of a peculiarly lowering type of war propagande. Thepse are the facte of the book. 'The preface is signed \"Alice Chol- imondeley\", who states therein that the letters to follow were wrîtten by",
         "THE LIBRARY TABLE lier daughter Christine, from Ger- xnany, while she was there studying the violin in the months just preced- ing August, 1914. Christine, so the preface states, died of double pneu- monia as she journeyed out of Ger- many after the declaration of war. Alice Cholmondelcy says: \"I4' arn publishing the letters just as they came to me, leaving out nothing. We have been stripped in these days of our sec- reies and our private hoards. We share OUT griefs.\" On the next page the \"Publishers' Note\" says : The publishers have considored it best to alter some of the personal names ini the following pages, The. honest and straight-forward reader covers the preface and the publisher's note and then moves on to the letters. These are splendidly written. They are fresh and agile. One does not readily lay them aside until the last page is turned. But one slowly becomes skeptical. Something is wvrong. There is unreality some- where. The psyehology surely trips in places. Doubt grows .It begins te dawn that the whole thing is a eoncected thing, written about Ger- mnany in the heat of war Lever hy the subject of an enemy state after Au- gust, 1914, and not by innocent littie Christine \"ready tte like everything\" at ail. in the mind of the worldly wise and the wary the condemnation of the book lies in its baffling and de- plorable unreali 'ty, which the un- sophisticated hearts will accept un- critically. Tt is surely not becoming for the Engliali spirit to îndulge in this sort of thing. The tru 'e Britishi sense can be trusted to repudiate this insidicus insinceritY. The hint at a savÎng element in the niatter lies in the faet that, the pub- lisher calls it \u003c«a notable addition to the fiction that lias deait with the war\", and quotes a reviewer as say- ing: \"Whethcr fact or fiction.. , thus at least prcparing the way to truth for the credulous reader. THE LAST DAYS 0F FORT VAUX BY HIENRY BREX. Toronto: Thomas Nelson and Sons. H ERE in one short volume, vividly, arc compressed the terrible events that took place during one short perîod of the war. Tt is not his;tory, for it is more moving than event is the mere chronicle, the record of passing events. Jt gives eue an impression cf the present war that will not be easily effaced. TUrE HIGR IE ART By BAsIL KING. Toronto: The Mus- son Bock Company. THFIS intensely imoving nioveýl shcldol dian readers, beeause the author and the heroine are Canadians. It lias even a-firmer hold on our attention than that, beeause it deala with im-. portant conditions arising out of the prescnt war and affeeting hoth Canl- ada and the United 'States. At firat one thinks that one is reading merely the stcry cf a very poor girl who marries a rich man, but accui oee realizes that vital things, thiings that involve us aIl, are being discussed, and one begins to sec somcthîng of one's present responsibilities. It is a fine romance,,wcll written, but it is something more than that. KLEATII BW MàD~Gz McER., Toronto: )le- Clclland, GSood\u003eild and Stewart, MA IS. MACBETHI chose a good \"'setting for this mild( \"thriller\", For everyone believes that the Yukon, especially Dawson City, in the late nineties, was the scene cf at least one thrill a minute. She gives a descrip- tion cf life in Dawson City at that time, esaeially the life cf the danc- ing-halls, andl into it she weaves a",
         "THE OCANA»IAN MAGAZINE melodrama and romance that is eni- tertaining and convineing. ICleath is tlh- name of the liera, a newspaper compositor who was attracted to Daw- scii by the proprietor of the first ncwspaper under the miduiglit min. lie f el ini love with the daugliter of the proprietor, who was proprietoir also of a prominent saloon and danc- ing-hall; but h. had a past, aise a wif e, two serious obstacles. Beeause of these things, lie had littie to say about himseif, and accordingly he be- came a mystery. Like ail mysteries, however, lie soon came out into the light; and following the tragie death of his wif e, who lad followed hin to Dawson, lie lias the novel experience of a proposal from the girl lie lo-ves There are many clever, even witty passages, and apart from its 'popu- larity as a novel,' the story, if set for mo'ving pictures, undoubtedly would be a pronounced success. *Ï THE DEFINITE OB JE\u003cCT Bx JEFmaR FÀARNOL. Toronto- The Musson Book Company. ONE thing that can be said for Jeffery Farnol's latest novel is that it is not half so bad as tire hast one. '\"Beltone the Smith\" was a shock to lovera of \"The Broad Highway\", and many will approadli \"The~ De- finite Objeet\" with misgivings. How- ever, we eau reassure them on this point. In his new story Mr. Farnol lias returned to lis carlier manner, and if le lias not given us a novel as good as the two gres.t ones that mnade him famous he lias at least given us a readable story. «With a prineess in exile and a prince in disguise form- ing an appropriate centre, le lias gathered ail our f avourite situations round us. We have the burglar wl» is not a burgiar realhy and is spared by the Ixero. - 'We have the lif e-weary millionaire who decides (alznost) to kil himacilf by way of a new experi- ence, but is diverted £rom his awfu purpose by a plunge into real (slum life. We have the professional prizE fi glter who ià beaten without -troubi by the amateur. 'We have murdei suicide and sudden death; a man wh thinks lie kilîs a f ellow marn anc doesn't, and the steru father wh turus bis erring daugliter £rom hi dfoor and dies of remorse in cons( quence. 'Then, as thougli this wer not enougli, we have as a pièce de ré sîstance, the deathbed marriage o' what turus out not to be a death-be after ail. One eau imagine his fe', low authors feeling sore with Mi ýFarnol for using up ail their stoc situations so reeklessly. There ar many minor characters donc in D» kenesque; and as the action. tak( place in New York the mixture c American slang and English «quain ness\" is, well, it is very mixed, indee\u003c Thc sentiment, thougli, is purely Enj lieli, and there is mueh of it. On ti. whoie, if this book were not by tl- artist who wrote \"The Broad Higl way» we miglit flnd it an entertali ing story along the line of \"The Daw of To-morrow\", only miidh longe As it is, we wonder what can ha-, happened to Mr. Farnol. Perbal it's the war? THE SPELL 0F TUE HAÀWAIIA2. ISLANDS AND THE PHILIP- PINES BY ISÂAL AN«DERsON. Boston: TI Page Company. T TS is a happy addition to ti popular «spel\" series of books travel. It is, indeed, one of the mo interesting, dealing as it does wil countries that are not only faseinatir ini themseîves, but whidh are becomix of increasing importance in trade ai commerce. TIhere are many excella: reproductions of photographs, soci of them beautifully coloured.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTisER 1 When Serving Refreshments -You wUI find that Ingersoil Cream Chett, wîli enabli you to make many delightful Deikcacirs. in the purent and finest ci Cream Chenet. Jut the thlug for daint-y sandwich,,. Ask also for Ingemsll Pimente and aiso Green Chue Ch,,,.- 10v and 15c a package. ,UAN1WIACTURED RT THE NGERSOLL PACKIIEG CO., LTD. INGER8OLL, ONT. ZM ))ifre P G. Meawes th Uf~Tire iwe air in yeur intie Schrade IUivermI Valve Repair TooI i.\u003csie Tcol (c ip ibreads, vet Rcuuov. dssim \"\"M4",
         "MAGAZINE ADVERTISER LA~ Lb~jIm4JS-J Ail Over Canai -je used ini the. finest city and country homes; the. homes of prominetit and wealthy folk ; the. homes of well known people ; tii1 homes of architecte ; the. homes of heating and ventilating engineers and experts ; the homes of university profeesors and writers on scieiitific heating ; the homes of pIiysicians and health officers ; the. homes of those who cati afford the BEST anti those beet calculated to KNOW about heating apparatus. With those who have noîiey, brais and scieîitific knowledge the evidence ie overwhelmng i favor of the :.Isey Warm Air General Look into the Kelsey before you boy a Heater. Let us show you just why Kelsey Fresh Air Heating is preferred to any other system by people wko investgale. WRITE FOR KELSEY LITERA4TURZ LNADA FOUNDPJZES AND FOR-GINGS, 1 JAMES SMART MFG. CO. BRANCH ICVILLE, ONT. WINNIPEG~ \u0026oderS mRm MARK Known the worl over as the mark whieh idenitifies the best of cutlery",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER -The Womau Who Cares is watchful of every influence that bears upon the husband7s health. And lier part lies largely in selecting proper food and drink. For example, when science says lthat tea and coffee contamn a drug whose constant use makes for _premature old age, and whose reactionary effects cripple nerves and heart, she quits both tea and coffee and serves the delicious, pure food-drink POSAoTUM 6\"There': a Reasona»",
         "20 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 5 months on an Ice Floe bovilssves lit. of Sb*ckleton's Mn SIR ERNEST SHACKLETON wrt. \"When the Endurance sank in the Weddell Sea, we had to seek refuge on the shifting ice. Most of the stores had t» b. scrapped, as the avoidance of weight was of great, im- portance. It was then that the Bovril rations werç of siuch splendid hetp. »uring our five and a halfnionths' drift on the. floe, the Bovril rationsI fornmed one of the stapie diets; and after the ioe broke up, and we took to the boats, they were our mainstay. 1 think it is flot too much to say that without them, few, if any of us, would have survived.» la .pit ofthe.iucr.hinthecst of Bef (the zaw material of Bov*il\u003e t here h» b..u no 15o4yubuil4ing $owers of lovril prove4 t be froan 10 t. 20 tm sthe aaxoun a e.",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE AUVERTISER ' Before School Millions of mothers know that a dish of Puffed Wheat is the premier mor- ning çgreeting. There is no other cereal*food any- where near like it. Here are wbole grains shaped like wheat grains, puffed to eight times normal size. As fliisy as a snowvflake-as airy as a bubble. With a flavor that suggests a nut confection. Yet a whole-grain food, supplying ail that flour food lacks. And fitted for complete digesition as whole w-heat never was before, It forms the ideal breakfast. Afterj SchoSol Douse any Puffed Grain with nielted butter, as you would peanuts or popcorn. Or merely sait. Then you have a perfect food which tastes like a confection, It is toasted, fragile, nut-like, crisp, and almond-like in flavor. Yet it is simply grain food made easy to digest. It will not tax the stomach, or kili the appetite for dinner. Hungry boys who don't have Puffed Grains eat somnething not one-haif so desirable, or half so lîkable. Puffed Puffed Wheat Rice Roth 15c Exept in Far Woet (1722) U",
         "\"Patent\" Groal ShouId Be Used For Baby when eight or nine mnontlis old. Ma the forin of a thin gruel conibined with th ree parts and one part water it is a perfect food. If the cbild bad beçn reared on Rcobinson's \" Patent\" BaiIey until it bas reacbed the above age, Groats and is@uld be given alternately with \"Patent\" Barley tends to promote bone and muscle. For the Iuvalid and the Agod, in cases of influ a bowl of hot gruel taken in bed at nigbt produ profus. perspiration belping to drive the cold c the system. Taken by the aged at night kt prov warnith and sleep. Our free booklet 'lAdvice to Mothers\" tellsl ai how to feed, clothe and c'are for infants and chil MAGOR, SON \u0026 CO., Limi- Sole Agents for Canada 191 St. Paul St. W., 30 Choec Montreal Toroal iSPAGIIETT 1 TOMATO SAUCE AND CIIEES Shighly nutritious and partic ,y appetizing dish. ýe sure whcn ordering spaghet necifv CLARK'S and kee",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER For Your \"Meatless Days\" 0f course you will want tô help the Gov- ernment in the work of conserving food supplies by having one or two meatless days each week. For your meatless meals you will want food that supplies as much nutri- ment as meat at a lower cost-food that is ready-to-eat and easily digested. Shiredded Wheat Biscuit contains ail the body-building material in the whole wheat grain prepared in a digestible form. It is 100 per cent.. whole wheat-nothing wasted, nothin thrown away. The whole wheat contains .every cie- ment needed for building heaithy bodies and for fur- nishing energy for the day's work. It contains more real,, body-building nutriment than meat, eggs or potatoes and costs much iess. Two or three of these crisp, browvn littie loaves of cooked whole wheat with milk or cream make a nourishiing, sat- isfying mneal for any time of day at a cost of a fe\\\\ cents. Deli- clous w\\ith sliced bananas, stewed prunes, baked apples or MADZ other fruits. MAEIN- CANADA BY THE CANADIAN SHREDDEI\u003e WHEAT COMPANY, LIMITED Niagar F.iI6, Ontaio Toronto Office, 49 WeIllngto Street Est",
         "ADVER'ÇISER CMRD REQORIDS QOR1WSONDENCE",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER wdERFADv. -ÀM-A\u0026MIqmw a'q RUNNING in fromn an advanced post, at night, RLongshaw R. Pointt, of teAmerican Ambulance travelled a road that was less than a kilometer distant and ini full view of the enemy lines. Suddenly the engine stopped dead, To light a match would have revealed his position, with the resuit that at any instant a sheli might sweep across the rond andi wipe the car and its two wounded occupants off the mnap. But lie had bis DAYLO with him, and using bis band as a shade, was able to throw light ail aver the engine without illuminating the. sceinery. In hftlf a inunte h. iocated the. trouble; in tbree minutes more was on bis way to the hospital-SAFE1 For every erergency of the night-DAYLO is equally dependable. 77 différent sty les at prices froua 85 cents up. Sold by the better ejectricai, hardware, drug, sporting goodu, stationeay and jewelry stores everywhere. B 'iDoIi't let vatir mnIdier fin - f",
         "CÂNADIAN MA~GAZINE ADVERRTISER A \u0026\"sameness\"' th.at is most enjoyable- the daily, unvarying goodness of a cup of \"SEAL BRAN D\"' COFFEE. It neyer fails to greet with that same ekquisite fragrance, amber clearness and delightful flavour, that win people with the first cup. In y2, 1 and 2 pound tins. Whole-ground-pulverized-also fine ground for Percolators. Neyer sold in bulk. 184 CHASE \u0026 SANBORN, MONTREAL and o Wine.",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER 27 r. il (A 750-C heUit* Fo aluto c urymn eMMt A Dish of Stewed Prunes- Two Slices Buttered Toast- Coffee with Sugar and Cream -Quaker Oats with Milk or Crean., ln Nutrition that Equals-- 1 Pound Eggs (7 Eggs), or 1 Pound, Broiled Chicken, or 2 Pounds Potatoes, or '/, Pound Round Steak. \u003e\u003c4 Average Cost Quaker Oats supplies nutrition at. one-fourth the coït of the average mixed diet. It supplies ail the elements needed, in a perfectly balanced form. As an energy food it stands first among grain foods. It is the ideai food for grow6th. And no other grain has been endowed with such richiness and such flavor. When you serve Quaker Qats- in porridge, bread, muffins, pan- cakes or cookies-you are minim- îzing f oodi cost. You are conserving wheat. You are suppiying the ut- most in a food. Q uake/ar Qat.s 1Ftaked firom Quee-n Grains OnIy Get Quaker Oats, because this ade embodies just the big, rich, .vory oats. Ail puny and insipid ains are omitted from this brand. We get but ten pounds of Quaker Oats from a bushel. But the re- suit is doubly-delicious flakes. And they cost you no extra price. wher, higa treighta tnay prohibit. The QuakerOmis Ompany -rooufs Canada Seakcat0.., Canauda .1 CANADIAN MAUMINE ADVERTIMR 27",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVNJRTISER Lif t Corus out with Fiuiiers A few drops of Freezone applied directly upon a ten- der, achirig corn stops the soreness at once and soo the entire corn or callus loasens and can be Iifted off with the fingers without, fl~even a twinge of pain. Froezone mil oe il ai any oeda Lwý4",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 9 -Il Such a Deliclous .Ginger Ale For more than 8ixty ycars, O'Keefé's b.- verages have been the finest of theïr kinds produce. in Canada. SPECIAL PALE DRY GINGRm AL in quit. in ke eping with the high stand- ard of other O'Kecfe beverages. It le a moat deIiciou ginger ale-pale and spark- lingLdry and inviting -with a unique flavourthatyouwifl We alse make t style Giu1 :epr- V-1. r Ale, ruapa- Cream E-Am GELATI NE wit aIitde Rice, Cream and Fruit makes this nourishing dessert which is a wekcome change froui the everyday sweet. YtuHfidit quite e.ayto make and adaptable to plain or fancy serviag as the occasion requite. T6 issaly onef the Dssert\u0026, Salads, Puddings and Candis easily made fbon the. directions in my Recipe Book. wbich 1 will aend you on requet. CRARLES B. ItNOX LATINE CO., lac,. inSt1.v si~D. W.uq. PMONTRFAL. C ... ci 19",
         "30 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZI A.DVERTISER 8 6M 11OV14A a ade leat u wats show teniac ie to yo t hes ymtîto Wth na intn eucncaneyu",
         "32 CANADIAN MAGAZINE rLiving Canadian Mod Serve as standards for the val styles_ of D \u0026A Corsets whose models embody the best featur, leading Paris and New York desii Por economy, ne well es for comfort and style, ask your oorsetière to show you the D \u0026 A Models. There is a style for every fgure. DOMINION CORSBT Co. Toromo-QUBBB--Montreal Makers also ofthe \"La Diva\" Corsets and \"D \u0026 A\" Good-Shape Brassières.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISBR 33 Like Taking an Axe Te aCor Seine methada i ofremoau3 camas mggcat an axe. About one coin in tom ulfoda a second application. They am. liarl. They attackI liti.u as wlI se the But no coin cou oauit tdu n.w..dey meîIie4. col. adAt heast a milion. tomrna ranth are emded in ti Souueazamuuy. Someu. equentapplcauious. easy, patio way. Uasas ci Bue 'j\u0026y .ply it asn Doon Aliwere ucetamn,a\u0026Hunscieahk.cunil Bluejy camue. as a corn i t. And it nover pains again. Now. witlx Blue-jay, you apply à thia protectar, Try it touigt- on n onml rnw hti which etopathe pain at once. Inla nta cri iid the center-acting on thIe corn toa àL Andti dt means lile- aloa.-ia geate, efficient wax.,qU tino freodom. Yau will b. Ada tape wraps the toc 'I.Y0 \" BluecjUa amazeti ta know kow esilY whl tacta. JÇk 1 , C r. Pltt tits trouble can hoened Blue»jay i. applie in la ajify. StpPan I5ItSUtI7 BlejyCr ltr are Yhen applied, you forge th dund Corn\u0026 CosuJihtoly so by \u0026Il DpggïtéAlio corn.lntwadaysyouminditgou. 25s Pakae at Drugiste Bhme-jay Bno ltes BAUER \u0026 BLACK, Lirai,.J Makmr ofSurffical Dmessunw, Rfr. TORONTO, ON4TARIO How BIue.jay Acts , aaft pad which stop the pain le pressure. a is the. 1 \u0026 B wax, -hich gently undemlnes the cmi. V...~IIy it takea Only -18 hOLuru Ù. end thi. ctarn oeltey. C ia rubbr adiiesive whidu sticks without w.tting. 1It wrapa around the. toe. ta make thie plater mnug and bleiwiiit Blu.jay is applied ina ajiffy. After that, ane âo.n'tfot the. corn. The. action ia gentlt. and applied ta tht cuira aton. Terna 20% dawr weeIIy. We trust ar JACOBs BSOS.. ela 15 Térent. Arcade",
         "34 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER R Igh t-al the Start q Those Dunlop Tires you found on your new car were there for a purpose-to satlsfy you. Ç If you believe that a plain tire wll always fill the bill, then doubtless, you will sec no reason to change from Dunlop \"Plains.\" 9 But if you want an anti-skid for your next order, you have your choice of Dunlop \" Traction Tread,\" or Dunlop \"Special.\" You arc bound to be satisfied with Dunlop Tires. Dunlop Tire \u0026 Rubber Goods Co., Limited HEAD OFFICE AND FACTORIES: TORONTO BRANCHES: Victoria, Vancouver, Edmonton, Calgary, Saskatoon, Regina, Winnipeg, London, Hamilton, Toronto, Ottawa, Montreal, St. John, Halifax. Makers of High-Grade Tires for Automuobiles, Motor Trucks, Bicycles, Motorcycles and Carriages : and Hiigh-Grade A. 85",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 3 Modol flghty.rive Four other great events of life, buying rnily car is very much the concern *wife and mother. that woman-and ber name is -who by helpful suggestions ides ber provider against too a car or by loving restraint checks er gerierous husband who would vise make the mnistake of too be perfectly comfortablc-to ward off fatigue on those long trips which should b. of such hcalthful bcncfit to the whole family. It has big comfortable scats and canti- lever rear springs that make it easy riding. Yet it is flot too large to be economical of operation. And iaithe building' of this beautifut Over- land there is no hint o! experiment, no construction extravagance, Its purchasc is dictated by conimon sens. and the practice of truc economyi-t will b. a great cirent in your 1fe. Sec the Willys - Overland dealer about 36 1 1 4 -- - -i \"' - - -- - -4 - -4 - %ý1 - - - - a - I\u0026 -",
         "36 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER M iW LAUGHLIN THE1 GRAND PRIZE 0F 111E OTTAWA-PRESCOT IIIGHWAY RELIABILITY TOUR GOES TO DR. PLE. VALIN AND HIS M.LAUGHUIN D.SLX-45 Si nwfemtorists driving cars of ai ka sarted on ]ne 28th in the Reliabdlity Tour froni Ottawa to Alexandra ay via Prescott and Gouvenor, N. Y. The. McLaughlin D-.Six.45, driven by Drt. R. E. VaIiiý emerged with a perfeor score of 1000 points from tihe gruelling tests to which ail were subjected. So keen was the. competition for highest honora that Retere. Edenburn had to devise special tests ini which the. McLauglilin proved its auperiority. McLaugblin suprernacy ini points of Power, Easy Control, Efficiency and Economy fias again been established byt our. The. resuits of the tour rellect credit on Dr. Valin as well as on Canada's Standard Car. Tii Reliability Tour was flot'a road race nor a speed test. No protessionl chauffeurs toolk part. Ownmr drove their own cars and the tests brought ou the. E-' both in car and driver. Canad ans who wnant the joys of rnotoring. without the annoyance of mechanical trouble, willhheed the lesson brought out by this tour and niake their new car a McL.aughlin. WRITE FOR CATALOGUE 5MOWINQ MODELS AND PRICES The M~cLAUGHLIN MOTOR CAR CO., Làmîted",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERISER 8 'IhoTRAIL B3LAZER *0o greafer Motor Car Value From the standpoint of dollar for dollar value there's not a car made which offerý more for your money than the famous Chevrolet Four-Ninety A. Before the Chevrolet was made in Canada, good cars were ail high ini price. But our niammoth production and manuifacturing effciency enables us to sel the Chevrolet Four-Nînety A at a prîce niuch lower than its value wben com- pared with other makes of cars. With the surplus power developed by the famous valve-in-head motor the owner of a Four-Ninety A invariably is the - trail blazer.\" Standard oquipment includes speedonteter, electric starting and ligbting, ammeter, oil1 lu- dicator, light equipmentt one man top, demnountable rims, non-skid tires on rear wheels and many féatures usually Ioolced for in,-ars oeuch higher in price. ChevroI.t Four-Ninety A $7q50RASR$3 eCL.vrelet Egèels ln Readiter, Tearis, sud Sedsn 8udies . « th at yu nesurt deale. Western Parts and Service Branches: Regina and Calgary p4 37",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADYVERTISER !ING'TELEPIIONES?' TIIEN INVESTIGATE! Do nQt purctiase foreign macle goods f you can purchase goods of equal or )etter quality that are Macle-in-Canada. certainly do flot purohase forcign macle roods without investigating what is nade in the same line in Canada. Wc make t'elephones for every service, :ho çity, the rural systcm, the factory, :ho home or the office. Give us an )pportunity of showirig you what we",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 39 esitury Tho New Country Ufe ieeyboy\u0026 FeSram H.rper's Red Book Revlew of Revlews crilmer'a The Coaan Worlda, Work T W,, M11- Cop..-Fdte.n M,11.on Roaders Monthly ELEVENTH YEAR frite te thoea advertîaets. Asic W .,t.go Bureau, i BEa..on Stroet, Boston, Mats., for toliable travol infrmeton and advlcé LIVE THE SIMPLE LIFE AT HOME A~ Iyouwantlto get the mout qt of lifeyon muet live inaccordanc with Nature kw. In Lislitle book, «THE SIMPLE UIFE IN A NUTSHELL.,\" Dr. Kellogg mtCIYUhn o co Live the \"Simiple Lite\" at homat-and low to ~ N N The book z. free. Send for your copy itoui. THE BATTLE CREEK SANITARIUM, Box 109c, BX[TLE CREEK, MICIL fi i n - iA% HOTEL BUJTLER Xýount C amne, M gaMllo D a r No l ,n« or¶ '\"\" S Il , Eccee.ace es-te-g fo.s- for D... doE v. Rate Ioal Moe t P-' 1 1. «.l..' r - S.taga irt À. TUR'SHK NI(EL XnsC ,rnoutto Hehot HIILA-D rIE I oute ha ofw n de f otdoo. rk portN C Do.tyi \u0026f0 Quel, J sr in 700 Mout, Rlto n. Pa us wit ei wo od u ure p er tarina gortges. g la ie s andate Nosrat oT HEi hulasande tomn then Pcf0ic atiroa offewe ai rie of ute train o ô f ai ur tor p t ase a nd MU o n t Robson Pak w it h i , onerul o the General Poamnger »epartmiit, Montreal, Que.; Toronto, Ont.; Winnipeg, Igan. CANADIAN NORTI-ERN RAILWAY",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Big Game, Huntn Moose m- Deer 1 silent spots ini the 'High- )f Ontario\" are the haunts )ose, Deer, Bear and other afm e.. IT WHILE YOU MAY OPEN SEASONS.- -Nov. lst to Nov. lSth. some of the. lqothern dis- iof Ontario including garni, the. open scason bas extende d and is froin NOV. o NOV. 30[h. that part of the Province of Ontario ling north of clia*n Government Railway f rom the Quebe to the .Manitc Jary, the open scason for Z4oose is fromn OtoIIeU lE ovemnber 3011h. ,te to, any agent of the. Grand Triwnk for illustrated lterature, iarq of eame laws. etc., or to J. QUINLAN, Bonaventure, Montri 1",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIE 41 \"JULIAN AàlLE\" The name behind the goods is your guarantee for the quafity 'RITEmHITE' WARDROBDE TRUNKSa Every appointment in its construction- every convenience in the making- every point ini the manufacture of the Rite-Hite' Ward- robe Trunk is one more good reason why it should be the trunk of your choice in contemn- plating a longer or shorter trip, - summer or winter.' In a very real way it is the most.'complete of wardrobes, and apparel travels in it with as littie risk of crushing as it would right on the \"hangers\" or in the \"Chest of Drawers\" in the home. (Have it demonstrated in the store, or write for speciii bookiet.) $33 0 to $90= The Julian Sale Leatiier Goods Co., Ltd. 105 King Street Wet, Toronto",
         "ADVERTISER THE FINEST IIINTINO GROUNDS IN là lUU. P 4 a Reached",
         "CANADIA MÂGÂZ HOTEL WEBSTER Forty-4ift Stret by, FÎft Avenue 40'WEST 4Sth STRUTr NEW YO\u003eRK (J..t auff titAeu on e of dtr'a quie~a tre. One of Newý, iYork's most beau- jtiful hotels. Much Sfavored bywomen StravellnL, without escort. Within Sfour minutes walk 1of fort\u003e' theatres. Cneof shop- R..-., pdivate bath $25 anui d .pwarda Skitig room, bedroom aud bath . S\u0026$8. and upwarda W. Johria.. Quin, Prop. rhin1uEng of christmas? ý, year'S subscription to THEt CANADIAN 4AGAZINE is a very acceptable gift and eniinds the recipient of the donor through- lut the entire year. MNE ADVERTISIER qu', r II i 4 ï c 41 Mk, , îP fb MIE",
         "Mi CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER., To Suit ail Seasons IJaeger Underwear me\u003e' be ha nweights to~ suit ail se'asonS. It offers the moat coinplete bodily protection of any knowu clothing, and combines quality with style and comfort. Madeinatwo piece suits and combina- tions in ail weights for men,. vormen and children. F.1 id.e a etger10 Stors~e and Aseel. thuegii.nt thé Dhumio À. JWlly iluhtraied ratalogiefiW o .aPPlcatioi DR.JÂEGER 5s,Z?'. UID Toronto Montrisl Wiuufr.s Britsh \"fbmned 1883 \". Tr9he Original and",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 45 Are YOU Missing Something tha't Millions Enjoy? Why do you suppose the majority of the men on this confinent who, can ai! ord the money for shaving satisfaction, are using the. Gillette Safety -Razor?ý Why isthe Gillette a treasured itemn of equipment in ethe kit of practically every oficer and of tens of thousands of men in the Canadian Overseas Forces? Only one reason could possibly hold good with so many level-headed, men. It's this--the Gillette gives a shave, day in and day out, that no other razor in the world has ever equalled-and does it handily inSfve minutes or less. That is why over a million -morte men everywhere are adopting the Gillette every year. YOU would appreciate this as much as any other man! The saving o! time-the independence of barber shops - the resulting economy -and above ail the matchless comfort o! the clean, quick Gillette shave- these are real, personal advantages which you must flot longer mui. The Gillette Safety Razor is a leading specialty with Hardware, Drug and Jewelry Dealers everywhere. \"Bulldogs\"', \"'Aristocrats \" and Standard Sets cost $5 -Pocket Editions $5. to $6. - Combination Sets, $6.50 up.",
         "CANÂDLAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER CANADA Put Your Hand To The PIow! frshfuro manLgeae scceu for youaddcd ;resec srenthto heEmpreand surer victory fo- of Canada re todayp ayi l-important part in t",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGÂZINF ADVERTISR /47 The unsu.rpassed beauty of tone that la found ini the \"'Cecilian \" piano has insured it a leading position amongst the few outstanding pianos in the worid. When to that wonderful tone lis added perfect workmanship and beautiful design, you feel that in Iselecting a ' Cisciim\" piano for your home you have made no possible mnistake. The Cecîian ýAil Metal Action Player Piano has been for many years at the apex of player piano perfec- tion. it is Ieakproof;, climate proof and rust proof, and the Cecilian Iemponoid or time-controlling lever gives )-OU complete control of the instrument, elîmating en- tirely the mechanical effect: common to the average player piano. All Cecilian Upriglit Pianos are convertible, that is, the player action may be installed at any future time convenient t\u003c the purchaser. This most important feature lis found omly ini the Cecilian piano. Write us for catlogu,and Part\"Icars as Io our sellingplarz. THE CECUJÂAN COMPANY, LIMITF.I 247 YONGE STREET - TORONTO",
         "48 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The. \"O*.ld, English\" style Is One of the Newer Conceptibnis Designed to Match the Popular Period Styles at Present in Vogue AN IDEAL STACIK Where a single stack, sucb as the one ilustra.ted, will fill aUl needs, there is nothing quitc as adaptable as the \"Old English Style\" which. conforns, to the popular period styles at present ini vogue' in houBehold furniture, such as Jacobean, Eliza- bethan and William and Mary. Best of ail, perhaps, the price is wlthin the rcach of all. Either ini Mahogany or in Quartered Oak. YOU WILL LIKE IT IN YOUR HOME Not only because it furnishes ideal storage for your books, but aiso because you wil have a piece of furniture that 'wilI delight your eye1, anid elicit admiration from your friends because of its beauty and entire freedom from the defects of thie common sectional cases. WRITE TO-DAY FOR OUR \",mACEY Il STYLE BOOK. IT'S FREE. For Sale by \u0026Il Loading Furalture DealIers",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER plate ffiat ;m reoeived uwuen m~ woa =rried and u« stil have some Uý l he besi stores uou wiIl be Officred Ato-da9j as the lezig brand of silver- plate the saine make that merchants of fiffij tjears and more ago recommended bo their customers. Il is quite the proper thing to start housLoeeinç with LW4 ROGERS BRos.'SilVer Plate that Wemrs' SoId *tih an unqueliid guarantea macle possible bij Ilh. achie al s o vei 65 tjours. At Icaadmgq deajers Send krs illusfrcdd C*aAe» 'F-23\" MERIDEN BRITANNIA CO., limited HAIMITON. CANADA MMU5DM?, CONN. NEW YORK CHIICAGO SAN FRANCISCO The World'o Largée*t M-aer of Sterling Silvor ând Pl-te",
         "50 CANA.DIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISZR 44-- Suppse ous are lu at Dlumhmg Cari You will probably wvant a light meal, but still nourishing and sustaining. Try~ TOASTER a~ nt hw CORN FLAKES and ote ow'fresh .andi brigbt you feel. Also note the ecoiiomy comipared wih the cost of te foods. The same ratio of economy will aiply in your ome And insist on the origi1nal in the red, white and gee package.",
         "Successful Men and Grape - Nuts FOOD are usually we%-lll acquainted. \"Theres a Reason\" Oakey's SILVERMmITHS 3OaJ For cblu Plat Oakey's EMR CLOTH Glass Pape,. Fkat Papeu Oakey' s .«WELLNGTON,\"l IIEpoLSII Haut î rC.ng Md Polabla Catde\" Oakey's \"WELLINGITOW' IACK unA B\"u feW St\"«es etc. OA«CY' GOODS SOI» £VEYWIIER JOHN OAKEY \u0026 SONS, LIMIED wlumatom -motl. Landeni. £mu., S.E. It's the best yet ! No Dressing-table is complete wîihout a boule of IFda Wate This mate bless prue after a Centûryofp.euc-.eza stili stands today the ac. knowledged favorite among Toilet Waters. In the Bath, on the Dressa mg-tlable, after Shaving, 'n at however used, it is ai- 1 1pways delightfülly refreshing. PREPÂRED ONLY DBY I LANMAN \u0026 KEMP, NEW YORK\u003c and MONTREAL. Ask Your Druggist for IL. Accept no Substitute i"
      ],
